Authors
E. Benjamin Kelsey
Number of Reviews
77

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
Luckily, some people got STARSHIP TROOPERS. Some people knew it was supposed
to be silly. For those of you who didn't, how could you miss it? From the very
beginning, when we see an interactive Internet-like promotional video for the
armed forces of the future, it should be obvious this film is to be taken
lightly. I guess without blatant one-liners and HOME ALONE style slapstick,
some people just don't recognize such goofy humor. Such a dry approach to such
intentionally campy humor must have left some disillusioned. First thing to do
before seeing this movie - lighten up.
Meet the equivalent of "Beverly Hills 90210" meets "Mighty Morphin Power
Rangers". Four close friends are now graduating high school and are ready to
join the armed forces, which, in the future, means fighting for the whole
galaxy and not just your country. Johnny Rico (Casper Van Dien) is ready to
join the infantry, mostly because his girlfriend Carmen Ibanez (Denise
Richards) has enlisted to be a pilot. Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer) has enlisted
as a trooper, and it's possible she's joining merely to follow Rico, whom
she's always had eyes for. If you saw these three on the street, you'd
automatically start searching for the fashion designers and photographers, for
never has a movie's cast looked so much like the cut-out cover of "Seventeen"
magazine. The lone non-supermodel, Carl Jenkins (played by Doogie Howser
himself, Neil Patrick Harris) is the brainiac who gets into the military
intelligence division, the top secret department that pretty much leaves
Doogie - er, Carl out of the picture. (Good call - now we can put all our
drooling efforts into only the most deserving of characters).
Right off the bat, Rico becomes the star of the show, far surpassing all the
other soldiers and becoming squadron leader in a short period of time. But a
horrific accident during a standard training exercise (which follows all to
closely to his breakup with Carmen) leaves Rico ready to call it quits. With
his bags packed and his civilian clothes back on, Johnny is ready to walk off
base and catch the next flight home. Well sorry, Rico Suave, but there's no
place like home, especially after gigantic alien insects have destroyed it.
That's right, the planet is being attacked by a colony of arachnid-like alien
beings that a can of Raid just isn't going to destroy. With a sudden change of
heart (and clothes), Rico is back in the game, following his fellow starship
troopers off to fight a mean group of daddy long legs.
What STARSHIP TROOPERS really is, is a spoof of all that it even remotely
touches on - the soap opera like love affairs of high school, the love for
sci-fi and thirst for gore shared by this same age group, etc. Nothing is
taken seriously. It's almost as much a satire on young adults as CLUELESS, but
with its sly and futuristic approach, it's not as recognizably so. It's a
spoof so subtle that many won't recognize the spoofery. If you deem this as
sci-fi/action, you're wrong. It's sci-fi/action/comedy, with the comedy being
on the level of such cult favorites as EVIL DEAD 2. STARSHIP TROOPERS just may
be on the road to cult status as well.
Gore is a factor heavily brought up in reviews of this film, but the gore,
too, is meant to be cheesy. Yes, it's graphic, but it's also brutally phony,
and that's what makes it such great fun to watch. Not since the old "Mr. Bill"
skits on "Saturday Night Live" has torture and mutilation been such a joy to
watch. People were laughing out loud every time a body was severed in half or
a head was viciously decapitated. Perhaps it brings back fond memories of the
severities we inflicted upon our sisters' Barbie dolls as young children. With
the actors resembling Ken and Barbie so closely, it's a good chance this is
the case, whether we're fully aware of it or not.
STARSHIP TROOPERS has it's slow parts, but it's truly an alternative to your
typical sci-fi/action flick or lame juvenile comedy. Aside from the
intentionally cheesy gore, the special effects are quite astounding. When the
spaceship passes a meteor, it's quite an awesome spectacle, visually crisp and
captivating. If you're looking for brainless fun, this is the epitome of your
search. A beautiful cast, awesome special effects, fast-paced action, campy
acting, and a whole lot of gore. This is brainless heaven. Just remember not
to think.

Title
Review for Vegas Vacation (1997)
14 years ago, National Lampoon introduced us to a new family - The Griswolds.
In 1983, the Griswolds embarked on a cross-country journey with the
destination of Wally World, a world-renowned theme park in California. We
laughed our heads off as we shared the wild and crazy mishaps the family
endured. Two years later, we watched again as they went to Europe, and four
years after that, we shared Christmas with them. Now, eight more years have
passed, and the laughs have done more than die. They've been cremated.
VEGAS VACATION brings back Chevy Chase as Clark Griswold, the good intentioned
but ill-fated father of two. The premise is basically the same. Clark has a
wonderful idea to take his family on a bonding vacation, this time to Las
Vegas. His wife Ellen (Beverly D'Angelo) and teenage kids Rusty and Audrey
(always played by different actors - this time around, by Ethan Embry and
Marisol Nichols, respectively) join him and they soon find themselves in Sin
City where casinos will make the backdrop for ninety minutes of slapstick. Of
course a "Vacation" movie wouldn't be complete without good ole Eddie
(reprised by Randy Quaid), the misfit cousin, showing up at all the wrong
times.
There isn't too much of a plot here when it comes right down to it. It's
really just a skit movie. There are a couple of ways to define a skit movie,
which is not a real term as far as I know. The first would be a movie that
basically has one running gag for two hours, therefore coming off like a two
hour skit. The second would be a movie that seems comprised of about twenty
shorter skits, each lasting about five minutes. VEGAS VACATION comes off like
the first. A good example of the latter would be last year's BLACK SHEEP. The
problem with this format is that it becomes old fast, and it doesn't really
fit into a movie mold. In these cases, a "plot", which is generally very thin,
is used either as a shameless filler between scenes or to simply add
convenience to the gags (i.e. Have a good Vegas joke, make a Vegas movie).
Such is the case with this movie's mini-plots. Clark gets gambling fever and
begins spending all of the Griswold's money, Ellen is on the verge of an
affair with Wayne Newton (!), Rusty has a fake ID and is using it to his
gambling advantage, and Audrey is desperate for fun and winds up joining her
cousin Vickie (Shae D'Lyn) as an exotic dancer.
The simple fact is: this movie isn't funny. At first, I did find myself
chuckling heartily at a couple of little jokes, but when the movie got
rolling, my interest suddenly stopped. Chase plays Clark Griswold really well.
He made the character and he is the character. D'Angelo, to be quite honest,
never was too impressive as Ellen, and this movie doesn't show any signs of
redemption. As for the two new Griswold kids, the word "blah" comes to mind.
The "Vacation" series seems out to prove that anybody can play these two
characters, the simple reason being that there is nothing to them. They're so
generic, you'll expect the credits to read "Girl #1 as Audrey Griswold".
VEGAS VACATION differs from the first three in the series by more than just
laugh factor. Yes, it's true that VEGAS VACATION isn't even close to being
close to being as funny as the others, which were actually pretty fun in their
own doofy ways, but there are a couple of other things that set this one
negatively apart. First off, why did they leave off the National Lampoon's
heading on the title? I couldn't find any reasons why, but maybe the fact is
even National Lampoon didn't want to be associated with such a lame film.
That's saying a lot, especially when you look at what else the company has
proudly presented: LOADED WEAPON 1, PCU, etc. If they expected this to be
another hit, you would assume they'd be proud to tack on the notorious header,
but for reasons only we can guess at, like the movie sucking, they didn't.
There is another difference here that makes an obvious impact. The first three
films in the "Vacation" series were written by John Hughes, a talented writer
who is behind several popular films of the 80's including MR. MOM, SIXTEEN
CANDLES, THE BREAKFAST CLUB, WEIRD SCIENCE, PRETTY IN PINK, FERRIS BUELLER'S
DAY OFF, PLANES, TRAINS, AND AUTOMOBILES, and UNCLE BUCK. Wowzers! What a
résumé! Looking at the names, you'd think this guy wrote everything that now
stands as a movie icon for the 1980's. Well that's not all. This guy also
brought us 90's hits including the HOME ALONE series, the remake of 101
DALMATIANS, DENNIS THE MENACE, and the current FLUBBER. VEGAS VACATION,
however, didn't have John Hughes behind it, and the loss is very obvious.
This time around, the script is in the hands of Elisa Bell, whose only credits
thus far include four made-for-TV movies. VEGAS VACATION plays very much like
one, and it would actually work much better as a made-for-TV sequel. If this
sounds like a wild idea, it's not. REVENGE OF THE NERDS third and fourth
installments were both television movies, and they seemed like it. VEGAS
VACATION would fit in well on the FOX network as a 2:00 a.m. Sunday morning
movie, but as a silver screen major motion picture, it's quite out of place.
Stephen Kessler's jejune direction doesn't help things either. He only makes
the film even more TV-movie-ish. Each consecutive "Vacation" movie has
suffered a drop in directing power. We started the series off with Harold
Ramis, who also directed CADDYSHACK and GROUNDHOG DAY as well as co-writing
GHOSTBUSTERS. Not too bad. Then we had NATIONAL LAMPOON'S EUROPEAN VACATION
being directed by Amy Heckerling, who would go on to direct the hits LOOK
WHO'S TALKING and CLUELESS, as well as having already directed the infamous
FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH. Lastly we had NATIONAL LAMPOON'S CHRISTMAS
VACATION, directed by Jeremiah S. Chechik, who went on to direct the charming
BENNY & JOON. Kessler, so far, has one title under his belt, the short film
BIRCH STREET GYM, which received an Oscar nomination in 1992. Granted that
this was his first attempt at a feature length film, we can allow for some
amateurish quality, but instead we get a movie straight from the text book -
boring, bland, and deeply unoriginal.
If you loved the "Vacation" movies, and I know *some* of us did, there still
isn't anything here worth seeing. If you loved them, don't ruin your good
impressions of the series by indulging in this tragic example of cinema ala
carte. If you never did like the series, why the need to confirm why?

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
With more and more television shows having gay characters, and even the
infamous "Ellen" sitcom being centered on the life of a lesbian, the movie
industry too seems to be gaining more and more homosexual based plot lines.
THE BIRDCAGE was critically acclaimed, as was this years CHASING AMY. Then
along came IN & OUT, and all three of these films are on my top ten list for
the years in which they were released. It's also noticeable that this
"alternative lifestyle" becomes less and less taboo as the years go by, and it
seems that using comedy as a medium is proving a worthwhile effort. While it's
a very serious issue to many, it is the comedies that people are flocking to
see and that are gaining notoriety.
But the way we're using comedy to present homosexuality is also changing quite
dramatically. While the gay community was once very stereotyped and used to
laugh *at*, it is more and more becoming something we laugh *with*, and when a
movie like IN & OUT comes along, it is something that both heterosexuals and
homosexuals should be able to thoroughly enjoy. It doesn't poke fun at the
lifestyle, it simply uses it to all it's comedic capacity, just as love, sex,
marriage, birth, death, and anything else has been.
The idea for IN & OUT was born the day Tom Hanks won his Oscar for portraying
an AIDS-afflicted gay man in PHILADELPHIA. If you remember, during his
acceptance speech, Hanks gave a highly emotional tribute to the gay community,
and even sighted a former gay teacher of his as a major inspiration in his
life. It's a serious and touchy subject, but producer Scott Rudin viewed it as
the setting for a potentially hilarious comedy, and pitched it to screenwriter
Paul Rudnick. It's true that if this same film had been written by a
heterosexual, it may have been more controversial, but because it was written
by an openly gay writer, the prerogative was set.
Kevin Kline, who only seems to become more and more acclaimed, stars as Howard
Brackett, a high school English teacher in the small, picturesque town of
Greenleaf, Indiana. After a three-year engagement to fellow teacher Emily
Montgomery (Joan Cusack), a wedding date has been set, and the hubbub
surrounding it is almost as big as that surrounding another huge story -
Greenleaf High graduate Cameron Drake (Matt Dillon) is up for a Best Actor
Oscar. The small town eagerly awaits both events, and both seem quite
astronomical, but little does anyone know how much one will affect the other.
When Cameron Drake is announced the winner, the excitement is heightened as he
pays tribute to his high school English teacher, Mr. Brackett. Everyone is
cheering back in Greenleaf - that is until Cameron tacks on those three
calamitous words, "and he's gay." The town becomes silent as the entire
population joins in a simultaneous jaw drop. The thing is, nobody, including
Howard, can understand how Cameron came to that conclusion, and such wild and
unexpected news can only wreak havoc in such a conservative American haven
such as Greenleaf. Naturally the questions pour from Howard's fiancee, parents
(Debbie Reynolds & Wilford Brimley), students, and the high school's
principal, Tom Halliwell (Bob Newhart), and the evidence starts to become more
and more obvious: Howard is clean, neat, honest, sincere, a romantic, and
perhaps the most incriminating fact, he loves Barbara Streisand.
The frenzy isn't helped any when camera crews from every conceivable news
magazine and "Entertainment Tonight" wannabe show up at Greenleaf High the
very next morning. One particular reporter is Peter Malloy (Tom Selleck) of
"Inside Entertainment", who unlike the collage of other reporters, wants to
spend a whole week in the life of Howard Brackett, including coverage of his
wedding. The intrusion is all but welcome by Howard, who is going more and
more out of his mind with each passing minute. It seems that no matter where
he turns, a camera is being shoved in his face and questions regarding
homosexuality are being tossed to him like Frisbees.
The dominoes begin to tumble as Howard's closest friends begin acting
different and Principal Halliwell hints at a possible termination of
employment should Howard indeed be gay. It all sounds very devastating, and it
would be if it weren't presented with near-perfection by one of this year's
most delightful ensemble casts. Kline seems only to improve with age, and he
is downright perfect here. The great thing about this film is that every
single character has a moment to shine, and they use it wonderfully. Every
single actor turns in one of their best performances ever. Dillon has never
been so likeable, Cusack has never seemed so perfect for a role, and Brimley,
Reynolds, and Newhart all provide huge laughs when they're up to bat.
Rudnick's script is heavily laced with wit and humor, and you'll likely find
yourself laughing out loud for a solid ninety minutes. While IN & OUT doesn't
carry enough to give it four stars, it remains one of the best done films of
the year, all-around. The script is exuberant, the actors are absolutely top-
notch, and we're allowed just the perfect blend of heart-tugging so as not to
bog down the laughs. It remains a solid comedy throughout its entirety, yet
we're still allowed a sappily touching ending.
Despite it's subject matter, and one scene that comes almost too close for
comfort on explaining gay sex, this is a movie that everyone could, and
should, enjoy. Frank Oz, best known as a voice talent for Muppets, directs
this film quite delightfully, using all the potential Rudnick's script has to
offer, which turns out to be quite a bit. Check this one out. You'll have a
gay old time.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Given the opportunity, I would much rather be a musical genius than a math
prodigy. Luckily, I stand a much better chance of that than the other. But as
Matt Damon's character Will Hunting explains, it's something that some people
might "just get". Beethoven looked at a piano and just understood it, Will
explains, and while he can't play a tune to save himself, when it comes to
complex mathematical equations, he just gets it.
Will grew up an orphan on the poorer side of Boston, living a life of abusive
foster parents and insecurity. On the verge of his 21st birthday, the closest
he's come to prestige is working as a janitor for the world-renowned MIT. He's
hot-tempered, he's cocky, he's sarcastic, and he's fearful of even the
slightest depths of intimacy, but behind all the obvious signs of a troubled
kid, Will has abilities very few of us possess. Example? How about solving
math problems that even learned scholars took two years to figure out, and
doing it in just one night?
MIT Professor Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgĺrd, most notably from BREAKING THE
WAVES) has been leaving these challenges on a chalkboard outside his classroom
so pupils can test themselves. Everyday, it appears that a mystery person has
solved the seemingly mind-boggling equation, but nobody is admitting to it,
and everybody, especially Lambeau, wonders who it could be. But one night
after hours, Lambeau discovers a foul-mouthed janitor writing on the board,
and is astonished when he realizes this is the genius he's been looking for.
Will isn't too interested in talking to the professor, but when he gets
arrested for assaulting an officer, it is the professor who bails him out. The
judge agrees to release Will into Lambeau's custody on one condition - Will
must develop his abilities with the professor and regularly meet with a
psychologist. Particulary reluctant to cooperate with the latter request, Will
taunts each and every psychologist Lambeau finds for him, and before we know
it, it is the psychologists who refuse to work with the smart-mouthed
virtuoso.
As a last resort, Lambeau approaches an old friend named Sean McGuire (Robin
Williams), a psychologist whose lesser accomplishments in life has led to an
awkward relationship with the highly-lauded professor. After losing his wife
to a long-illness, Sean seems to need some therapy of his own, which, along
with a similar childhood, helps him connect deeper with Will than anyone has
yet. After an abrasive beginning, the two develop a strong, silent fondness
for each other, and it is the exchanges between them that make this film such
a masterpiece. Williams, who has spent the last five years or so giving
impassioned performances in such mediocre films as JACK and FATHERS' DAY,
returns to acting brilliance with a performance that screams Oscar nomination.
The man who has played Mork the alien, Popeye the sailor-man, Genie the genie,
and even Peter Pan has reconfirmed something he demonstrated in DEAD POETS
SOCIETY and AWAKENINGS . . . he's an even better dramatic actor than comedic,
and we can only pray he dominates more roles like this in the future.
Other key characters include Will's best friend Chuckie, played by CHASING
AMY's Ben Affleck. Affleck and Damon are life-long buddies in real life, and
the two also wrote this Oscar-potential script. Affleck's role is actually
quite small, but his performance is commendable and shows why he'll be a
rising star in the next few years. Minnie Driver plays Will's Harvard student
love-interest, Skylar, a British babe who falls almost immediately in love
with the cocky but brilliant beau. The romance is by far the biggest flaw of
the film. It's quite underdeveloped, needing either more focus or a complete
deletion from the story. There is one scene where Will's fear of intimacy
results in a bitter argument between the two young lovers. It's a wonderfully
acted scene, but as great as it was, it could've packed ten times the
emotional impact had the relationship been more fully developed.  The romance
is also important because it provides for some of the year's best dialogue as
Will and Sean discuss love. Sadly, the movie would have suffered without the
love-story, but it also would've been too long had they used it like it needed
to be used.
Damon proves very impressive here, not only as an actor but as a writer. In
truly one of the best performances of the year, Damon is less likely to be
noticed here than in the more publicized JOHN GRISHAM'S THE RAINMAKER, but
this is still the role to see him in. Like Affleck, Damon is on his way to
well-deserved stardom, and if he continues as a writer, over the next few
years, he could prove to be one of the better talents Hollywood has to offer.
Director Gus Van Sant Jr. does a fine job handling this project, but with a
wonderful script and a near-perfect cast, it seems unlikely that a lesser
movie could've been made, even by a more gauche director. Jean-Yves
Escoffier's understated cinematography is sophisticated and artistic, and
Danny Elfman provides some nice musical pieces to accompany it. Skarsgĺrd's
performance as Professor Lambeau also deserves applause.
Coming in at the end of the year, GOOD WILL HUNTING is likely to make quite an
appearance at the Oscars and, hopefully, on critics' top ten lists for the
year. It jumped way up to number three on mine, only being surpassed by the
obvious TITANIC and the aforementioned Affleck film, CHASING AMY. While this
film deserves four-stars, it is not without a few mild imperfections, but, not
to repeat myself, the chemistry between Damon and Williams is enough to give
this the highest grade it can get. I would highly recommend this film to
everyone, but beware - this film is quite liberal in its use of the most
notorious four-letter word known to Hollywood. If you still don't know what I
mean, think of Joe Pesci. If you *still* don't know what I mean, you're
innocence is amazing, and this film would probably knock you for a loop. For
those of you who do understand, if this is something you can handle, or at
least get past, it will be well worth your effort.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Leave it to Jack Nicholson to make one of the most repugnant, most
disgraceful, most politically incorrect characters of recent memory into one
of the most enjoyable, most likeable, and most captivating characters of the
year. I'm speaking of none other than Melvin Udall, Nicholson's latest
persona, in the James L. Brooks film AS GOOD AS IT GETS.
So what is it that makes Melvin so despicable? Well where do we begin? True,
we're not likely to see Nicholson in a John Hughes film or playing Mr. Rogers
in a big screen adaption of the children's show (or a mixture of the two!),
but Melvin is particularly vicious - even for Nicholson. Does he tear down
doors with an axe? No. Is he Satan? No. But the comments Melvin spouts off
were even able to derive synchronous moans of disbelief from a packed movie
theater, and, at times, laughs just as hearty.
An obsessive-compulsive romance novelist, Melvin resides in an apartment
building where he shares a mutual disdain for his fellow tenants, particulary
with neighboring gay artist, Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear). Simon's pet dog
Verdell is the center of the rivalry, and when Verdell attempts to mark his
territory one last time, Melvin winds up throwing the dog down a garbage
chute. The dog is safely recovered, but it's obvious who the culprit is, and
with dignity, and a fair amount of fear, Simon approaches Melvin about it. The
only thing accomplished is a two-minute rip into Simon's homosexual lifestyle
as Melvin delivers one of the first harsh politically-incorrect speeches of
the film.
It's hard to imagine Melvin feeling a need for anyone, even if it is in a
selfish manner. This is the case with Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt), a single
mother who also happens to be the only waitress Melvin can handle having serve
him (which is good because no other waitresses are willing to do it). On a
daily basis, at a regular time, Melvin finds himself at the restaurant Carol
works at, and if his usual table is occupied, you can expect a slew of insults
will be thrown at the "trespassers" until it's vacated. Through casual
eavesdropping, Melvin knows that Carol's son is critically ill, and while this
begins as an obstacle to their relationship, it will eventually result in a
closer bond between the two.
That's the gist of it. AS GOOD AS IT GETS is a rich blend of romantic-comedy
and character study. The cast here is impeccable, and nobody turns in a second
rate performance. Kinnear, who has never had reason to boast, is Oscar
territory here. When Simon is badly beaten in a botched robbery attempt, the
pain he endures is hard to watch, and Melvin's essentially uncontrollable lack
of sympathy can nearly bring tears to your eyes. In fact, Kinnear's character
might just rival the dog in terms of the hug-appeal. Also showing up is Cuba
Gooding Jr. who won an Oscar for his role in JERRY MAGUIRE. Here he plays
Simon's art dealer, and likely more, Frank Sachs. Gooding's role isn't as
prevalent as commercials would have you believe, but when he's onscreen, he's
highly commendable.
The real stars here are Helen Hunt and Jack Nicholson. Hunt has never been so
outstanding, and she seems perfect for this role. Naturally she can't outshine
Nicholson, but who can? Realizing she's playing second fiddle to such an icon
only makes her terrific performance all the more praiseworthy. Nicholson is
finally back in a role that balances on his incredible acting talents. Without
him, Melvin would not have been Melvin, and the movie very likely could be
less than mediocre. He carries that much weight. As many recent Oscar-caliber
performances as there's been, none scream it as loudly as Nicholson. Although
I hailed TITANIC as a leader for Oscar nominations, Nicholson *should* beat
out all others in the Best Actor category. I've said it before and I'll say it
again, nobody else, and I mean *nobody* else, could've done this role justice.
Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks put together one of the freshest scripts
Hollywood has seen in a while, particularly in a romantic-comedy. 1997 has
been particulary shallow in that market, with the best being FOOLS RUSH IN and
the under-appreciated PICTURE PERFECT. Although MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING is
getting all the hype (at least when discussing romantic-comedies), it is the
uniqueness of AS GOOD AS IT GETS that will (and should) win audiences over.
It's a sharp contrast to the usual "hip" sex comedies being pawned off as
romantic-comedies, and it doesn't star two mid-twenties models who fall
immediately in love and sleep with each other in the course of one evening.
Thankfully, AS GOOD AS IT GETS is something new in that department, and
sensible people will applaud the effort (successful effort mind you) of
creating a more genuine onscreen romance.
It's obviously going to be an overused sound-bite, but AS GOOD AS IT GETS
truly *is* as good as it gets. If you can read more than two reviews without
hearing that, I'll be amazed. And although I hate to fall victim to such an
obvious cliché, it's never been so accurate as in this case. AS GOOD AS IT
GETS' two-hour plus running time isn't likely to depreciate your movie going
experience. It's a particular comfort, when so many 80-minute movies can feel
way too long, to have a film like this come out - one that can keep your
attention, and help you escape reality, for a priceless two hours. So what's
the harm in going an extra eighteen minutes? If you're able to do it
successfully, as James L. Brooks so nicely has, then it's all the better.

Title
Review for Cats Don't Dance (1997)
It makes me sad that I can essentially expect a "kid" film to be bad. Even
sadder is the fact that Hollywood puts such low levels of effort into these.
And so it is with yet another family film, CATS DON'T DANCE, an animated
musical set in the 1930's.
CATS DON'T DANCE tells the story of Danny (voiced by Scott Bakula), a young
cat with the dream of becoming a star. From his little hometown in Indiana,
Danny sets out to Hollywood, determined that because he loves acting, singing,
and dancing, he should have no problem becoming a success within the first
week. It isn't long before Danny finds himself playing a small role in the new
Darla Dimple film. Darla (spoken voice by Ashley Peldon; singing by Lindsay
Rideway) is America's sweetheart, known for her excessive sweetness, yet
actually brutally cruel to all those she works with. Like an anti-Shirley
Temple, Darla finds a particular bone to pick with Danny, whose enthusiasm is
a bit much for the production.
After a negative first day on the set, Danny can feel his naive hopes being
crushed under the weight of reality. But on the set, Danny also makes a couple
of friends: Tillie Hippo (Kathy Najimy), T.W. (Don Knotts), a depressed turtle
with bad luck and the fortune cookie fortunes to prove it, and most
importantly, Sawyer (spoken by Jasmine Guy; sung by Natalie Cole), an
attractive female cat. It is these animals who must bond together to face
Hollywood, a world that doesn't care enough about its non-human actors.
Determined to show the humans what they're made of, the group then decides to
make a film of their own, all the while Darla growing more and more enraged at
their existance.
The problem is, CATS DON'T DANCE was so hectic, I actually had a hard time
telling what was going on, or even what the characters were saying half the
time. This movie had the ability to distract from itself by being so overly
busy, which, if you can't tell, is a very bad sign. Not only the animation
quality (which was very two-dimensional and boring), but the comedic devices
and storyline played more like a Saturday morning episode of "Loony Toons"
than an elaborate Disney production. Don't get me wrong - I'm not requiring
that all animated films be on the same level as BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, but
films like CATS DON'T DANCE don't deserve a run in theaters. In fact, even the
direct to video market seems a bit higher quality than this.
Being a musical, CATS DON'T DANCE sure lets us down in the song department as
well. There are no catchy tunes that you'll find yourself humming after the
movie, and there are no songs that even attempt to turn this film into a
magical experience. Most of the songs are so uneffective, you might find
yourself using them as an excuse for a bathroom break!
The voice talents here aren't so bad, but they don't have a good enough script
to hang on. Knotts' T.W. Turtle is the most fun, but he isn't used nearly
enough. Positive note should be given to Matthew Harried as Pudge, the cute,
chubby little penguin who winds up being the most enamoring aspect of the
film. But even as cute as Pudge is, he's nothing that makes this film worth
seeing.
CATS DON'T DANCE is worthy of two stars because older little kids will
probably find enough to be entertained, and at least the premise is somewhat
original. There is also a fun part at the end where we get a slideshow of
famous movie posters, altered to fit the animal stars (example: FREE TILLY
with the hippo replacing the whale). But as incredibly dull as the rest of the
film was, I can't really say it's a worthwhile effort. As overplayed as they
are by now, you'll probably be better off pulling an old Disney video off the
shelf again - at least you know you'll have something to whistle afterward.

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
Disaster films have a tendency to be very formulated and very cliched. To see
a disaster film with actual originality, or at least a decent plot twist,
would definitely be a welcome surprise. Unfortunately, folks, it's not
likely.
DANTE'S PEAK is cliched,  and at times corny, but also pretty decent. To be
honest, I wasn't very interested in seeing this film, and word of mouth, as
well as several reviews, didn't make it sound promising. So I was pleasantly
surprised that to find that this movie wasn't bad at all. It's pretty run of
the mill, but it's not something I would say is merely "ok" to watch.
In case you don't know, DANTE'S PEAK is about a volcano and the city which
lives in it's shadow, Dante's Peak (who would've guessed, eh?). Pierce
Brosnan plays the volcanologist sent to study the volcano and, perhaps more
by hunch than actual scientific proof, is determined that the volcano will be
arupting in the very near future. Due to the lack of more substantial
evidence, nobody warns the small town, and when they finally do, it's in the
middle of the town meeting that the volcano finally blows.
Brosnan, all around good guy, will, of course, save the day . . . or at least
the mayor of Dante's Peak (Linda Hamilton). Naturally the two will become
infatuated with one another. (If you think I just ruined a plot development,
you haven't seen very many movies!) There's also the virtually neccessary
kids and pet dog to tug at your heart strings. And of course, the kids or the
dog (at least one or the other) will do something heroic . . . but hey, I
don't want to ruin all the surprises!
If there was a part of you that was hesitating seeing DANTE'S PEAK merely
because it was rumored to be a waste of time, I urge you to watch it and
decide for yourself. It's not brain food, but it succeeds at what it's meant
to be . . . an enjoyable, suspenseful movie about the fury Mother Nature can
unleash!

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
Tell me if this doesn't sound wonderful to you: You're a billionaire and
despite your age, you have a young, gorgeous model for your wife. When it
comes time for a photo shoot, you accompany your lovely bride, on your own
private plane mind you, to a beautiful, forest clad region complete with a
lake, snow capped mountains, and a cozy little cabin to sleep in.
Paradisiacal, eh? Oh, I just forgot to mention one thing . . . during an
excursion, your plane goes down and you're stuck fighting for your life in the
middle of the woods. Ok, not so great after all.
This is the plot for THE EDGE, an adventure/thriller written by David Mamet
and directed by Lee Tamahori. The billionaire is Charles Morse, played like a
perfect blend of Daddy Warbucks, MacGyver, and Grizzly Adams. The beautiful
wife is Mickey, played by Elle MacPherson in an essentially non-existent role.
In fact, the real purpose behind the character of Mickey is to allow for a
conflict between Morse and Robert Green (Alec Baldwin), Mickey's photographer
who just happens to go down along with Charles and the plane. Just before the
plane flies into a flock of migrating birds and crashes into the water below,
Charles confronts "Bob" about his true feelings for Mickey. In fact, the
aerial collision is cued with Charles asking Bob, "How do you plan to kill
me?"
The pilot dies and Charles, Bob, and Bob's assistant Stephen (Harold Perrineau
Jr.) are left to fend for themselves in a cold, aboriginal climate. Through
all this, Charles manages to keep his calm, which is more of an aggravation
than a comfort to Bob and Stephen. Nonetheless, they trust in Charles'
seemingly omnipotent understanding of life, nature, and the outdoors and
follow him thru the maze of trees in an attempt to rescue themselves (all the
while continuously confronting an overly persistent bear).
Reading a summary of THE EDGE would surely make one want to see the film. It
*sounds* rich, intriguing, exciting, and suspenseful. But with shotty
direction and dialogue that trudges along like dead weight, you're
expectations will quickly be dashed. In fact, if you have any sense, you might
just walk out of the theater within the first twenty minutes of the show -
it's that bad. Thankfully, if you do stick it out, it manages to pick up into
a semi-mediocre film after about thirty or so anaesthetic minutes.
The actors can't quite be blamed here. Although the characters are pretty
deadpan (special notice going to the trite, uneven Bob Green role), the
director seems more at fault. Tamahori doesn't seem to know where to take this
and winds up with only sporadic moments of intensity. Keep in mind, however,
that the musical score by Jerry Goldsmith wants you to feel that adrenaline
kick over the slightest things. It gets very tiring.
The only saving grace THE EDGE has to offer are some spectacular shots of
Canada, where it was filmed. There are some fabulous, breathtaking views of
Mother Nature's handiwork, but sadly it doesn't make this film worth sitting
through. If you still feel determined to see this one, please try to catch it
on the big screen before it's "reformatted" to fit the little one. If you
don't have the beautiful landscapes to appreciate in this movie, you'll have
nothing at all.

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream, A (1935)
Reviewing a movie that came out in the 30's can be a difficult task. First
off, to fairly view the film, one must attempt to transport themselves back
in time. If you critique the film using today's standards, most films would
get zero stars. Technology has come a very long way in the past sixty years,
and even acting and writing styles have changed. Keeping that in mind, I
tried to the best of my ability to watch A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM
objectionably, forgetting for two hours that when it was released, my
GRANDparents hadn't even married yet.
MIDSUMMER is, of course, based on the William Shakespeare play by the same
name. It's just one of about 17 or so versions of the play that have been
done for movie or TV. This version stars, most notably, James Cagney as
Bottom, the actor who winds up with a donkey head, and a young Mickey Rooney,
playing the mischievous sprite Puck. It's a love story, granted a bizarre and
comedic love story, focusing on four characters: Lysander (Dick Powell),
 Demetrius (Ross Alexander), Hermia (Olivia De Havilland), and Helena (Jean
Muir). Lysander and Hermia are in love, but Demetrius also loves the
beautiful Hermia. This is heartbreaking to sweet, unloved Helena, who has
loved Demetrius for quite some time without the returning of such feelings.
Off in the forest dwells the fairies. Oberon (Victor Jory), king of the
fairies, instructs his servant Puck to make Demetrius fall in love with
Helena so that all may be well. In a case of mistaken identity, Puck actually
has Lysander falling in love with Helena. Eventually he gets Demetrius to
fall in love with Helena too! So here we have four characters. The men are
fighting over a woman still, just a different one. Helena, who's never been
the object of a man's fancy, believes that it must all be a cruel joke at her
expense. And lovely Hermia simply doesn't know what the hell is going on.
(Not Shakespeare's words, but mine).
Another little story is going on during all this. Puck loves to cause
trouble. In something no more than a "prank", Puck turns Nick Bottom's head
into that of a donkeys. Bottom is part of an acting group that are going to
put on a play for the marriage of Theseus (Ian Hunter) and Hippolyta (Verree
Teasdale). Then Oberon has Puck putt a spell on Titania (Anita Louise), the
queen of the fairies, to have her fall in love with Bottom so he can still
the Indian baby she has stolen. Confusing enough? Well, it was for me too,
and I'm not completely sure if I even have all of this right, but when you're
watching the film, it flows well enough that you don't have to get too
concerned.
A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM is actually quite good, and, not that I really
know, but the effects seemed pretty good for coming from the 1930's. It is
difficult a lot of times to tell what the people are saying, and it's very
confusing at first, but when you get into it, it's fun. The last half an hour
or so got kind of slow and boring, but the middle of the film makes it
worthwhile. James Cagney is great, and Dick Powell is quite fun in a sappy
way. The most annoying thing here by far is Mickey Rooney. It's hard not to
cringe every time he squeals or shrivels up his face. He's almost unbearable
to watch and is definitely the biggest complaint about the film.
Over sixty years old, this film might be hard to come by. I don't really know
how popular a version this is. Just to make note, this film was nominated for
the Best Picture Oscar in 1936, but didn't win. It did pick up two other
Oscars - for film editing and cinematography. This is a recommendable film,
but if you're really one for modern technology you'll probably find it
unbearable. Especially Mickey Rooney!!!

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
Let's get one thing straight . . . BOOGIE NIGHTS is *not* a sensationalistic
peak at the world of pornography, nor does it try to glamorize the porn star
image. In fact, it does quite the opposite, showing us how dreamy-eyed
youngsters can end up on a lonely, dark, dead-end street. We begin in 1977
with Eddie Adams (Mark Whalberg), a 17-year-old nightclub busboy who dreams of
making a name for himself. With not a lot going for him, aside from a 13-inch
reproductive organ (hey, who'd complain?), Eddie is quickly befriended by Jack
Horner (Burt Reynolds), a charming porn director who has taken notice of
Eddie's "abundance". It seems Jack sees real potential in Eddie's
"excessiveness", and plans to turn Eddie into the next big *adult* movie star.
Eddie is easily seduced into the adult film-making industry with a lot of help
coming from Amber Waves (Julianne Moore), Jack's main starlet. Amber and
Eddie's lives seem to parallel each other's, even if in a mirror-image way.
Eddie's home-life was anything but desirable. His mother was distant, cold,
harsh, and totally unsupportive. Amber, on the other hand,  has a son whom she
never sees due to her debauched lifestyle. The two, whether consciously or
sub-consciously, use each other to fill these vacant roles.
Taking up residence in Jack's home, where Amber and a few others also live, we
meet a bevy of characters: "Rollergirl" (Heather Graham), a high-school
dropout who has turned to the porn industry as a means to "success", Reed
Rothchild (John C. Reilly), who becomes Eddie's best friend, Little Bill
(William H. Macy, most notably from FARGO), a behind-the-scenes man whose wife
can't stop sleeping around, and Buck Swope (Don Cheadle), a porn star with a
heart, whose only dream is to marry, have kids, and own his own stereo
equipment store.
The first half of the movie shows the non-stop party lifestyle that soon
envelopes young Eddie as he rises to pornographic fame. He has indeed made a
name for himself - and the name is Dirk Diggler. Under the name Dirk Diggler,
Eddie stars in a series of Jack Horner directed films while Horner tries
endlessly to create the ultimate "artistic" adult flick. When the 1980's
arrive, however, things take a drastic turn for the worse as we watch each and
every character fall into a downward spiral of drugs, lost hope, and jealousy.
Many people have complained about the sudden dark turn that BOOGIE NIGHTS
takes upon itself. I didn't find it as annoying or jarring as most people
seemed to, and I thought it flowed quite smoothly. I'm a sucker for character
studies, and BOOGIE NIGHTS is a captivating one. The acting, by absolutely
everyone, is phenomenal! Who would have thought that Mark Whalberg, who we
first came to know as rapping Marky Mark and by his Calvin Klein underwear
ads, could be such a fantastic actor? I've said it before about other movies,
but when a movie can use the words "um" and "like" in the dialogue without
ever sounding staged, you know it's good acting!
Burt Reynolds is terrific, Julianne Moore is impeccable, and Graham, Reilly,
Macy, and Cheadle all turn in such fine performances that it would be
difficult knowing where to start the Oscar nominations. Writer/director Paul
Thomas Anderson handles this film with ease and substance, never once wavering
into mediocre film-making. As we watch the characters' declining lifestyles,
Anderson allows us to peak into each - a deep, heart-felt peak that makes you
genuinely feel for each and every character.
BOOGIE NIGHTS is a prime example of excellent film-making. We laugh, and then
we want to cry. We are smiling one moment, and the next, we are sadly
contemplating life. One thing that character studies seem to enable us to do
is simultaneously be intrigued, entertained, and inwardly philosophical, and
BOOGIE NIGHTS stimulates all three senses quite well. Lavish and exquisite,
BOOGIE NIGHTS is one to be seen . . . and don't let the subject matter
frighten you away!

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
TITANIC is one of the most infamous movies of our time, hugely glorified long
before it even hit theaters. When the budget hit $200 million, TITANIC created
a buzz that would put an entire beehive to shame. Two questions stuck out in
people's minds. One: Will it ever make back the money spent on creating it?
And two: Is it as good as it is expensive? At least now the latter question
can be answered . . . with a resounding "YES!"
In the year 1912, one of the largest ships ever to set sail, left port in
Ireland en route to New York, carrying over 2200 passengers. This ship, named
Titanic, was the most luxurious and supposedly unsinkable vessel ever to hit
the seas. As history would go on to prove, this would merely remain a dream
and a hope in the eyes of those who designed and constructed the Royal Mailing
Steamer, as only 705 of all the passengers and crew who boarded the Titanic
would survive.
James Cameron tells this tale using a pair of destined lovers who come from
two completely diametric social backgrounds. Rose DeWitt Bukater (Kate
Winslet) is engaged to marry the overly well-to-do Cal Hockley (Billy Zane),
more to her mother Ruth's (Frances Fisher) accolade than her own. Rose seems
stuck in this pompous, overly eloquent lifestyle, and unlike her snobbish
peers, despises it rather than lavishes in it. On the other hand (and quite a
few decks below) is artist Jack Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio), a nobody in the
eyes of society who lives a carefree vagabond lifestyle, taking each day as
its own, unchartered and clean to be preserved and cherished to its fullest.
One night, after closely examining her life, past, present, and future, Rose
finds herself hanging over the railing of the ship, ready to plunge into the
sea. She will put an end to the inevitable - a life of drab, superficial
socializing and false happiness fueled by greed. At this point, Jack comes out
of the shadows and talks her back onto the deck, saving her life with his
charming personality. Instead of being grateful, her fiance and mother are
repulsed by the disreputable savior. Their condescending view of the third
class results in loquacious bashing of Jack, who merely won his way on board
Titanic through a lucky hand of poker.
Despite unremitting threats from those of her own "class", Rose finds herself
charmed by Jack's lightheartedness, whether she wants to be or not, and the
two visit often, all the while falling deeper in love. The sharp parallel in
the classes is excellently presented as we watch Rose and Jack try to carry on
a building love affair of which no one approves. What's funny is how easily we
forget the imminent fate the Titanic will face. We become so engrossed in the
forbidden romance that we forget their love may very well be doomed to failure
regardless of social politics.
The two hours that transpire before Titanic hits a doom-sealing iceberg is in-
and-of itself a marvelous love story. Of all the love stories I've ever seen,
never has one rang out with such conviction. If you don't believe Rose and
Jack are soulmates by the end of this film, you don't have a heart. *True*
love has never been so wonderfully presented - so eloquently, so convincingly,
and so passionately - as it is between these two. This is by far the best
onscreen romance - and maybe offscreen - I've ever known. In fact, in a
beautifully presented moment, Jack draws Rose's nude portrait. It is one of
the most sensual, erotic, and yet heartfelt scenes I've ever seen.
TITANIC can't be acclaimed enough, and surely this is one to be seen and
revered on the big screen. The way Winslet and DiCaprio's eyes gaze upon one
another is so compelling of *true* love that you can't fathom it isn't real.
Best acting nominations? Definitely should be. I can't remember such
emotionally charged visuals as the ones this film embodies. Should Russell
Carpenter receive a Best Cinematography nomination? Hell yes. Some of the
sweeping shots of the Titanic being pulled down into a watery grave brought
tears to my eyes! If TITANIC doesn't receive Academy Award nominations in
*every* applicable category, I'm boycotting the Oscars! I'm talking
screenplay, acting, supporting acting, visual effects, sound effects, art
direction, James Cameron for Best Director, and of course, Best Picture. It
deserves to sweep each and every one of these!
I had a hard time writing this review because all my words are so futile when
trying to describe one of the best done films of all time. James Cameron
should be patting himself on the back until death does he part. Never have I
seen such a *complete* work of cinema art, and if this one doesn't go down in
history, then the Titanic itself shouldn't have either. Even though it runs
over three hours long, there isn't *one frame* of film that should have been
cut. Would you take *one* brush stroke out of the Sistine Chapel? Didn't think
so - and the three hours pass so quickly you won't have time to complain.
Now that I've had the chance to at least *try* and express what a masterpiece
TITANIC is, forget everything I said and go see this movie for yourself. It's
truly a masterpiece in all senses of the word. It will be quite a while before
another movie comes along that can eclipse this one. James Cameron has peaked
with TITANIC, and this will be the one he is remembered for. The 1990's have
peaked with this epic motion picture. In fact, this very easily could be the
peak of 20th century cinema. What a way to top of the century that made movies
a mainstream method of art and entertainment - three cheers and four stars for
TITANIC.

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
Unlike most movie reviews, I don't like to bog mine down with a
summarization of the plot. Usually when someone reads a movie review,
they have a general idea what the movie is about. Otherwise, they
would probably skip by it. So if you're looking for summaries, I'm
not the person to go to. My reviews are nothing spectacular, just
simple, to-the-point opinions. With that out of the way, let's begin.
I was actually quite amazed at Keanu Reeves sudden signs of life
in this movie.  It was the first time I was actually Reeves might
actually have a pulse. To say "This is Reeves at his best!" sure
doesn't mean a lot, but it is true.  But it is quite obvious that
when Al Pacino is in a movie, nobody's going to outshine him. And
Pacino was devilishly good in this one. An Oscar nomination? If
the Academy has any senses, there should be. The superbly delivered
speech by Pacino at the end of the film is absolutely captivating!
Truly one of the best dialogues of the year!
The visuals of the movie were unique, intriguing, and rich! I didn't
want to blink. This film's climax was superb in all departments:
acting, directing, and writing.
The very, VERY end of the film was a little disappointing and hokey.
They wrapped this movie up with all the garnishings, with a pretty
little bow on top. I almost have to wonder if they should've just
left out the whole ending, which I won't give away, but it seemed
off from the rest of the film, and therefore slighty jarring.
Overall, I was extremely pleased with the movie, and I would definitely
recommend it!!!

Title
Review for Chairman of the Board (1998)
What are the warning signs of a *terrible* movie? Making it's debut at the
dollar theater? Locally, CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD did just that. Having the
annoying prop comic Scott Thompson (better known as Carrot Top) in the lead
role? CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD, once again. How about an overly exhausted, paper
thin plot approached with utter incompetence? Did somebody say CHAIRMAN OF THE
BOARD?
That's right, Carrot Top's long dreaded major motion picture debut (at least
for a starring role) is poking up in a handful of theaters across the country.
CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD stars the obnoxious, wannabe-zany king of redheaded
standup comics as a lazy but creative, inventive but uneventful Generation X-
er named Edison. Living with a pair of surfer dudes in a small, rented house,
Edison bounces from job to job, always squandering away the money on his
eccentric (to say the least) inventions and ignoring crucial responsibilities
such as rent. This has the crabby landlady, Ms. Krubavitch (Estelle Harris,
best known as George Constanza's mother on "Seinfeld"), threatening an
eviction if past due expenses aren't furnished post haste. As luck would have
it, Edison soon meets Armand McMillan (Jack Warden), an old surfer dude who
just so happens to be president of the multi-million dollar McMillan
Industries. Sharing a passion for more than just riding waves, Armand is
deeply impacted by the young inventor's notebook of dreams and ideas, and when
the old man dies soon afterward, Edison learns he is named a benefactor in
Armand's will.
Predictably, Edison acquires the entire corporation and has to maintain
productivity with absolutely no knowledge of the business world. Predictably,
there is a bitter nephew (Larry Miller) whose lesser inheritance fuels
resentment that will lead to an elaborate sabotage plot. Predictably, there is
an attractive employee (Courtney Thorne-Smith) whose initial repulsion will
transform into love for our doofy protagonist. Predictably, the man who knows
nothing will fight against the odds and give the company it's most profitable
and successful turnaround ever, all because he ran things by common sense and
not greed. It's as though writers Turi Meyer, Al Septien, and Alex Zamm (Meyer
and Septien also wrote LEPRECHAUN 2 together!) pulled a plot out of a hat and
worked Carrot Top into it. The jokes, the "surprises", the developments - all
of them run such a predictable path, it may only be Carrot Top's signature
brazen red hairdo that sets this one apart from the myriad of similar films.
A movie this bad speaks for itself. What's left to say when every element the
movie possesses is a shameful retread of movies past? The script is 100%
recycled, the direction is hokey, and the acting is absolutely horrible. It is
only Thorne-Smith who seems to take her job seriously, an accomplishment which
surely deserves the medal of honor. She certainly went beyond the call of duty
- she has to kiss Carrot Top!!!!!! (Barf bag, please!) Movies like this give
the audience nothing to do but ponder just how many synonyms for "bad" there
really are. CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD, without a doubt, deserves each and every
one. The only way this won't end up on everybody's "bottom ten of the year"
list, is if they were lucky enough never to have seen it. Just because you
can't miss his outlandish fiery mane, don't skimp on avoiding this abhorrent
feature.

Title
Review for Airplane! (1980)
Directed by Jim Abrahams, David Zucker, and Jerry Zucker
Running Time: 88 minutes
Originally Released: 1980
AIRPLANE! is considered among many to be the epitome of satire film-making.
After all, it's brought to us by one of the best known satire
writing/directing teams. Even if most people don't recognize the names behind
the films, they are bound to recognize the titles: AIRPLANE!, TOP SECRET, THE
NAKED GUN, and HOT SHOTS to name a few. But although the
Zucker/Abrahams/Zucker team was first introduced with THE KENTUCKY FRIED
MOVIE in 1977, AIRPLANE! remains the true cornerstone of their work, and
their directorial debuts.
In the seventies, disaster films seemed to be at an all time high. Films like
EARTHQUAKE, THE TOWERING INFERNO, and THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE were big hits.
There was also a series about the disasters that can arise when traveling by
plane - a series that spanned the entire decade. And so, in 1980, we were
introduced to a new airplane disaster film. This time the disaster had
nothing to do with a maniacal hijacker or crashing into the ocean . . . it
had to do with bad fish.
AIRPLANE! is the story of Ted Striker (Robert Hays) - an ex-fighter-pilot who
has never gotten over the fact that a decision he had to make in the midst of
war led to the death of six, er, seven comrades. Unable to stop living in the
past, Ted's world fell apart. He spent his time moving from city to city
without ever having a stable job, and eventually, as we begin this film, is
getting dumped by his lover, flight attendant Elaine Dickinson (Julie
Hagerty).
In a desperate attempt not to lose her, Ted buys a ticket for the same flight
Elaine is working. Unfortunately, she is unsympathetic and even criticizes
Ted for following her, which leaves him wallowing in self-pity. In the midst
of it all, something happens. Someone gets sick. Then another. Then another.
Soon, the whole plane is full of deathly-ill Chicago-bound people . . . and
when the pilots get sick (played by Peter Graves, Kareem Abdul-Jabbar, and
Frank Ashmore), who will save the day? (Gee, I wonder)
Of course the main draw here is the non-stop "whiz-bang" comedy, with a hefty
dose of both visual and spoken gags. Although I had seen this movie a few
times before, I was still laughing thru the entire thing. The most fun
character by far is the doctor, played by Leslie Nielsen. He's a dry, subtle,
sterotypically straight-faced doctor that ends up saying some of the funniest
lines of the film.
In a film like this, you're not really expecting an elaborate production, so
one can't complain about the amateurish quality. What you can complain about
is the absolutely annoying Johnny, played by Stephen Stucker. This character
is pointless, nauseating, and very unfunny. I don't know why he was put in
there, and I don't think anybody will find a good excuse. And when the film
nears an end, it slows down quite a bit, almost getting old. You gotta give
it to a movie that only runs 88 minutes and can feel two hours long. Aside
from that, AIRPLANE! is really a top-notch spoof that will likely forever be
known as a spoof classic. It would be a good choice to pop in the VCR with a
group of friends, especially if they haven't seen it. And if they ask what
the plot is, just tell 'em "It's a synopsis of the basic storyline of the
film, but that's not important right now." If you've seen the film, you'll
understand ;-)

Title
Review for Mrs. Winterbourne (1996)
I recall MRS. WINTERBOURNE being compared to WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING, though
nowhere near as charming. That's the basics of the reviews I remember reading
anyway. This is very true I suppose, but I don't know that I would have
actually thought of the comparison without hearing it first.
The first half an hour or so of MRS. WINTERBOURNE is nauseating. Bad
directing and even worse acting are what we experience. Canned dialogue that
comes off sounding like the first rehearsal of a junior high play will make
you want to stop the tape (since it's out of theaters a long time now) right
then and there. But if you hold out, the film does actually manage to
improve. That doesn't mean a whole lot, but if you can really REALLY get past
how sappy and cheezy this movie is, then you might actually find it somewhat c
ute.
Ricki Lake stars as Connie Doyle, a young girl who moves out to New York on
her eighteenth birthday. With nowhere to go and nowhere to stay, she is
quickly and easily befriended by Steve DeCunzo (played by Loren Dean, who is
much better in this year's GATTACA), a con-men of women's hearts. Claiming to
be a producer, he quickly wins her heart and lets her into his apartment. The
relationship dissipates, and when Connie announces she's pregnant, Steve
decides he wants no part of it and kicks her out onto the street.
Roaming the streets penniless, Connie ends up at the train station where she
accidently winds up on a train to who knows where. Panic strikes when tickets
are being collected and Connie naturally doesn't have one. She is saved by
the carefree, playful Hugh Winterbourne (Bredan Fraser), who roleplays as her
husband. Hugh takes Connie back to his bunker (?) and introduces her to his
real wife, Patricia, who is also pregnant and the same amount along.
When Patricia notices Connie's longing admiration of her wedding ring, she
insists that Connie try it on. Cue train wreck. Next thing we know, Connie is
coming to conciousness in a New England hospital as the memory of the train
wreck hits her. But her attention soon focuses on the fact that she's no
longer pregnant. In a panic, she calls for the nurse and "her" baby is
brought to her, safe and sound. One problem - the name tag reads "Baby Boy
Winterbourne". Sure enough, Patricia's wedding ring is still on her finger
and she has been confused as Patricia, who was killed, along with Hugh, in
the crash.
As luck would have it, Hugh's family never did meet Patricia, and this makes
it easy when, to Connie's nervous dismay, she is taken into the Winterbourne
home. There Connie finds a loving acceptance like she never knew and finds it
harder and harder to divulge her true identity, especially when she starts
falling for Hugh's twin brother Bill.
It's a good thing that when someone dies in the movies, they don't have to
worry about blood tests or fingerprints or whatever you normally think might
be looked at to determine who it is that's dead and buried in a train wreck.
Why, a simple ring engraved with someone else's name will allow you to keep
on living as that person!
Shirley McLaine is sadly waisted in this film as Grace Winterbourne, Hugh and
Bill's mother. She is the only one who gives a solid, straight thru
perfomance. Miguel Sandoval is a delight as the Winterbourne servant Paco.
There is enough in this film to make it watchable, but it's a real shame it
didn't do more with itself.
For all intents and purposes, my 21 year old sister LOVED the movie. Of
course she's not one to care about the acting or directing as much, and I
suppose that makes her a little bit more like the typical movie-goer.
However, this film still sucks when looked at as an attempt at motion picture
art,  but has just enough sugar coated charm to garner two stars out of me.

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
SCREAM 2 has a titillating little scene that lays down the unwritten law of
horror movie sequels quite well. During a film-class discussion, Windsor
College students articulate what these inevitable laws are, and why sequels
never live up to the originals. A few rare exceptions are noted, but they left
out one . . . SCREAM 2!
1996's surprise horror blockbuster SCREAM became an instant hit and developed
an obsessive coterie of fans which included almost every teenager in America!
A sequel was unavoidable, but luckily the re-teaming of writer Kevin
Williamson and director Wes Craven gives us nothing to fear in the way of lost
entertainment. In fact, at the risk of sounding sacrilegious to all the
adorning fans of SCREAM, I would say that SCREAM 2 might even be the better
film!
Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell), the sinuous heroine who survived a series of
murders in Woodsboro, CA in the original SCREAM, is now two years older and
off to college, majoring in theater. Meanwhile, TV journalist Gale Weathers
(Courtney Cox), who covered the murders in the first film, has since written a
book about the dreadful events; a book titled "Stab", which has been developed
into a major motion picture. As SCREAM 2 opens, a crowd of overzealous
teenagers are piling into a crowded movie theater for the premiere of "Stab",
and before long, a young couple are butchered to death, unnoticed in the midst
of hysteria. This marks the beginning of a new murder spree as an unknown
"copycat" sets out to repeat what's been done . . . and finish what hasn't!
Of course the killer is just as obsessed with movies as the killer in the
first film, and yes, movies play a huge role in the bizarre psychological
outlook the murderer holds as he/she goes about slaying an assortment of
gorgeous twenty year olds, but this *is* a sequel, and without deviating from
the original groundwork we are still given a fresh outlook on horror movies.
This is in large part due to Williamson's deliciously written script, which
will easily leave you satisfied. As much as the film condemns the use of
cliches, it is riddled with them, but it is done so effectively, and with
skillful direction by Craven, that you're not bound to complain. I will note,
however, that the "whodunit?" did wind up being the first person I suspected,
but believe me, I kept changing my mind as I tried to stay one ahead of the
movie.
All the actors outdo themselves here. We're not talking Oscar performances,
but Cambell, Cox, David Arquette as Dewey Riley, and Jamie Kennedy as Randy
all give surprisingly satisfying performances that go beyond their last
outing. The characters remain true to their roots, and yet show a clear sign
of development over the last two years. We can see how the events in the first
film has affected them, but we don't lose any of the luster that made them
such a delight to watch in the first place.
The nice thing about SCREAM 2 is that it doesn't seem off-kilter from it's
predecessor. It's a natural, smooth, and believable (as far as horror films
go) transition from film to film. We skip two years, but there doesn't seem to
be any holes or shortcuts taken in connecting the two flicks. It flows so well
that you feel more like you're reading chapter two of a book (long chapters,
eh?) than just revitalizing a cast of familiar faces. While main characters
are usually the only connection in sequels, SCREAM 2's entire plot structure
correlates *completely* with the first, making for immediate fondness and
absorption.
As I said before, SCREAM 2 easily lives up to, if not surpassing, it's
precursor. The only reason SCREAM will likely be hailed above SCREAM 2 is
because it was the first. This doesn't mean that it overcasts the unique,
whimsical humor or overall caliber of it's sequel, it just means that SCREAM
will forever be known as the movie that mocked it's own while maintaining it's
sought-after qualities. If ever a film followed it's original so well, it
would be SCREAM 2, and it makes this a definite must-see for all those
unbridled SCREAM fans out there.
SCREAM 2 fits snugly alongside SCREAM, and will hopefully receive as many high
remarks. It would top off the series quite well, if it weren't for the fact
that two movies don't really make a series. It's unlikely to assume that a
SCREAM 3 won't appear in the next few years, but if they do decide to turn
this into an undeniably acclaimed horror-trilogy, let's hope they can keep up
the fantastic work. Like they say, don't mess with perfection . . . but when a
money-making smash-hit is almost guaranteed, who's gonna listen?

Title
Review for MatchMaker, The (1997)
People are suckers for foreign accents. It doesn't matter what someone is
saying, as long as they have that accent, people will listen until the cows
come home. For that reason alone, THE MATCHMAKER captivates us, but were it
just another small town middle America flick, the small but bewitching amount
of magic this film possesses would be completely lost.
Janeane Garofalo takes on her usual cynical persona, this time as Marcy
Tizard, campaign aide for dim-witted senator, John McGlory (Jay O. Sanders).
It's re-election time and McGlory is behind, so in an attempt to garner some
votes out of good human interest, McGlory sends Marcy to Ireland to track down
some McGlory ancestry. Absolutely anything but delighted, Marcy travels
overseas to the remote Irish town of Ballinagra. It just so happens that Marcy
is arriving smack dab in the middle of the annual Matchmaker Festival, where
the local cupid, an older gentlemen by the name of Dermot (Milo O'Shea), uses
his knack for diagnosing compatibility to put together the singles of the
town.
The festival becomes a distraction for Marcy, who's already having a hard
enough time with the transition from Boston to a town functioning on
simplicity. Her aggravation is only enhanced by her slightly-larger-than-a-
closet hotel room and the annoying Sean (David O'Hara), a writer who resides a
few rooms down the hall, helps himself to Marcy's bathtub, and owns a luggage
desecrating dog. Despite the inaugural friction, Dermot sees real potential
between Marcy and Sean and begins a plot to put them together, especially when
motivated by his main competitor's doubts (and handsome wager).
For being a romantic comedy, there sure is a low amount of romance. It's not
that watching the characters interact isn't fun, but there seems to be a
deprived sense of development *between* the characters. Everyone is charming,
especially O'Shea as Dermot, but nobody is introduced beyond their initial
stages. We don't really get to know any of the characters better by the end.
We don't really see them go thru much of a change, and, unfortunately for this
film, that's what stories are all about. Even Garofalo, whom I highly admire
as one of my favorite modern female actresses, seems a bit dispassionate about
her appearance here.
This is a film that will be loved because, like Ballinagra, it's simplistic
and sincere almost to a point of naivety. But even though the charm is thick,
it's spread on a bit thin. To give some credit, there a few things that do
make THE MATCHMAKER watchable: a better than average soundtrack, some
beautiful Irish landscapes, and, of course, those cute little accents.

Title
Review for Real McCoy, The (1993)
A suave, cool, collected, rich, uptight bad guy = cliche. A clumsy criminal
oaf to add to the laughs = cliche. A bad guy who owns a wild animal = cliche.
A crooked, chauvinistic law enforcer type = cliche. At an intense moment, our
main character tries to get away, but the car has trouble starting = cliche.
Complaining about cliches = cliche.
Ok, ok. So we always hear about cliches. But if there was ever to be a prime
example, THE REAL MCCOY is it! Not one uttered word, not one frame of film,
not one character in this whole movie isn't a cut and paste example of
everything we've ever seen. They might as well use this as a training film:
"How to Make a Bank Robbery Film in the 90's".
Karen McCoy (Kim Basinger) is a bank robber who just got out on parole after
a six-year stay at the state prison. She wants to make things right and go
straight, especially with the fact that she has a six-year old son out there
who doesn't even know she's alive. Aware of McCoy's bank robbing expertise,
sniveling bad guy Jack Schmidt (Terence Stamp) uses the same six-year old to
coerce McCoy into returning to her past. He wants McCoy to pull off an
elaborate heist of 18+ million dollars at the same bank she got caught trying
to rob six years earlier, which, by the way, is somehow due to Schmidt. And
if she refuses? Who knows what he'll do to the kid. (Cue sinister laughter)
This movie is so pathetically pitiful that it's hard to know where to begin.
The aforementioned cliches are brutally abundant. I can't stress enough how
every single element, whether it be a character, the dialogue, a plot
"twist", etc., is so damn generic that you'll wonder if *anyone* is working
behind the scenes, let alone in front of the camera. Basinger is absolutely
vacant. And where do they get off trying to make us emotionally attached to
her? Here's someone that spent their time robbing banks, and now as she heads
onto the street, we're supposed to feel sorry for her. As she confronts her
son, who doesn't even know who she is, are we supposed to break into tears??
Especially when neither Basinger nor Zach English, who plays the kid, has any
depth or emotional-radiance whatsoever.
I suppose I should mention Val Kilmer. Yeah, that's right - he's in it! Quite
sadly too, seeing as how I can discuss everything about the movie and never
mention his name. And he got second billing! To be fair, I will admit that
Kilmer had potential in his role as the bumbling criminal wannabe J.T.
Barker. Unfortunately the script doesn't allow much room for improvement, and
when his character is used like bookends (he never shows up in the middle of
the film!), we have no time to appreciate what he might have brought to this
project.
THE REAL MCCOY just can't keep it's head above water, and soon, *very* soon,
sinks into a cliched mess of movie. The actors are like dummies being moved
about by an unenthusiastic puppeteer, and the dialogue, particularly
Schmidt's trite dialogue, falls like the Niagra. This is definitely one to
avoid, folks. THE REAL MCCOY is anything but!

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
I had high hopes for this film. I was told it was one of the few movies out
there that I would not be able to guess at all. Well so far, it merely
deserves the "Most Insulting to My Intelligence" award. In fact, I have to
question if two stars wasn't a bit excessive. But, due to a plot that with
quite a bit of work has real potential, and thanks to the decent acting, I
will leave it how it is.
The rumors were right. I didn't have a clue as to what was in store. I get
the impression that the writer might not have either. The plot? A lot of
weird crap happens to a guy and we don't really know why or who is behind it.
In reality, there isn't a lot more to it. It seems as though the writer may
have started this project without knowing what was going to happen next
either; like he just sat down and started writing. After dragging on for two
hours, he finally threw in a lame ending simply to wrap it up.
Warning: I am about to divulge several key elements to the plot that, if you
plan to see this film, will definitely ruin the surprises. But it is crucial
to discuss these in order to show you the absolute absurdity of the movie.
Supposedly there is a company that is meant to spice up your boring life by
playing a game with you, a game you know nothing about, such as how to play,
what to do, or when it will end. Nonetheless, they go to elaborate measures
to find out EVERYTHING about you, then pretty much make you think you're
going to be killed and that they have emptied all your bank accounts. Gee,
that sounds fun.
Supposedly this company knows every single move you're going to make. They
know just where you're going to end up, and exactly when. They don't really
want to kill you . . . it's just all for effect! Such as when they drive you
into a river while locked in the back of a taxi cab. It's a good thing they
know you're going to get out and nothing will go wrong. It's good that when
they drug you and leave you in a graveyard in Mexico, that they know you're
going to make it back, fine and dandy. It's good that they know that you're
not actually going to kill any of them when they're supposedly trying to kill
you! It's a good thing that they know just what day you'll show up at their
office (as if they'd even know that!), and that they know for sure that
you're going to end up running up to the roof. And it's a good thing they
know that you're going to jump off the roof at the exact spot they want you
to. Oh, and by the way, when you find out EVERYTHING they've done wasn't
real, that it was just a prank, and that no, you didn't really kill your
brother and you didn't succeed in killing yourself, it's good that you'll
just smile and shrug it off and join the birthday party they have prepared
for you.
Just talking about this movie gets me so angry that they would try to feed
this to us! The more I think about this movie, the madder I get!
Unfortunately they did too well of a job at their B.S. story that I can't
give them a lower grade. But trust me, THE GAME does deserve special
recognition for its shortcomings! THE GAME is absolutely lame!

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
Time travel is a fascinating, confusing, very complex subject. That's one
reason movies about time travel are, in theory, fascinating, confusing, and
very complex. TWELVE MONKEYS is a prime example of these attributes . . . an
*excellent* example.
In the 2020's, a date never specified but pretty conclusive, James Cole
(Bruce Willis) is an underground prisoner. Yes, a *literal* underground
prisoner. You see, most of the Earth's population, 99% to be exact, was
eliminated by a mysterious virus about thirty years earlier; a virus that has
forced the survivors to forever live in an underground, hellish sanctuary.
Forever, that is, unless thru the use of unwilling "volunteers", they can
discover the beginning of this virus and learn how to destroy it.
The "volunteers" are prisoners, used like guinea pigs and thrust back in time
with orders to gain information about the plague. Cole is chosen by the
dictator-like group of scientists as a very promising candidate. One problem:
time travel is still a shaky form of transportation, and when Cole is meant
to go back to November of 1996 (one month before the deaths began), he is
instead sent to April 1990.
1990 proves to be too early for Cole to gain any information about the virus.
Instead, he is found to be insane and locked up in an institution. During all
this we are introduced to two crucial characters: Dr. Kathryn Railly
(Madeleine Stowe), the psychiatrist in charge of Cole's evaluation, and
Jeffrey Goines (Brad Pitt), a patient in the asylum and the son of a Nobel
Prize winning scientist. Cole miraculously escapes the institution, traveling
back "home" to tell the scientists what he has learned, which is nothing.
But, while he's back in the 21st century, we do learn that Goines is the man
behind the Army of the Twelve Monkeys, a militant radical group believed to
spawn the virus that destroys mankind. So, in just a matter of minutes to us,
Cole is sent back, this time correctly to 1996 (via World War I - see the
movie to find out why).
In 1996, Cole quickly locates Railly and abducts her, reminding her that she
had promised six years ago to help him out. Railly is a compassionate, albeit
frightened woman who wants to help Cole, but can't be convinced of his absurd
tales of time travel and apocalyptic prophesies. Eventually, pieces of the
puzzle start falling into place just as two conflicting elements come to
pass: Cole begins to believe he *is* insane while Railly begins to believe he
isn't!
We're almost as messed up in the head as Cole as we try to figure out who's
who, what's what, and even when's when! We don't know who to trust and we
don't know what's behind a lot of things, but it all starts to unravel and,
like a good time travel story, wrap around so the beginning and ending blend
into one and we're stuck in an M.C. Escher-like mind trip.
TWELVE MONKEYS is an awesome flick that explores time travel with a
surprisingly believable approach. They're not trying to prevent the past.
Everything that has happened *has* happened and there's no changing it. They
are merely observing it with hopes of a better future. Willis has proved
himself quite a good actor with roles like this and in PULP FICTION. He's
good at action roles because unlike Segal and Van Damme, Willis has depth,
not just muscles and a chiseled chin. Stowe does a fine job, but the real
performance here is by Pitt. As scrutinized as he can be, Pitt is an
excellent actor who caters to a variety of characters. He very much deserved
the Best Supporting Actor nomination he got for this role.
TWELVE MONKEYS isn't the light-hearted time travel movie we're used to
seeing. This ain't no BILL & TED'S EXCELLENT ADVENTURE (thankfully). It's not
a comedy, but you couldn't call it an action film either. It's more of a
brutal psychological thriller that's so mentally captivating and intriguing
that one can't help but sit wide-eyed thru every scene, ears perked so as not
to miss a crucial bit of information. Trust me, there's a lot of them. TWELVE
MONKEYS is enjoyable enough to sit through several times. In fact, if you're
ever going to figure out this film, you just might have to! Then again,
that's part of what makes this film so fun.

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
Ok, Woody, we get it. As sad as that is to say, laughing at obvious
incarnations of Mr. Allen himself is just getting less and less appealing.
Perhaps a more blatant self-analysis than most, DECONSTRUCTING HARRY heads
nowhere fast, a common attribute to many Allen films, but never has the ride
been so dull.
A year after the wonderful EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU, which showed a fresh, and
yet more classic side to Woody Allen's film-making, DECONSTRUCTING HARRY is
here. It's the story of Harry Block (Allen), a writer whose novels are no more
than thinly disguised renditions of his personal life. Those who knew him most
intimately are making unauthorized pseudo-appearances in Harry's books, and
they are all greatly offended by what has unofficially-but-obviously been
revealed. Those most upset include Harry's ex-wife/ex-therapist Joan (Kirstie
Alley), and Joan's sister, Lucy (Judy Davis), whom we quickly learn was having
an affair with Harry at the time. The situation isn't helped any by the fact
that Woody's entire life has been libidinously centered and completely
unfaithful.
But now Harry has been invited to receive an honorary award from the school
that once expelled him, and trying to find someone to accompany him is proving
very difficult. When it comes down to it, this is really just an excuse to get
Harry to visit old friends, which is really just an excuse to replay old
memories, which is really just an excuse to allow Allen's self-catharsis to
take place. Luckily, Allen does have some interesting approaches to this
catharsis, and if it hadn't been for his less than standard direction, nothing
would have saved this film. Even with the same script, it could easily have
been downright awful. What makes this film as enjoyable as it is, which may
not be a lot, is the interesting blend between "real life" and the novelized
interpretations. We flip back and forth between the characters from Harry's
books and the people they parallel. One minute we're watching the fictional
Leslie (Julia Louis-Dreyfus), and the next, we're back to Lucy, all the while
the exact same story is being told. This, along with just a few very funny
moments, makes this film almost worthwhile, and for very adamant Woody Allen
fans, it may even be a blast.
If you're not an extreme fan of Allen, however, DECONSTRUCTING HARRY is likely
going to be a giant waste of time. If you're familiar with his work, you may
be surprised at the turn this film takes, including dialogue more reminiscent
of Andrew Dice Clay's uncensored standup comedy than classic Allen. The script
is heavily laced with profanity and vulgarity, even more obscene than Allen's
usual sex-obsessed works. This would be more uncomfortable to sit thru with
your mom than EVERYTHING YOU'VE ALWAYS WANTED TO KNOW ABOUT SEX, because at
least that film was handling those subjects with tactful humor, not just
throwing it out there so nonchalant. Such explicit dialogue is nothing new to
the world of movies, but it's never been so explored by Allen. Just be aware.
DECONSTRUCTING HARRY is just another soapbox for Allen to proclaim his own
insecurities and philosophies about life. It's nothing new by any means, and
quite frankly, it's boring. Allen really seems convinced that we're anxious to
hear his side of everyone's story, but this overly self-indulgent film has
nothing to offer anyone, aside from Allen himself. The large cast of highly
recognizable actors are merely skimmed over, adding no real benefit to the
experience. Allen has never been one to create deep, rich, individual
characters; we're usually stuck with the same, fast-talking array of New
Yorkers. The only thing that changes is the *quantity* of these characters in
each film. In other words, a dozen or so great actors only give your eyes a
little more something to do.
DECONSTRUCTING HARRY is worthy of two-and-a-half stars merely on the basis
that is was done very well. Of course, well-presented boredom is not much
better than mediocre boredom is it?

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
CONTACT is the 1997 movie I've seen the most - five times to be exact. Four of
those times were on the big screen, but even on a TV, it's a very impressive
film. The same can't be said for films like INDEPENDANCE DAY, but that's
because CONTACT is a rare example in sci-fi filmmaking where the story is
treated more importantly than the special effects, and all of us know looking
back that ID4 didn't offer much outside of some one-time delightful eye candy.
CONTACT's wonderfully presented story deals with Ellie Arroway (Jodie Foster),
a radio astronomer whose preference of study involves the outdated technique
of "merely listening" to sounds out in space. Her interest in the field of
astronomy developed at a very young age, encouraged by her loving father, Ted
(David Morse), who let Ellie use a small ham radio to pick up on frequencies
and communicate with people as far away as Pensacola, FL (that was, of course,
before the days of Internet chat rooms). While everyone else uses modern
technologies to aid them in the search for extra-terrestrial intelligence (of
which the program SETI is an acronym for), Ellie prefers to pop on a pair of
headphones and see what she can pick up on, keeping the youthful magic and
intrigue strongly alive.
Ellie's strong scientific basis essentially makes her an atheist, a belief
likely influenced by the death of her father while she was still quite young.
In Puerto Rico, she meets Palmer Joss (Matthew McConaughey), a writer
examining the effects of technology on the world's overall happiness; a one-
time seminary student who describes himself as "a man of the cloth, without
the cloth". Despite the vast differences in opinion regarding a "supreme
being", Ellie and Palmer hit it off, and even take the time to sleep together.
It's a weak and hurried relationship, but director Zemeckis needs it to add to
the plot later on. Meanwhile, Dr. David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt), who has
authority over SETI but finds the program a frivolous waste of time and money,
is ready to pull the plug on any and all SETI funding. This leaves the
passionate Ellie searching for new sponsors, eventually finding a setup in New
Mexico and leaving Palmer with no explanation, and only a one night stand to
remember.
It is in this NM city where, several months later, Ellie finally picks up on a
strong signal from outer space, perhaps the most profound discovery in the
history of science. When the signal is closely examined, many new developments
spring up, and before long, Drumlin is stepping in to take over the operation
he once scoffed at. Eventually, it is concluded that information in the signal
may be blueprints for a transportation device used to teleport an Earthling to
Vega (where the signal seems to have originated). The media swarms, fanatics
go further off the deep end, scientists clamor for new information,
politicians huddle in discussion of appropriate actions to take, and
presidents are morphed into a celluloid reality (remember when Zemeckis
couldn't get enough of this in FORREST GUMP?). As if that weren't enough,
Ellie's discovery leads her to the nation's capital where she again runs into
Palmer.
CONTACT is based on the novel by Carl Sagan and deals heavily with the subject
of science vs. religion. The impressive thing is how well both aspects are
presented, with no signs of bias. Arguments for both sides are intelligent,
solid, and thought-provoking. When Palmer joins a selection committee to
choose an ambassador to Vega (of which Ellie is a leading candidate), personal
convictions play a more important role than love interests. The question is,
can a person who doesn't believe in God truly be the best representative of
Earth when 90% of the planet *does* believe in a higher power? Even when the
film wraps up, it's uncertain whether it's meant to play as an advocate for
religion, science, both, or even neither, and in our modern day society where
"right and wrong" is only opinion (at least speaking "politically correctly"),
the ambiguity is an incentive.
Don't get me wrong. As much as it sounds like it, CONTACT isn't merely a
theology class rolled into a reel of film. It's a *highly* enjoyable two and a
half hours. Despite its seemingly heavy issues, it's not a tedious undertaking
to watch this film. The special effects are outstanding, though (warning!)
highly depreciated on the small screen. Even so, some of the subtle visual
effects (that will likely go unnoticed by many) are even more impressive than
ones more recognizable as "sci-fi". The storytelling is rich and complete, and
although there are moments in the film that feel quite pretentious (and at
times, even hokey), it's easily one of the best 1997 films, and one of the
best sci-fi films I've ever seen. This is Zemeckis' best since BACK TO THE
FUTURE, and for those of us who actually know that FORREST GUMP was
astronomically overrated, Zemeckis now has real reason to boast.

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
Although the movie previews were the first time I'd heard of MIDNIGHT IN THE
GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL, it seems important to mention that it is derived from
John Berendt's best-selling, non-fiction book. Although rumors have led me to
believe it is a loose adaption of the book, this is still the source behind
the film.
In the movie, John Kelso (John Cusack) is a New York writer sent to the
lavishly quaint town of Savannah, Georgia to cover a locally famous annual
Christmas party for "Town & Country" magazine. The party is being thrown by
the extremely rich, genteel Jim Williams (Kevin Spacey), an antiques dealer
whose mansion consumes an entire block. It doesn't take long before John is
exposed to the many eccentric characters of the seemingly peaceful town,
including a man who walks a dead dog and another man who keeps house flies
attached to him at all times.
When John arrives at the party, Jim befriends him right away. On a tour of
Jim's luxurious estate, we are introduced to another key character: Billy
Hanson (GATTACA's Jude Law), a profane, often drunk, blue-collar employee of
Jim's . . . and also his lover! When Billy is found shot to death in Jim's
house the next morning, a murder mystery unravels and John quickly decides to
stay in Savannah with hopes of turning this into a definite best-seller.
Luckily the film doesn't fall into a John Grisham-like legal suspense
thriller, which is a good thing since it could have so easily done so.
MIDNIGHT stays fresh, original, and surprisingly upbeat. This is due in large
part to the spectacular debut of the Lady Chablis, a black transvestite who
plays herself (himself?). Chablis is never off the mark,  seemingly one up on
the script. Not only does she provide the biggest and best laughs, but she by
far provides some of the best acting of the year. She *should* get an Oscar
nomination, as long as they can figure out which category to put her in - Best
Supporting Actor or Best Supporting Actress?
The always charming John Cusack proves once again why he is so impervious to
failure. No matter what role we see Cusack in, he becomes the character with
ease, and this is no exception. Kevin Spacey, who is already developing quite
a following, is terrific as the Southern-gent turned murderer. But was it
cold-blood or merely self defense? Go see this movie and find out! It's well
worth it!
Clint Eastwood does quite a nice job directing this film. Visually enriching
and eloquent, MIDNIGHT possesses such a realistic (if not surreal) feel, that
you'll expect to find a cold glass of lemonade waiting for you outside of the
theater. The very end of the film, which I won't give away, is of special
note. I will say, however, that it was marvelously done and very intriguing in
it's almost afterthought-like way.
The most notable problems with MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL are a
few lacking characters, particularly John's supposed love interest Mandy
Nichols, played by Clint's daughter Alison Eastwood. Such a seemingly
important figure should have received a great deal more development and screen
time, but sadly she is wasted and becomes a feeble attribute to the film.
You'd think in a two and a half hour film that they could have paid more
attention to her. Aside from that, MIDNIGHT is really a well-done film that
will probably not receive as much praise and commercial success as it
deserves. I urge you to see for yourself.

Title
Review for For Richer or Poorer (1997)
Hey, I've got a great idea for a movie! Ok, here it is: We'll get Tim Allen to
pull angry faces for about two hours or so! What's that? Sounds too boring?
Ok, how about this then: We still have Tim Allen pull faces for about two
hours, but half of them are angry looks and half of them are "I'm in pain!"
looks! What's that? That still doesn't sound funny to you? How about if we
through in some "ewwwww!" looks? Still not funny? If you answered "No, that
doesn't sound funny", then (DING DING DING!) you're absolutely correct!
FOR RICHER OR POORER is a moronic farce about a rich married couple (played by
Tim Allen and Kirstie Alley) who seek refuge in an Amish community after their
bumbling accountant (Wayne Knight, best know as Newman on TV's "Seinfeld")
gets them in trouble for tax evasion. What ensues is a badly scripted and
horribly directed 114 minutes of cinema hell. What makes this all wrong is
that nobody seems to have what the film needs . . . namely, talent!
Backing up, the married couple is Brad and Caroline Sexton (Allen and Alley),
a popular snobby duo who seem totally in love to everyone else, but in reality
are on the brink of divorce. Just as their marriage seems to be hanging from
it's final thread, Brad discovers that his accountant, Bob Lachman (Knight),
has been engaging in illegitimate deals in the Sexton's names. The IRS catches
on, but since everything points back to the Sexton's and not Lachman, there is
nothing much to do . . . except run away and join an Amish community.
First time screenwriters Jana Howington and Steve LuKanic give us a couple of
chuckle-out-loud moments, and even some decent laughs here and *way* over
there, but there is so much to cringe at in this horribly made film that
you'll likely miss the laughs while regurgitating popcorn. Alley is absolutely
unwatchable, and the chemistry between her and Allen is about as believable as
my chemistry homework from tenth grade (which, I inform you, was total B.S.).
Allen and Alley are in no way convincing as tycoons, nor are they very
convincing as an Amish couple! This entire movie is one bad ill-conceived
notion that should have been curtailed from the very beginning!
The Amish in this movie are also flimsy and unconvincing. It's such a trite,
stereotypical script that I imagine the actors that were cast (noticing that
they're all predominantly TV figures) were probably the only ones they could
get! Bryan Spicer's directing doesn't help one bit, either. In fact, listing
Spicer's filmography (which includes the first "Power Rangers" movie and the
big screen adaption of MCHALE'S NAVY) is more of an insult than a résumé!
Now that I've pretty much run FOR RICHER OR POORER into the ground, I will let
you in on the best thing about it. It bumped seven films up a notch on my
"worst of" 1997 movie list. That's right, thanks to this film ranking at
number 3 for the year's worst, six films are now not seemingly as bad, and A
SMILE LIKE YOURS, previously inhabiting the number ten spot, now doesn't have
to suffer the ridicule of making my bottom ten list. If you look at it in that
respect, FOR RICHER OR POORER will end up making someone happy after all!

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
I've noticed something lately that I've never thought of before. Pseudo-
substance - Hollywood faking deep meanings in their films. Have you ever seen
a movie that you really enjoyed, then when you look back, you realize there
was something missing? More and more, filmmakers seem to be putting out well
rehearsed, melodramatic films that evoke strong connotations of being a great
film, but if you step aside and reflect on your movie going experience, you
may just discover nothing more than elegantly presented fluff.
I'm not trying to say CITY OF ANGELS is that bad. It had a lot going for it,
but somewhere along the way, it faltered. Somehow, underneath the seemingly
poetic beauty of it all, there was a gigantic hole somebody covered with
iridescent performances and glossy cinematography. The predictable ending that
shattered our hopes (even though we saw it coming) only added to the
disappointment. But for over an hour, CITY OF ANGELS is well worth the time.
Nicolas Cage is Seth, a guardian angel who, like hundreds (likely thousands or
even millions) of other angels, spends eternity watching over the citizens of
mortality; humans never aware of how much celestial intervention occurs in
their life. Meg Ryan, in her most subdued performance yet, plays Maggie, a
doctor who begins to ponder exactly who it is we're fighting against when we
fight to keep someone alive. After losing a patient on the surgery table,
these questions envelope Maggie, and Seth, the angel who was there to oversee
the patient's transition into the afterlife, is immediately captivated by the
doctor. He begins following and observing Maggie, falling more and more in
love with her everyday.
Angels, who we quickly learn are not and never were humans, can not experience
human sensations such as taste and touch, but they do have the ability to make
themselves seen to anyone they desire. Seth's adoration is too much to resist,
and eventually he does appear to Maggie, quite regularly, although such a
thing seems taboo among the angelic community. The angels are interestingly
presented, all of them dressed in black and more reminiscent of hitmen than
traditional glowing white entities, but it's a nice touch that never seems
like a mere attempt at uniqueness. Cage is a wonderfully versatile actor
(think FACE/OFF, RAISING ARIZONA, and IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU - what a combo!)
who slips into the role of a heavenly agent quite nicely but threatens
sappiness more than once. 
It's nice to see Ryan pick up roles like this and the one in COURAGE UNDER
FIRE. The two aren't very comparable to each other, but they both deviate from
her usual "intelligently ditzy" romantic comedy roles, and it's an impressive
side of Ryan movie goers rarely have the chance to enjoy. But even though the
two leads do an impressive job, it is Dennis Franz who grabs us with his
interpretation of a hospital patient who knows more than meets the eye. It's a
shame that with so much going for it, CITY OF ANGELS falters so much in its
final stages, leaving us with the realization that an emotionally incredible
movie was out there, they just didn't know quite how to get to it. They
struggle for an impacting conclusion and wind up with painful thud rather than
an exhilarating high. Filmmakers should know your final impression will be the
one you linger on, remember, and convey to others thru word of mouth, so after
telling us for 60+ minutes that this film is a glorious masterpiece, they sure
leave us with a disheartening taste of mediocrity in our mouths.
Based on the German film WINGS OF DESIRE (that being the English title, of
course), CITY OF ANGELS is ninety percent success, enough to make most people
forgive its shortcomings, even the devastatingly disappointing ending. Most
movie goers, the non-cynics anyway, will be too wrapped up in the surreal
atmosphere to give criticism to that which needs to be criticized.
Nonetheless, CITY OF ANGELS is beautifully captivating, which is probably
enough to satisfy those poetic viewers who will appreciate a delve into rich
emotional territories.

Title
Review for Twelfth Night: Or What You Will (1996)
Shakespeare's plays are some of the hardest to follow for us here in modern
times. With odd, lengthy character names, a busy hustling of events, and
loquacious dialogue spoken swiftly and fluently in thick English accents, us
Americans generally ain't got no clue what's going on. That's what makes the
actors (or players to sound more authentic) so very important whenever a
Shakespearean production is presented, whether it be for the big screen, the
small screen, or the stage. It is up to them to convey to us what they're
saying and feeling, and a good actor can make the most complex character easy
to understand and follow.
Sadly, TWELFTH NIGHT: OR WHAT YOU WILL is one of the poorer examples of such.
This is one of the hardest to follow Shakespeare adaptions of recent memory,
but I do admire anyone who attempts to tackle such a feat, and the effort here
is credible even if the overall result needs a bit of a tune up. An otherwise
mediocre film, TWELFTH NIGHT is saved by a few, *very* few, commendable
touches, particularly Helena Bonham Carter who stars as the Countess Olivia.
Olivia has recently suffered the death of a brother, and is using the tragedy
to ignore the repeated efforts of Duke Orsino (Toby Stephens) to swoon her.
Orsino has enlisted the aid of Cesario (Imogen Stubbs) to assist him in his
efforts by sending the young man to profess of the Duke's love. As common
Shakespeare would always have it, however, nobody loves who they're "supposed"
to, and Olivia ends up falling for the messenger instead. There's just one
catch . . .
Cesario is in reality a young *woman* named Viola who washed to shore after a
terrible storm wrecked the ship she was traveling on with her almost identical
brother, Sebastian (Steven Mackintosh). Both survived and drifted to different
shores, but both assumed the other to be dead. With nothing left, Viola took
the disguise of a young man and became a servant to the Duke, a man she would
come to love without revelation due to her male semblance.
Also coming into play is a barrage of comic relief characters who flail about
to our amusement in yet another typical attribute of any Shakespearean comedy.
This time around, they consist of Olivia's steward Malvolio (Nigel Hawthorne),
Olivia's drunken uncle, Sir Toby Belch (Mel Smith) and waiting gentlewoman
Maria (Imelda Staunton), and Orisno's jester of sorts, Feste (Ben Kingsley).
While these characters are meant to lighten up the film, they are quite
dizzying and confusing, and although they do play somewhat of an important
role in the overall story, the focus on them may have been a bit excessive.
It is by far Carter who shines and lures you into the story, but unfortunately
she is the one whose character is used less than we'd like, proving a bit
ironic when she is such an important element in the story. Stubbs is almost
annoying, but handles her transvestite role well enough to satisfy, and it's
true that her scenes with Carter are some of the best the movie has to offer.
It is these scenes that make the film worth watching, even if it means wading
thru the boringly hectic scenes carried by the more mundane cast of actors.
It is crucial to note that the time frame of this story has been moved up to
the 19th century, which leaves no need for adaption from Carter, who has spent
a great amount of screen time reveling in both Shakespearean films and period
pieces set in the 1800's (think 1990's HAMLET and HOWARDS END as well as the
current WINGS OF THE DOVE). Shakespeare being set in futuristic (as far as the
time they were written is concerned) settings seems to be the latest trend,
with a present day ROMEO + JULIET and a RICHARD III set in the 1930's being
recent examples. It's a bit off-kilter when they rely heavily on the original
dialogue, such as with this film and ROMEO + JULIET, but it's also an
interesting transposition of the classics that make it interesting to watch.
In fact, this is one to be seen simply for the fact that it's Shakespeare if
for nothing else.
Shakespeare movies definitely require the right audience. He is definitely not
everybody's taste. This adaption of TWELFTH NIGHT is perhaps a bit too
sophomoric for loyal enthusiasts, and yet too luxurious for those better
suited with a high-caliber action flick. Finding the right middle ground will
be a definite chore as this one doesn't hold the class of such "elegant
comedies" as EMMA, and yet doesn't resemble silly farces that best accompany a
pajama party. What that means is that this film will likely dwindle away in
mediocrity, but if it's any consultation, not too much will be lost.

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
I really don't like to see sequels when I haven't seen the predecessors. It's
just not right. So although I hadn't seen any of the "Alien" movies at all,
thru gentle persuasion I agreed to go to ALIEN: RESURRECTION, and my friends
were kind enough to give me a rundown of the first three on the way to the
theater. With nothing but my friends' "expertise" to rely on up to this point,
I sat down hoping for two hours of fun.
I'm gonna leave it up to you to know where ALIEN 3 left off. I'm not going to
write up an essentially "word of mouth" re-cap of three movies I haven't seen.
With that in mind, try to remember that my review could greatly be affected by
a lack of "Alien" knowledge. This review is going to be from the perspective
of someone who doesn't know what's going on. Hopefully it will be of use to
someone!
As ALIEN: RESURRECTION begins, we are on a spacecraft where scientists remove
an alien baby from Sigourney Weaver's body. Then, from what I could gather, we
jump quite a few years into the future. They have cloned Ellen Ripley (Weaver)
and her "baby" is now a queen alien kept for scientific research. All within
the same scene, they try to teach Ripley's clone what a fork is, which is
pretty ironic because about ten seconds after that, she listens to a scientist
ramble on in scientific jargon and, what do you know, she understands it all.
Meanwhile a spaceship full of "no-goods" hooks up with the larger spacecraft
and in come a fresh group of alien chow. Oops! Did I give away a major
surprise? Anyway, the group of terrorists, which includes Winona Ryder as
Annalee Call, boards the craft just in time for all hell (including the oh-so-
researchable aliens) to break loose.
What happens next is obvious. Everybody, aside from the rebel group and
Ripley's clone, is soon killed off. This leaves our main characters scrambling
thru an oversized, earth-bound hunk of metal. Will they get out in time? Will
Ripley's clone, who is seemingly half-alien, be a friend or foe? Will the
audience suck this up?
The acting and dialogue is pretty hokey at times, especially in the beginning.
Weaver takes a long time to get even somewhat decent, but she's still the best
character. Ryder on the other hand, just doesn't seem right at all. Being a
horror film however, this isn't quite as important as the real goal . . .
scaring us! Yes, we jump quite a few times, but it's nothing new by any means.
If you like blood, this one is gory enough that it will hopefully satisfy you.
The special effects aren't bad, but they're nothing revolutionary. There is a
pretty good five minutes of special effects at the end, however. You'll likely
watch thru fascinated, yet cringing eyes. But the overall suspense, which is,
of course, the most important ingredient, never reaches quite high enough.
It's pretty routine, but it's worth a viewing if you can get in cheap enough.

Title
Review for George of the Jungle (1997)
Surely if you're expecting an intelligent film, this is not the one you're
bound to stop on as a cute, brightly lit light bulb appears above your head.
But if you're in the mood for brainless fun for the whole family, GEORGE OF
THE JUNGLE isn't half bad . . . barely.
If the Zucker Brothers/Jim Abrahams team, who produced such off the wall
comedies as AIRPLANE! and THE NAKED GUN, were to collaborate with Disney,
something much like GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE might be the outcome.
Unlike the majority of extremely lame "family" comedies (JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE, MAN
OF THE HOUSE, the 1997 remake of THAT DARN CAT), GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE might
actually make parents feel good about being along for the ride. The sad fact
behind family comedies is that they generally have no real appeal to an older
audience. Brainless slapstick, vulgar jokes, and "funny" faces are the main
ingredients. But GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE actually has wit. People of all ages
will be laughing at some point during the film.
It's nothing overly new of course. And how many times, just HOW MANY TIMES can
 we see people get hit in the groin and still laugh? This movie uses this
overly cliched method of "humor" more than once. Sure, George slams into
things several times in the movie, but that's his trademark. But for crying
out loud, we are also subjected to the "hit groin" ploy three or four times,
an elephant peeing twice, and an ape farting twice. If you do happen to find
them funny the first time, is it really funny to see again a few minutes
later?
So while GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE does have it's problems, it's a lot better than
most family oriented comedies. It is vulgar, at times surprisingly so, but
that's almost expected in movies where kids are going to make up a large part
of the audience. And how many parents out there would find it charming for
their own young ones to fart, burp, urinate, and/or hit someone in the
genitals in order to get a laugh? Not many, but we still seem to allow them
to WATCH it in order to get a laugh. I suppose it will remain that way for a
long time. But I digress, and do hope to stress that I got a lot more out of
GEORGE OF THE JUNGLE than I was expecting! It's fun, and it's dumb. Not a bad
choice for the family's night out.

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
"When it's cold, molecules aren't moving. Everything is clean."
These are the essential words of Mikey Carver (Elijah Wood), a young teenage
boy living in 1973 New Canaan, Connecticut in THE ICE STORM. When Mikey
delivers these words to a bored science class, it is unlikely that anyone
realizes how much they parallel Mikey's life and the lives that surround him.
His father Jim (Jamey Sheridan) is rarely seen and his mother Janey (Sigourney
Weaver) is having an affair with married neighbor Ben Hood (Kevin Kline).
Ben's wife Elena (Joan Allen) suspects the affair, but doesn't say anything.
Meanwhile, Ben's 14-year-old daughter Wendy (Christina Ricci) continuously
lures Mikey and his younger brother Sandy (Adam Hann-Byrd) into sexual
explorations.
Tobey Maguire plays Paul Hood, the 16-year-old narrator of the story who also
happens to be the least prevalent character. We start the film with an
interesting outlook on family from Paul. He compares family to the Fantastic
Four comic book, and even goes so far as to say that family is everybody's own
anti-matter; something everybody will return to eventually, and the farther
you go, the deeper you'll return.
THE ICE STORM is a character piece that explores a dismal time both in
America, and in the individual lives portrayed in the movie. Everything
parallels everything else. The young teenagers trying to discover who they are
thru drugs, sex, and alcohol is really almost identical to the parents trying
to figure out the purpose in their own lives using the same methods.
"When it's cold outside, the molecules aren't moving. Everything is clean."
Everything is clean because nobody will admit what's going on. Even the
president is on TV denying his wrong-doings. How can you expect anything more
out of a couple of suburban families riding the coattails of sexual
revolution? All the sex and drugs is so obviously empty, and I think that's
the point of the film. At first viewing, the entire movie might seem empty,
but then why shouldn't it parallel itself? You don't get to know the
characters very deeply, but I think that's because nobody in the movie knows
each other either. We sadly watch two families go about their lives nearly
oblivious to one another. At first glance, you might think emotion is lost in
the ending scenes because you haven't gotten to know the characters well
enough to sympathize - then you realize that just might be the point, and then
you do feel the pain.
The acting by all is quite good, but I particularly liked Elijah Wood. He
doesn't seem to be receiving as much recognition as the others, but I still
found him to possess quite a real sense of being. Christina Ricci is being
acclaimed for her part as the misguided teenage temptress who looks for
something more to her life in the pants of every available boy. Still, I say
hats off remain to Wood, Joan Allen's subtle but believable performance as a
lonely, unappreciated wife, and the always excellent Kevin Kline. Tobey
Maguire did a fine job, but his character which, perhaps, was the most intact,
sensible person in the story, seemed a little lost. He was needed, but perhaps
he should've been used more.
THE ICE STORM is being hailed by many as one of the best films of the year. I
hate to say that I don't agree, but I don't. In fact, I can think of many
other films that I would rank higher than this one. Even so, it is a very good
film. It takes a lot of retrospect to fully appreciate it's art, but when you
finally start seeing things in it that you didn't before, you start to grow
even fonder of the characters and the story. Perhaps this is one to see,
ponder, and then watch again with different eyes.

Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
Jane Austen, Michael Crichton, and John Grisham. These are the authors whose
books consumed the world of 1990's cinema. Since 1993, Grisham has had six
novels turned into major motion pictures, and they've been relatively well
accepted by the movie-going public. Unfortunately, that's a trend that's been
on the downhill. THE CHAMBER was virtually unnoticed as it passed thru a brief
existance in movie theaters, and now comes JOHN GRISHAM'S THE RAINMAKER, which
is on about the same level both in terms of quality, and in the attention it's
receiving. Both are nothing to brag about.
Matt Damon stars as Rudy Baylor, a young, handsome lawyer on the verge of a
bar exam (in a John Grisham story? No way!). Starting out in Memphis under the
shady Bruiser Stone (Mickey Rourke), Rudy finds his natural good character
heavily conflictive with the proud ambulance chasers he works with. Danny
DeVito plays Deck Shiffler, Rudy's "tutor" whose six failed attempts at the
bar exam leaves him just this side of being a real lawyer. Nevertheless, Deck
shows Rudy the easy way to quick bucks, barging into hospital rooms and
refusing to take no for an answer, and Rudy, despite his integral ambitions,
falls into it very quickly.
The main conflict deals with Dot Black (Mary Kay Place), a middle aged woman
who loses her son to Leukemia. If the right steps had been taken, her son
might still be alive, but due to a less-than-honest insurance company, Dot
watched her son wither away. Rudy, a greeny, must take the powerful insurance
company, and its high-paid group of "old pro" lawyers (led by Jon Voight), to
court. On the sideline, we have an abused wife (Claire Danes) that Rudy seems
to be falling for, and Miss Birdie (Teresa Wright), an old woman who rents the
young lawyer a room, who intends to leave all her possessions to a TV-
evangelist when she dies.
Most of the acting in this film feels too staged. Place is melodramatic
whereas Wright comes off like a stage actress (there is a difference between
acting in plays and movies, and the two don't mix!). DeVito gives it his all,
but being the talent he is, the role is almost too belittling of him (and I'm
not making a "short" joke at his expense). Voight plays an arrogant lawyer
quite well, but when the best acting comes from a meant-to-be despised
character, it's hard to get all excited. Danes has proven herself an
exceptional young star, and this role also doesn't do her justice. She's one
of the best things the film has, but once again, her character is too
frivolously used to make it an impressive stamp on her résumé. The surprise
winner here is the cameo-esque appearance by Danny Glover as Judge Tyrone
Kipler. Glover needed some brownie points after the horrendous GONE FISHIN',
and while THE RAINMAKER isn't a full redemption, it helps us forgive him just
enough.
Along with GOOD WILL HUNTING, THE RAINMAKER is Matt Damon's ticket to
notoriety, but let me assure you, GOOD WILL HUNTING is definitely the
flatterer. In fact, I saw that one before I saw THE RAINMAKER, and seeing THE
RAINMAKER was a sad disappointment after such an impressive performance. Damon
grows into the character of Rudy Baylor, but for the first while, he struggles
to pull it off (as well as his less-than-perfect southern accent). He's one to
watch, but he should also pick his roles more carefully. Playing a young,
cocky, streetwise kid from the poor side of Boston is much more up his alley
than a young, timid, southern lawyer.
Francis Ford Coppola, once a very impressive name as a director, is taking too
many wrong turns with films like this and the below-average JACK (he also
wrote the script for THE RAINMAKER). He's not bad, but he's not great, and
when people are paying more and more money to get into theaters, great is more
what to aim for. THE RAINMAKER almost seems hastily made, and the end result
is a film that won't be remembered in much detail two days after you've seen
it. Unlike every other Grisham-novel movie, THE RAINMAKER lacks any suspense
(THE FIRM, THE PELICAN BRIEF, THE CLIENT) or any emotional stirring (A TIME TO
KILL, THE CHAMBER). The only thing that gives this film two and a half stars
is the courtroom finale. Although we've seen it over and over before, it's
still fun to watch the underdog work his way thru an impossible trial. Like I
said, it's not emotional or suspenseful, but it is interesting. Not
captivating, not intriguing, just interesting. And when you've paid six bucks
to get in and sat there for two hours waiting to see what happens, you'll be
more than thankful.

Title
Review for To Wong Foo, Thanks for Everything, Julie Newmar (1995)
TO WONG FOO, THANKS FOR EVERYTHING! JULIE NEWMAR opens up with a parade of
drag queens on stage, dancing and frollicking to music. It strongly resembles
THE BIRDCAGE, not to confuse that TOO WONG FOO came first. The plot is
quickly unraveled as Vida Boheme and Noxeema Jackson (Patrick Swayze and
Wesley Snipes, respectively) tie for first place in a drag queen contest,
their prize being a trip to Hollywood. Naturally the two are thrilled, but
the more sympathetic one, Vida, takes pity on Chi Chi (John Leguizamo), an
amateuristic drag queen who's feeling quite a bit of self pity, and invites
him along.
TO WONG FOO doesn't take long to get to the goods, but it's somewhat boring
getting there so you still might feel anxious. The fun takes off when the
three "queens" end up stuck in the incredibly small town of Snydersville with
a broken down Chevy. They're forced to stay the weekend, and obviously become
a conspicuous group of flamboyantly dressed "women". Vida, Noxeema, and Chi
Chi end up teaching the women of the town how to be more independant, and the
men of the town how to be more gentlemanly. While the culture clash becomes a
close-knit family, the sherrif of a nearby town is on a hunt for these
"perverts". Apparantly he's not too happy about the embarrasing situation he
was left in after pulling them over with more-carnal-than-legal intentions.
Patrick Swayze is defintely the one who stands out in this film. While his
character may not be overly wonderful or impacting, he still put a lot into
it and does a fabulous job, as subtle as it may come off. TO WONG FOO is
pretty predictable even if it is predictable in a more wild-than-usual way.
Still, it's enjoyable and is worth seeing on video. While I only give it * *
1/2, it's a hearty * * 1/2!

Title
Review for Rocket Man (1997)
The catch phrase for Disney's ROCKET MAN is one spoken by Fred Z. Randall
(Harland Williams), the bumbling idiot computer programmer turned astronaut
who continuously wreaks havoc everywhere he goes. "It wasn't me!" he proclaims
over and over as the aftermath of his stupidity brings about looks of disgust
from the others. Well when it comes to this movie being as horrible as it is,
Williams can't take all the blame, but he sure can't justify himself with his
own simple tag line either.
Fred has dreamed of space travel since he was a young boy, turning the clothes
dryer into a mock space shuttle and staring out wide-eyed at a poster of the
Earth. As a 30-year-old, Fred hasn't grown up much, but at least he's somewhat
closer to his goal, now designing astronaut software for NASA. When an
astronaut for an upcoming mission to Mars becomes injured, NASA calls on the
person who knows the programming inside and out to fill the void. . . Fred.
Yes, although he's an obviously klutzy moron, NASA doesn't think twice about
throwing him into a rigorous training program so he can assist one of the most
important events the space program, and time itself, has ever known.
For the first part of the film, we watch as Fred takes on the training program
much like an amusement park. He laughs, he screams, but he never once breaks a
sweat or views the preparation as anything more than child's play. His passive
approach to the program eventually leads to many record-breaking feats, much
to the dismay of cocky counterpart, Mission Commander Captain Overbeck
(William Sadler), who once held the records. Overbeck will regretfully
accompany Fred and two others to the red planet, one being astronaut Julie
Ford (THE STUPIDS' Jessica Lundy), and the other being a chimpanzee who is
much more civilized than our antagonizing protagonist. From here on out, we
are subjected to one lame gag after another, dealing with snot, laxatives, and
flatulence. You know, standard kid movie material.
Almost sounding like a poor James Stewart impressionist, Williams is awful in
his first starring role. We get the feeling that if Jerry Lewis and Pee-Wee
Herman were related and produced an inbred offspring, Williams would be it.
While he's not as annoying as other actors who cater to zany, stupid comedy,
he's just as unlikeable. To say it more understandably, Jim Carrey might annoy
you more, but this guy is even less funny. Why? Because while he possesses the
stupidness needed to pull off such a role, his performance is too understated
and boring. Classic comedic dunces were generally oblivious to their own
idiocy. Stan Laurel, for example, was so innocent in all his trouble-making
that we were immediately fond of him. Peter Sellers, as Inspector Clouseau,
was so self-assured and confident that when he did something as simple as
trip, it was humor at it's best. Williams, on the other hand, can't garner the
pity he needs to make us love him in all his anti-glory.
As for the rest of the cast, including some bigger names in smaller roles
(Beau Bridges and Shelley Duvall), nobody is worth watching whatsoever. This
is just another example of the fast-food equivalent of cinema: mass-produced,
less than mediocre, over priced, and hard to stomach. Giving it one-and-a-half
stars is *extremely* generous, but even I'll admit to laughing a few times.
The amazing thing is that even in a theater packed with little kids, laughter
was something rarely heard - even from the children! I must admit that it gave
me more respect for the kids when they didn't crack up over every little
thing. Then again, maybe they were asleep.
Some people might think critics are harsh on kid movies, claiming adults
aren't the targeted audience and therefore aren't meant to, and won't, enjoy
them. Sadly, it's also true that kids will enjoy almost anything if it's
presented right. A two-hour still shot of a dog with a cartoonish voice over
could entertain a lot of toddlers out there, but would that make it as
artistic as BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, which could easily do the same thing? And
saying that a parent's perspective isn't important is quite a poor theory to
have when they're the ones who take the kids to these films in the first
place.

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
A powerful cast comes together with dulled results in TWILIGHT, four-time
Oscar winning writer/director Robert Benton's latest project, about an ex-
private investigator who makes a return to his gumshoe days when a simple
package delivery turns up a dead body. The ex-P.I. in question (er,
questioning? the film is setup as he recounts the events to the police) is
Harry Ross (Paul Newman), also a former police officer, husband, and father,
who has since gone into retirement and found his purpose in bottles of
bourbon. For quite some time, Harry has been living with Jack Ames (Gene
Hackman) and his wife, Catherine (Susan Sarandon), a pair of aging Hollywood
stars living a reclusive lifestyle in their luxurious estate.
When the terminally-ill Jack asks his old friend to deliver a package, Harry
agrees, but when Harry reaches the rendezvous point and finds anything but the
expected, he sets out to solve a strange murder mystery. A dead man and a
stash of newspaper clippings concerning Catherine, her first husband's
mysterious death, and her marriage to Jack, spark Harry's intrigue, but
unfortunately the audience isn't as lucky. Without being pulled into the
circumstances, we're left almost indifferent as to who, what, why, where, and
how any of this came to be. The side plot of a possible love interest between
Catherine and Harry seems pointless and irrelevant, while the opening scenes
involving Harry's retrieval of the Ames' teenager daughter from a Mexico
vacation with an older boyfriend offer nothing but an opportunity for a lame
running gag.
James Garner has a supporting role as Raymond Hope, an old friend of Harry's
from his days on the police force. Garner completes what should be the most
impressive cast capable of receiving the senior citizen discount at Sizzler,
but such a boringly low-key film wastes every single one of them. While they
all possess a strongly dignified presence onscreen, there is nothing in
TWILIGHT for them to sink their teeth into; no chances to boast that their
acting abilities have a greater longevity than their hearing abilities. This
film unfortunately takes the magnitude of its cast for granted.
Besides unoriginal plot devices and an unfueled storyline, Elmer Bernstein's
musical score also misfires, becoming an annoyingly ever-present nuisance. It
seems as though one scene may not pass without a symphonic tension builder,
when in reality, the scene could be much more affective without it. Musical
scores are meant to enhance the emotional stimulations a film creates, not cue
them as Bernstein tries to do here.
Playing like L.A. CONFIDENTIAL at a geriatric pace, TWILIGHT is a sub-par
example of film noir. No matter how interesting your plot may be, there are
crucial elements every story must possess. From elementary school to high
school graduation, English teachers try their hardest to teach them to their
pupils. Take away just one of these attributes and the story suffers. What's a
good story without a climax? What's a good story with no real resolution?
TWILIGHT is probably a good example.

Title
Review for Houseguest (1995)
Let's get one thing straight - I *loved* this film. Yeah, it's got some prime
examples of shoddy film-making, but on the surface of all it's excessive
cheeziness, it's really funny. It's one of those movies I embarrassingly liked
so much, I would quickly recommend it, even if it's more worthy of a Razzie
than an Oscar. With that out in the open, let me tell you why HOUSEGUEST, a
hilarious film, is so bad.
HOUSEGUEST stars the one-name comedian Sinbad as Kevin Franklin, an orphan who
grew up on the poor side of town with big dreams he never let go. Even as an
adult, no matter how much people tell him to "get real", Kevin is determined
to make something of himself. He cruises around in a laughably compact car
playing out scenarios of famed acclamation like a young boy pretending to be a
superhero. He looks for answers in lottery tickets and "get rich quick"
infomercials, all the while keeping his meager lifestyle barely afloat thru
organized crime connections, but when things begin to catch up with him, a
$50,000 debt for example, Kevin finds himself needing to skip town.
At the airport on the verge of escape, two thugs (Paul Ben-Victor and Tony
Longo) determined to collect the debt begin a chase after Kevin. When it seems
he can go no further, Kevin overhears a family discussing the man they are
supposed to be picking up. The father of the group, Gary Young ("SNL" alumnus
and current co-star of "NewsRadio" Phil Hartman), explains that the man is an
old friend whom he hasn't seen in decades. He's also black, and that's all it
takes to convince Kevin to pose as someone he knows otherwise nothing about.
The Young's take Kevin into their posh suburban home, and thru overly silly
comedic events, he discovers more and more about the man he has taken the
identity of - renowned dentist Derek Bond (Ron Glass). But Kevin is quite
different from Derek, and his laid-back, party-hearty attitude is quite a jolt
to the otherwise serious-minded community he finds himself in. Seemingly
uncouth at first, Kevin becomes more and more of a mentor and therapist to the
unprioritized Gary, the confidence-lacking son Jason (Chauncey Leopardi), and
the misunderstood/misguided daughter Brooke (Kim Murphy).
Kevin's true identity is constantly at risk of being revealed, but despite his
deceitful actions, he has a heart of gold. The Young's charitable hospitality
makes it even more difficult on Kevin, who develops a genuine fondness for the
family - after all, they're the closest thing to a real family Kevin has ever
known. But as we wait for Kevin to be painfully brought into the open, we are
hit hard with cornball humor, and I must admit, I loved every minute of it.
Thru intentionally campy acting and amateurish, hyper editing, I was easily
entertained with the cinematic equivalent of cheese puffs. There wasn't a lot
of substance, but it tasted good, and I enjoyed binging on all the
brainlessness.
HOUSEGUEST suffers terribly from blatant incontinuities and cartoonish film-
making, and I'm surprised the producing credits didn't go to McDonald's after
the most obvious display of product placement movies have ever taken. But even
though the whole film could be viewed as a two-hour commercial for Mickey D's,
it would still be a funny enough commercial to make it worthwhile. The acting
was campy, but surprisingly, the one who stood out like a sore thumb was the
one who took his role the most seriously - Stan Shaw. As Kevin's best friend
Larry, Shaw seems a bit too serious about the project, which in turn makes him
hard to swallow. It doesn't demean him as an actor, but it does make him very
off-balance from the rest of the cast. Serious performances should still be
light in a film like this, and Kim Griest as Emily Young (the mom of the
family) is the one who does it right.
>From a wholly artistic viewpoint, HOUSEGUEST probably doesn't even deserve two
stars, but I laughed so much that I had to give it a recommendable grade. If
you're looking for intelligent comedy, or even a half-decent film, this isn't
really the way to go, but if you're looking for laughs, I think it's a great
choice. It's really hard to predict how you'll feel about this film. Somehow
it just rubbed me the right way, and I can't deny that even after seeing it a
few times, I laugh when I see it again. Be forewarned, it's not for everyone,
but at the same time, it resembles a good pizza: flimsy, cheap, and extra
cheezy.

Title
Review for Man Who Knew Too Little, The (1997)
We seem to be at a point in time where the big name comedy actors are
changing. While Steve Martin, Chevy Chase, Bill Murray, and Eddie Murphy used
to run the gamut, they're now getting old and we're bringing in a new batch
with the likes of (sic) Jim Carrey, John Leguizamo, and Chris Tucker. It's a
very sad time. Luckily those comedians who ran the 80's are still attempting
to go strong, and while their later efforts are considerably poorer than we'd
like, it's their familiarity that keeps us smiling and endeared to their
withering performances. Murray, who is one of the best, is still charming,
it's just that his roles don't deserve him. Such is the case with THE MAN WHO
KNEW TOO LITTLE.
Murray stars as Wallace Ritchie, a Blockbuster Video employee in Des Moines,
Iowa who travels on his birthday to visit his brother James (Peter Gallagher)
in London. The two reunite with affection, but James regrets informing his
brother that an extremely important dinner with some German businessmen will
prevent him from celebrating with his brother. Brainstorming ideas, James
finally comes to a brilliant conclusion that will serve both as his brother's
birthday gift, and as a deterrent to Wallace's wild antics ruining the
important dinner. Wallace has always wanted to be an actor, and the latest
sensation around town is an interactive play where you become the lead
character in a crime caper put on by professional actors. Dubbed the "Theater
of Life", Wallace jumps at the chance, but when he intercepts the wrong phone
call, he is put on the trail of a completely real espionage ploy involving
England and Russia.
Heading from place to place, Wallace continuously runs into bad guys and
assassins whom he suspects to be actors, and when he never takes them
seriously, they assume him to be a highly skilled American secret agent. While
the entire plot is very unclear, we know that it has something to do with
blackmail and a stack of letters in the possession of British prostitute Lori
(Joanne Whalley-Kilmer), Wallace's first encounter who winds up joining his
side. We also know that somehow it all leads back to an elaborate scheme to
reactivate the Cold War by deactivating a bomb planted inside a Russian
Matryoshka doll at a treaty signing. And just in case you're wondering why
they want to start up another Cold War, it's actually quite simple: it keeps
the secret intelligences employed. (Roll your eyes as you see fit)
We spend an hour and a half watching Murray do what he does best - acting
flamboyantly silly in the midst of highly serious dealings, which in turn
annoys others and leaves us, the audience, laughing hysterically. THE MAN WHO
KNEW TOO LITTLE never gets quite that good, but you can tell it really wants
to. You will find yourself laughing here and there - it's something you just
can't avoid when watching Murray be such a pretentious buffoon - but you will
also be sadly aware that this comic legend is on his way out, and Dr.
Kevorkian can't even help a dying career be less painful to watch.
Aside from Murray, THE MAN WHO KNEW TOO LITTLE is laced with dime-a-dozen
performances. Gallagher is the best he's ever been, which means he's just bad
instead of awful this time around. Gaining more and more prominent film roles,
Gallagher's slowly blossoming career, jump started by playing a comatose
businessman in the 1995 hit WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING, is in dire need of a
talent boost. He gave us an absolutely nauseating performance in TO GILLIAN ON
HER 37TH BIRTHDAY, and while almost being decent here, he still suffers from
subtle overacting that is more embarrassing than anything.
Murray makes this film ache to be recommendable, but it just isn't. Although
Murray is almost always worth watching, here he is drowned out by lame, low-
effort filming and direction that leaves a potentially funny film potentially
worthless. With a PG rating and a high-level of silliness, this would appear
to be a family comedy, and while it isn't offensive, it's too silly for adults
to enjoy yet suffers from a plot too political to grab children's attention.
Perhaps it would work better as a more mature, darker comedy, but one gets the
feeling not a lot could've saved this, and it's a real shame when a plot with
so much ability is destined for nothing more than an eternal resting spot on a
video-rental shelf in Des Moines, Iowa.

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
The yet-to-be-released KRIPPENDORF'S TRIBE is being marketed as a family
comedy, but buyer beware. This movie can't make up its mind. Is it a family
comedy with vulgar references to both the male and female bodies,
menstruation, circumcision, and sex that would make any parents squirm at the
thought of having their child next to them? Or is it an adult comedy
approached with such immaturity that only adolescents will appreciate the
effort? Either way, "unbalanced" is the word to stamp on this hit and miss and
miss and miss effort.
The premise is catchy - Widowed anthropology professor James Krippendorf
(Richard Dreyfuss) has spent the past two years "getting over" the death of
his wife, neglecting key research and squandering grant money on personal
living expenses. Now it's time to show what he's achieved in those two years,
and he has absolutely nothing to show for it. With a fabricated tale of
studying a previously undiscovered tribe in New Guinea, Krippendorf petitions
for new funds while hiding the fact that the previous $100,000 grant was spent
on trips to McDonald's. But when his "discovery" becomes the latest craze
among colleagues, the professor finds he must do more than talk about the
tribe - he must create it. With the aid of his three children, the headstrong
teen Shelly (Natasha Lyonne of EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU), the slightly younger
Mickey (Gregory Smith), and the nine-year-old Edmund (Carl Michael Lindner),
the "Shelmikedmu" tribe (named from the first half of each child's name) is
born, and videos quickly produced in Krippendorf's backyard are passed off as
stunning documentary footage of the newly found New Guinea tribe.
Despite the professor's wishes, the buzz surrounding his discovery only grows,
due in greatest part to Veronica Micelli (Jenna Elfman), an overly vivacious
(and voluptuous) anthropologist who barges her way into the discovery and
basically deems herself Krippendorf's main assistant. Hungry for recognition,
Micelli sets up interviews, lectures, etc. in an effort to make this the
biggest sociological event in history, a sure fire way to go down in the
history books. Krippendorf, on the other hand, is seeing himself go down a
jail cell corridor, not in history books, and with each new lecture, he must
come up with something impressive to unleash about the tribe - mating habits,
domestic structure, etc. Thru fumbling improvisation, and often some quick
thinking from his oldest son, Krippendorf makes it thru each new lecture, but
only creates more and more interest in the highly unique tribe. On the
opposing end is Krippendorf's arch rival, Ruth Allen (Lily Tomlin), an
arrogant professor whose jealousy drives her on a mission to disprove the
existance of the non-existent tribe.
It's a cute idea, and approached with a more subtle (and mature) style,
KRIPPENDORF'S TRIBE could've been a real winner. Sadly, the mostly-misfired
toilet humor, overly comical musical score (by Bruce Broughton), and sugar
coated sentiments (all the key ingredients of a "family comedy") just aren't
the right tone for this film. Cut that crap out, add some razor sharp dialogue
and witty sociological perceptions and you've got a good start. At the state
it's in now, you've got something along the lines of MEDICINE MAN meets MRS.
DOUBTFIRE meets DUMB & DUMBER, and that's not a concoction anyone should be
overly anxious to try.
The overall product here is a highly forgettable cup of "average", with a few
laugh-out-loud moments and a great big gap in between them. Most of the
characters are surprisingly two-dimensional, and the only one who seems to
exhibit any real acting effort (Lyonne) seems to go greatly unappreciated.
Director Todd Holland has gone about making this film in all the wrong ways.
It's stuck in limbo between Disney family fare (JUNGLE 2 JUNGLE) and
potentially hilarious adult comedy (A FISH CALLED WANDA). It's this unbalanced
structure that really knocks it down a grade, and it's a brutal drop.
A strong warning to parents: forget the impression given by advertisements, do
you want to take your kids to a film that has a woman asking a man if he finds
her attractive merely because she's holding his penis? Yes, it's put that
bluntly! Just be warned - this is merely one example of the many shocking
subjects to be brought up in the film, and others might not be as tame.

Title
Review for Waiting for Guffman (1996)
Directed by Christopher Guest
Running Time: 84 minutes
Originally Released: January 31, 1997 (National-USA)
Of all the films I've come to see this year (1997), I think only CHASING AMY
had as many "laugh-out-loud" moments. I'm not saying that I was hysterically
rolling on the floor while watching WAITING FOR GUFFMAN, but my mouth burst
open with at least a delighted guffaw at least every couple of minutes. And I
think I'm the kind of person that laughs least at movies, even when I find
them funny. Usually all you can get out of me is a warm smile, so to get me
laughing out loud, and so frequently, is a really good sign.
WAITING FOR GUFFMAN is the story of Blaine, Missouri, a town celebrating it's
150th anniversary, and the musical that is being put on for the big event.
The play is being directed by Corky St. Clair (Christopher Guest, who also
wrote and directed this "mockumentary" as well as co-writing several original
musical numbers), the effeminate Broadway hopeful determined to make this
production a smashing success. Teaming up with St. Clair are a handful of
Blaine residents: Allan Pearl (Eugene Levy), a Jewish dentist who spent his
youth not AS the class clown, but sitting right next to him and studying him,
Ron and Sheila Albertson (Fred Willard and Catherine O'Hara respectively), a
married couple setting their sights on Hollywood, Libby Mae Brown (Parker
Posey), the dense but fun Queen of the Dairy Queen, and a few others.
Everybody in this movie is brilliant, absolutely so, but Levy particularly
stands out. These characters are portrayed with such saddening realism that
you can't help but love them, as pathetic as they really are. Although Levy
stands out, Guest, Willard, O'Hara, and Posey are all wonderful and
definitely should be commended for their performances! If there was an Oscar
for an ensemble performance, this is the group that should sweep it.
Some humor was a tad uneven from the rest of the film and, even after
starting very humorously, they nearly lost me with the tad-too-long intros.
As delightful as it was, it began to get monotonous. Thankfully, just as your
about to say "ok, maybe I should run to the bathroom", they finally get past
the intros and onto the rehearsal scenes. Like a play, this film gives a very
three-act feel, the intros (funny, but almost too long), the rehearsals (even
funnier), and finally, the actual performance of the play (excellent!).
Like I said, each character really shines, even when done with a subtle
approach. You can't really watch these people and not think they're real
people! Even they way they talk, with awkward pauses and stumbles that don't
feel staged at all, you feel like you're watching a real, albeit funny,
documentary. And even with silly lyrics, the original songs when the play is
finally put on, are absolutely wonderful!
As a word of note, despite it's "R" rating, WAITING FOR GUFFMAN is really
quite clean. This rating came from a brief, VERY brief use of the grand-daddy
of all swear words. Even if that really bothers you, let me say that it's not
presented in a vulgar, cheap-laugh way. It's actually quite humorous and
tastefully done!
It might be hard knowing what to expect with WAITING FOR GUFFMAN. It's silly
humor, but it's also so dry, subtle, and intelligently done that you're not
insulted by it. It's always really nice to see a comedy that isn't all
slapstick and vulgarity, and this film is one of the better ones of the
better ones! I'd recommend seeing it!

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
In 1967, Austin Powers, British secret agent, was the hottest thing to walk
the streets of England. His main enemy? Dr. Evil, a blatant spoof of Dr. No
(from the James Bond film of the same name). Dr. Evil narrowly escapes into a
space-bound cryogenic freezing capsule and is launched into space. Thirty
years later, Powers, whom himself was frozen in order to save the planet from
Dr. Evil should he ever reappear (which he has), is unfrozen and more of a
mockery of the decade he once held in the palm of his hand. Thus is the
simplified plot of AUSTIN POWERS: INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY.
"Stupid" comedies are probably the most popular, especially among teenagers.
That is to say, movies that play to satire, parody, and general looniness.
The sad thing is that "stupid" comedies that actually possess intelligence
are rare. Films such as AIRPLANE!, TOP SECRET, BETTER OFF DEAD, THE NAKED
GUN, and even DUMB & DUMBER are good examples of "stupid" movies that are
well done and can actually garner a decent critique. Woody Allen, the Zucker
Brothers/Jim Abrahams team (although not so much after THE NAKED GUN), and
Mel Brooks are the more popular (and talented) examples. Such hits as TAKE
THE MONEY AND RUN and SLEEPER by Allen and BLAZING SADDLES, SPACEBALLS, and
YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN by Brooks are great movies that are well done, even for
being moronic.
AUSTIN POWERS cannot even closely come to being classified among these. It
cannot even come close to being classified among TOMMY BOY, BILLY MADISON,
HAPPY GILMORE, and even WAYNE'S WORLD, all of which were pretty good really.
It is better than BEVERLY HILLS NINJA however, but that's not too hard to
accomplish.
AUSTIN POWERS is an extremely crude and vulgar film. Sure, most of it is
enuendo and double entendres, but I still question if this movie shouldn't
have gotten an "R" rating. Even among the wild vulgarity and sex that is
prevelant in PG-13 films, AUSTIN POWERS manages to cry out in excess.
The fact of the matter is that AUSTIN POWERS is, for the most part, idiotic
and unfunny. Mike Meyers, who plays the lead character, also has a problem
with showing off. Some bits are obvious show off segments that have no
purpose in the story. It is also obvious that teenagers are going to make up
the bulk of those who see the film, so one must wonder if they'll even
recognize the 60's satire and James Bond parodies. Alas the cheap, cliched
teenage saving point . . . the aforementioned vulgarity.
AUSTIN POWERS will likely be hailed among some as hilarious, and it isn't
awful or unwatchable, but that doesn't make it a good movie. Two stars is
plenty for this lame, vulgar farce.

Title
Review for Amadeus (1984)
There is an excruciatingly fine line between madman and genius. Wolfgang
Amadeus Mozart seemed to dance along that line like a tightrope walker at a
three ring circus. AMADEUS thrills it's audience with an excellent
interpretation of both sides of one of the greatest composers the world has
ever known.
After a suicide attempt, Antonio Salieri (F. Murray Abraham in an Academy
Award winning role), winds up in a mental institution. Once the court
composer for Emperor Joseph II (Jeffrey Jones), it is in this institution
that the story of AMADEUS is related by Salieri to a priest. He tells how his
jealousy for Mozart (Tom Hulce) led to a disdain for God, the God who put the
passion but not the talent inside of him. He tells how his own cravings for
what Mozart possessed led to his, and Mozart's, demise.
AMADEUS is a look at Salieri and the insane jealousy he held for Mozart. From
the time he was a little boy, music consumed Salieri's soul. He wanted
nothing more than to be a legacy in the musical world; a genius whose name
would live on forever, synonymous with "great music". Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart
seemed to ruin all that for him. Mozart's musical masterpieces tortured
Salieri's own shortcomings. Salieri watched in silent rage as Mozart went on
to do all the things he dreamed to do. He watched as his own work was mocked
by the irreverent Mozart. Eventually it would be the passion that these two
shared that would bring the downfall of each.
There isn't much more of a plot than that. It's simply a biographical film
that's just as much about Salieri as it is about Mozart. What makes this film
so great isn't the story line so much as the perfection in it's presentation.
Abraham and Hulce are both brilliant, the costumes are fantastic, and the
emotional involvement is surprisingly rich. Never would you suspect that
Mozart was such a comical, improper, yet intellectual being. This is also a
wonderful lesson in classical music as we get a hefty does of Mozart's work.
Then there is one of the final scenes: On his deathbed, Mozart dictates the
music in his head to Salieri. Words can not describe how perfect this scene
is. The way it portrays Mozart's genius *is* ingenious! It is so well done
that I would sit through this movie over and over again just to see it. It's
truly one of the most brilliant, most moving, and well done pieces of film I
have ever seen!
Sometimes it is just as hard to say why a film should get four stars as it is
to say why it shouldn't. A lot of times, it's just a matter of the way it
makes you feel. While AMADEUS, at times, moved at a slow but hectic pace, it
is still such a well done film that it needs four stars for there to be any
justice. It isn't for everyone, and, like any biography, whether it be a
movie or a book, it can be technical and "boring" to the right (or wrong)
people. While it is hard to pinpoint exactly *why* this film is great, it
simply is. It's probably not something you'll want to sit through again and
again, but it is a brilliant piece of work. Even if you only see it once,
AMADEUS deserves to be seen.

Title
Review for Money Talks (1997)
Apparantly money talks . . . and uses quite a bit of obscenities doing so!
I've always considered myself pretty open about the gratuity a film can
possess, whether in language, violence, sex, or what have you. I find that
this fact gives me a little more leverage to complain when a movie goes
overboard, and MONEY TALKS definitely does! It's not so much that the movie
swore nearly constantly (and I mean constantly!), but it swore SO MUCH that
it seemed overly prominent and way too staged. Perhaps if one character were
foul mouthed, but in this film, EVERYBODY swears nearly every other word.
MONEY TALKS is about a black ticket scalper named Franklin Hatchett (played
less annoyingly than expected by Chris Tucker). Franklin is your typical
con-man and ends up with more than one person out to get him. When the plot
finally gets underway, there's no less than three people (or groups) that
want him, dead or alive. The Frenchman who's somewhat responsible for
Franklin's escape from a prisoner-packed bus, a hoodlum whom Franklin owes
seven grand, and the cops who wrongly suspect him of murder.
Franklin's only hope: James Russell (Charlie Sheen), an investigative
reporter for the local news who's out to prove himself a worthy journalist.
James offers to help clear Franklin's name if Franklin will just allow him an
exclusive report to help channel 12 conquer sweeps week. Both of these
elements are completely lost along the way however, and never do reappear.
As expected, the odd couple of Franklin and James do wind up friends at the
end, which is another wasted element seeing as how they show no signs of
becoming friends at any point along the way. There is just nothing original
or intriguing about this film, and so many developments are either
non-relevant, or just plain forgotten about. MONEY TALKS is a
paint-by-numbers movie that lacks any real involvment with the audience.
Frivilous dialogue, a predictable, flat storyline, and two-dimensional
characters make MONEY TALKS a reason to save your money.

Title
Review for Bean (1997)
British Comedy has somewhat of a cult following in America. Like Trekkies
(and I hope that I don't have to explain what those are), extreme fans of
British Comedy are very devote enthusiasts when it comes to their choice of
"quality television". But whether you're more likely to recognize names such
as John Cleese and Rowan Atkinson (who plays Mr. Bean) or Jean-Claude Van
Damme and Chuck Norris, BEAN the movie is sure to disappoint.
The problem is that BEAN is likely to attract, at least for the most part,
only die hard fans of the brainless British buffoon. Yet it is this same
group who will likely find the movie so sadly disappointing. For one, some of
the gags in the film are taken directly from the TV show! But is seeing Mr.
Bean with a turkey stuck on his head any funnier when it takes place in L.A.
as opposed to the United Kingdom? Not really. For another, even the "fresh"
material falls so far short of the Mr. Bean that people have come to know and
love, that it won't really matter.
Those who are unfamiliar with Mr. Bean may enjoy the film more than those
expecting a 90-minute interpretation, but BEAN doesn't ignite any of the
charm that the television series has. The wonderful doofiness that this
character possesses is nearly lost in a big screen adaption.
BEAN does have a fairly short running time, even for a comedy. But this fact
does not prevent the movie from seeming to drag a tad too long. And when they
try to cram a serious plot twist in near the end, the tone of the movie
prevents the audience from really caring. In fact, it's merely a distracting
obstacle in the plot that serves the story nil. But then again, how else are
you going to fit in those "oh-so-funny" hospital bits?
Ok, so I laughed a few times. And like so many other movies, there were some
funny scenes that made me wish I could recommend this film. But there just
isn't enough here to get a recommendation out of me. If you really want to
savor Mr. Bean, you'd be much better off buying the available videos that
contain episodes from the TV series. And with the price of movie admissions
going up more and more, even your wallet might be grateful!

Title
Review for Kiss or Kill (1997)
KISS OR KILL is an Australian film, which will probably make what I'm about to
say all the more politically incorrect - but here I go anyway: KISS OR KILL
would've been a million times better if it had been done more Hollywood-like.
Yes, that's right - even though we usually hear the opposite about a movie,
KISS OR KILL could've used a more glamorizing, sensationalistic approach.
Writer/director Bill Bennet gives us a product that seems more like a film-
school project. It's low-key, somewhat amateurish, and in a film class it
would probably be hailed as a creative masterpiece. But in the "real world" of
movie-goers, this is not an enjoyable hour and a half. Put in the hands of a
more "commercial" director, and with some retouches to the script, I think
KISS OR KILL could've had some real potential at being a unique, fresh, and
fun adventure/romance flick. Sadly, it is not.
KISS OR KILL is the story of two young lovers who travel Australia conning
lustful men. Nikki (Frances O' Connor), the female of the duo, hangs out in
the bars seducing married men. When they go back to the guy's apartment for a
drink, she slips him a couple of pills, he falls asleep, and she robs him
blind. Then along with her boyfriend Al (Matt Day), they travel on until they
find the next victim.
The first time we actually see this happen, however, something goes wrong. The
guy Nikki drugged isn't just sleeping, he's dead! As Nikki and Al ransack the
dead guy's personal belongings, they argue over what's happened. They're
attention soon turns to different matters however. They discover a videotape
of well known sports-figure Zipper Doyle (Barry Langrishe) in bed with a young
boy. Shocked and disgusted, Nikki calls Zipper and leaves a harsh message on
his answering machine.
The two lovers take off once again, while back at the hotel room, the cops are
investigating the dead body. They suspect murder and begin a hunt for Nikki
and Al. Meanwhile, aware of the missing tape, Zipper too takes off searching
for the duo. We follow Nikki and Al as they travel from place to place, and
although we never actually see it happen, the people they meet tend to wind up
dead and robbed. When Nikki and Al fight about how the victims died, it
becomes obvious that we can't be sure who did it, whether it be one of Nikki
and Al or not.
KISS OR KILL really does have a good *idea* behind it, but it also has too
many flaws. Mainly, it scores high in the three U's: Underdevelopment,
Uneventfulness, and Unevenness. If this film had taken more time to develop
it's characters and give them depth, this film could have been a real gem in
today's prosaic market. Sadly, it just never gets rolling. Then there's the
editing. For a moment I was quite delighted with the non-stop jump cuts. They
never deviated from the scene or focus, but merely added a jumpy quality to
the film. For a moment, you're quite dazzled by this, but it doesn't take long
at all for it to become an annoying, overdone characteristic that is anything
but becoming. If Bennet had used this technique merely for introductions, it
would have proved to be a unique and artistic use of "poetic license", but
when it's used throughout the entire film, one wants to swat at the screen as
though it were a fly endlessly buzzing in their face.
As seems to happen all too often in movies, there are a few rare things that
*almost* make the movie recommendable. In this case, it's the acting.
Unfortunately it isn't the two leads who provide this wonderful acting. While
O' Connor and Day show that they indeed have potential, they are wasted in
frivolousness and, at times, downright silliness. But it is Chris Haywood and
Andrew S. Gilbert (as detectives Hummer and Crean, respectively) who just
don't get enough screen time to really shine, although we do get a peak at
their brilliance. In particular, a bewitching little exchange in a diner
(heavily influenced by PULP FICTION) shows us what we've been missing. This
laugh-out-loud moment makes one lament over the fact that there was so much
potential lost in this film. In addition, Max Cullen as Stan the "not-all-
there" motel-keep, is also quite winsome but underused.
Overall, KISS OR KILL may be worth a disheartening look merely for it's
potentiality, but nothing more. It may wind up being a good example of what
*not* to do when making a motion-picture. The faults stand out enough that you
could actually take notes on what to avoid. I constantly found myself thinking
of ways I'd improve the film, and as a possible re-write, this could be one
for the books. Instead of coming away angry and disappointed, KISS OR KILL
makes you want to help the film. It has enough there to make you *want* to
enjoy it, but not enough to really win you over. In the end, you won't want to
chastise Bennett for his shortcomings - you'll be more likely to pat him on
the back and say, "Nice try. Better luck next time."

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
Do film critics have morals? Are there any unwritten laws an ethical movie
critic would or should follow? Naturally we don't want to go into a film with
any preconceived notions, which is pretty tough but something we all have to
accomplish. Secondly, and along the same line, we can't prejudge a film
because of it's stars, director, etc. The difference? Well, in the first one,
we'd go into a film thinking it's going to be dumb or it's going to be good,
and that would affect our viewing (that movie sounds and looks dumb, so I'm
not expecting much). On the second hand, we're simply assuming it will be bad
or good because of a personal "grudge" against the film company (It's made by
Disney? Oh, it's just a merchandising ploy then), the actors (Jim Carrey's in
it? It's gonna stink!), or the director (who? can't be that good). This is
more of a biased viewpoint as opposed to a first impression viewpoint. Make
sense? Ok, but what about comparing? Isn't that kind of along the same lines?
When we compare a certain actor or director or even composer's credibility in
one film to another they were involved in, is that really fair? Sure, in
sequels you can expect and accept comparisons a lot more, but what about
JACKIE BROWN, for example? Is it fair for me to take the review and turn it
into a comparison of PULP FICTION, just because Quentin Tarantino directed and
wrote the screenplay for both?
I think it is, and I'll tell you why. A good critic should be able to view the
film from the "average joe (or jane)" viewpoint, while still taking into
account the artistic integrity behind the film. Sometimes that can be tough.
"The acting was superb, but I was bored" or "I loved it!! It was sooooo
cheezy!" might be used to describe a film. These are contradictions, and a
critic has to weigh both sides and come to a suitable balanced critique. But
which is more important? And which is better? An extremely well shot and acted
film that is boring, or a really amateurish film that you wanna go back to
again and again? Getting back to the point, my philosophy on comparing films
being fair works because we're reflecting what the public wants to know
anyway. Every average person out there who's interested in this film is likely
to ask "How does it compare to PULP FICTION?" And so, as a critic, I'm already
responsible to ask that same question.
JACKIE BROWN stars Pam Grier, the "Blaxploitation" heroine from the 1970's,
who is likely to make a big comeback thanks to her role as the title
character. Tarantino's PULP FICTION is in big part responsible for John
Travolta's sudden revival in the movie industry, and with talks of an Oscar
nomination, the same is likely to happen for Grier. (We've made it thru
comparison #1!) Jackie is a 44-year-old airline stewardess who brings in extra
cash, and probably her main revenue, by smuggling large sums of money into the
United States for Ordell Robbie (PULP FICTION's Samuel L. Jackson and
comparison #2). Ordell is in the illegal firearms business and has enlisted
the aid of Louis Gara (Robert De Niro), a bank robber who just got out of
prison after serving four years, to help him accomplish a scheme worth a half-
million dollars.
Trouble arises when Jackie is stopped by ATF agent Ray Nicolet (Michael
Keaton) and taken into custody for possession of narcotics, as well as having
more money than is allowed in an airport without being claimed. Naturally this
proves an obstacle to Ordell's plans and, not as friendly intended as we'd
hope, he posts Jackie's bail after she is put behind bars. The thing is,
Ordell is in this for no one more than himself, and as we learn from his
previous actions, he's willing to kill anyone who stands in the way. Jackie
finds herself in a tight squeeze. Ordell won't think twice about taking her
out if she fails to help him as she's always done, yet at the same time, a
compromise with the authorities would be in order if evidence against Ordell
was provided. It comes down to a simple question: would Jackie rather face
Ordell or prison?
What ensues is a rich and intriguing example of storytelling as we question
who Jackie is really out to help: the law, Ordell, or maybe just herself.
Coming into play is another 70's veteran, Robert Forster as Jackie's bail
bondsmen Max Cherry. Max's obvious fondness for Jackie will become a major
benefactor in her fight to beat both sides of the system, and Forster plays
him with subtle charm that adds depth to unbrewed romance. Also involved is
Ordell's "surfer girl" girlfriend Melanie (Bridget Fonda), a ditzy sun-
bleached babe who spends her time watching TV with a bong in hand. Fonda does
the best she can with an essentially thin role, but there's nothing more to
her, and therefore, she becomes a tossable addition to an otherwise
flourishing bouquet of characters.
De Niro is also wasted in his role as a quiet nobody crook out to score a few
bucks for himself. De Niro is a brilliant actor, but a character who hardly
ever speaks doesn't need a De Niro to play him. Compared to PULP FICTION
(comparison #3), the characters in JACKIE BROWN and very thin and replaceable.
In PULP FICTION, even the small, seemingly irrelevant characters were
wonderful, complete, and lifelike, whereas JACKIE BROWN has such common
figures that it wouldn't have suffered much with a lesser talented cast, the
exception being Grier. Tarantino wrote this script with Grier specifically in
mind, so to say that she is made for this role is a reversed truth. Sadly,
Grier too could have received a bit more attention, especially when the story
is all about her newly-jarred perception of life.
Jackson teams up with Tarantino again, but the chemical reaction isn't as
awesome as the first time. Jules was the rambling, bible-quoting hitman in
PULP FICTION, and Jackson is the only person who could have pulled it off. And
although Jackson is really, really good in JACKIE BROWN, I don't think he's
quite as irreplaceable. In fact, maybe a new face would have been better.
Jackson could've remained Tarantino's Jules, and a new guy could have become
Ordell, forever to remain so in our memories. Sadly, these characters are too
much the same, except Ordell just isn't as impressive, and putting this in the
hands of Jackson once again is only going to deter from our fond recollections
of Jules. Another problem is that Ordell is way too focused on in the
beginning. This is Grier's film, so why spend so long getting to know a man
who will become more of a supporting character as the film progresses? It not
only makes the movie feel a little too slanted, but it makes for a slow
beginning because we have to take longer getting to the meat of the story.
It is likely that those pouring into the theater to see this film are going to
be those anxious to partake of Tarantino's quirky dialogue and eccentric
directing style, and not so much those interested in seeing a silver screen
adaption of Elmore Leonard's novel "Rum Punch". For those movie-goers, don't
expect another PULP FICTION and you'll be satisfied, for the script oozes with
the familiar brash qualities that has made Tarantino an icon of 90's film-
making. The directing has toned down a bit, however, yet we're still reminded
that this is Tarantino's movie thanks to odd split-screen story-telling
devices and scenes being replayed multiple times from different viewpoints. So
getting back to the question that I began with, this isn't PULP FICTION at
all. It's good, but it isn't anything that made PULP FICTION such a
revolutionary effort in the first place. This is a more conservative
Tarantino, but not one that won't satiate true fans. If you can realize that
this isn't going to knock your socks off, then you'll be happy to at least let
it massage your feet. After all, we all know how much Tarantino loves that
particular part of the human anatomy.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
There are some pretty impressive stars in LOST IN SPACE - it's just that none
of them happen to be actors. The stars I'm referring to are the computer
generated ones that make up the movie's "outer space"; the stars that the less
impressive actors hurtle thru as they try to find their way home. Yes, in
terms of acting, the star power is . . . well, more like a falling star. Kinda
pretty, short-lived, and pretty much dead.
LOST IN SPACE, as if you really didn't know, is based on the 60's sci-fi
television series of the same name. It's the year 2058, and Earth's precious
resources are quickly being usurped by the needs of its massive population.
John Robinson (William Hurt) is the scientist leading a mission program to
colonize a foreign planet. Earth's entire existance is contingent upon a
successful mission, but nobody, whether it be John's family or hired battle
pilot Don West (Matt LeBlanc), seems too enthusiastic about leaving their home
planet for several years. John's family consists of his wife Maureen (Mimi
Rogers), his atypical teenage daughter Penny (Lacey Chabert), his ingenious
son Will (Jack Johnson), and his beautiful scientist daughter Judy (Heather
Graham). Despite everyone's reluctance, the Jupiter 2 spacecraft abandons
planet Earth and makes its way into the vast eternity of space.
Unknown to anyone but the audience, there is an evil doctor stowaway
determined to sabotage the entire mission. Dr. Smith (Gary Oldman) has been
hired by a group of rebel conspirators to turn the expedition sour, and Dr.
Smith has re-programmed a talking robot to "destroy Robinson family"! When
everything that could go wrong does go wrong for both sides, the spaceship is
warped to an unknown destination, and now the premise of being lost in space
is complete. As for the audience, you will likely be lost in boredom by this
point, wondering if the plot, like the Jupiter 2, will ever get off the
ground. It's hard to tell who deserves the most blame - the incredibly bland
and corny characters or the horrifically lame script? Chabert is basically the
only one to overdo it, sounding like a whiny munchkin on helium. If you, like
me, were convinced by commercials that her voice was altered for some sort of
plot twist where her body would be taken over by aliens, you're wrong! That's
just her normal voice!
In yet another example of a "Friend" faltering on the big screen, LeBlanc is
so incredibly dull and yet so obviously trying so hard to be so incredibly
charming (make sense?), it makes you want to shove his ass out the escape pod
corridor without an escape pod. Graham is a babe - thank goodness there was
something for me to think about during this film. Hurt, the black hole of
excitement, sucks up any energy that might have been left. If Hurt were
available in tablet form, he would be a prescription strength sleeping pill.
Johnson isn't dull, he's just lame as the young know it all who winds up
saving everybody's ass all the time. Want an example of how cool this kid can
be? How about when he convinces the robot to think with its heart and
reconsider killing the family? Hey, don't laugh - the thing actually listened
to the Mr. Rogers-would-be-proud sentiment. But alas, if you thought a
character couldn't be much worse, there was Rogers as the epitome of generic
(or, mother as she was known). Why hire an actress? They could've had a white
cardboard cutout with the word MOM printed on it. Now that would've had some
pizzazz!
LOST IN SPACE luckily doesn't suffer in every single category that it could
have. The special effects are crisp, clear, and at least mildly captivating,
unlike any of the presences onscreen save it be Oldman, who plays his evil
character with a great deal of fun and finesse. Unfortunately, Oldman is
locked away for most of the film, giving us nothing but ample mocking
opportunities to enjoy. While the special effects are pleasing to the eye,
they are nothing you couldn't find in most modern sci-fi films. CONTACT, for
example, far exceeds this film in terms of imagery and imagination.
LOST IN SPACE just has too many shortcomings to ever be considered a work of
cinematic art, with numerous contradictions (the time travel aspect was
horribly flawed!), wooden and corny acting, worse dialogue, and an ending so
disappointing, you'd be happier to have seen the entire Robinson family get
blown to smithereens. Then again, with an ending like this film has, it's
obvious a sequel is already being considered. What an awful note to end on,
knowing there could be more of this in a year or two. The attempt to be family
oriented is commendable, but LOST IN SPACE is lost with the illusion that
special effects and the nostalgia of a classic TV series being revisited is
enough to satisfy all age groups. Well, danger potential movie goers! Danger!
This movie crash lands without ever breaking thru the atmosphere of
mediocrity.

Title
Review for Hook (1991)
"Magical" may be a good word to describe quite a few of Steven Spielberg's
films. He's notorious for elaborately done flicks, which are often fresh and
visually superior to the run-of-the-mill movies coming out all the time.
"Magical" can also be used to describe the world of fairy tales and legends
we've all come to know and love as children. So what happens when the two
meet? HOOK - and it's a delightful result.
HOOK asks the question, "what if Peter Pan grew up?" Simple, to the point,
and very intriguing. HOOK begins in modern-day America as Peter Blanning
(Robin Williams, excellently cast), a workaholic father of two, is taking his
family back to London where he grew up. No, it's not a vacation, and we soon
learn that it probably never would be since Peter can't get away from the
demands of his office. The real reason they are heading across seas is to
attend a special dinner in honor of Wendy Darling (Maggie Smith), the
"mother" of orphaned Peter and several others. We also quickly learn that
Peter's family relationship has suffered considerably due to his 25 hour
business days. He misses his son's soccer games, he pays more attention to
his cellular phone than his daughter's performance in a play, and although
it's never addressed, he probably hasn't made love to his wife in months.
While in London, the temperatures continue to rise (metaphorically speaking).
Even on the other side of the Atlantic, Peter can't get away from pressing
business matters and non-stop phone calls. Nonetheless, Peter, his wife Moira
(Caroline Goodall), and Granny Wendy head off to the award banquet, leaving
the two children in care of some no name maid (or something - Hell, I don't
know). While they're gone, tragedy strikes. Jack and Maggie (Charlie Korsmo
and Amber Scott respectively), the two kids, get kidnapped by none other than
Captain James Hook (Dustin Hoffman).
Naturally everybody freaks out and Phil Collins shows up playing a police
officer. Sorry folks, no rock video forms here. The only evidence left behind
is a note nailed, well actually "sworded" to the bedroom door from Captain
Hook. It seems ole' Hook wants a rematch with his "only worthy opponent", and
he's going to use the kids to make sure he gets it! 
This is where things get interesting: Granny Wendy *is* the Wendy from the
beloved fairytales! And, as she explains to Peter, he *is* actually thee
Peter Pan. One day, long ago, Peter Pan never returned to Never-Never Land
(tongue twister, ain't it?) and finally grew up. But because Peter became
Peter Blanning and blacked out that part of his memory, it's as much as shock
to him as it is to us (in theory). And so, with nothing more to really be
done, Peter ends up flying the friendly skies back to Never-Never Land to
reclaim his children.
HOOK is actually quite an admirable film and, with a couple of exceptions,
couldn't have been cast better. Williams plays both Blanning and Pan to a T.
They could *not* have found a better man (or woman for that matter - think
Mary Martin). Hoffman *is* Captain Hook, mixing the perfect amount of evil
and cowardice to the role while Smith, Korsmo, Scott, and Bob Hoskins as Smee
are all wonderful and damn-near flawless. It's Julia Roberts as Tinkerbell
that really sinks and stinks. She's annoying and although she's probably
supposed to maintain a sense of youth and playfulness being a pixie and all,
she comes off more like some kid overly eager to charm us. Then again, when
most of your lines are spoken to yourself, it could be mighty hard to play
off of.
The sets and effects here are another delight. Seemingly simplistic at first,
the Never-Never Land sets add quite a bit of depth and realism to the film,
making it fun to watch as Peter re-discovers his true homeland. And while the
special effects are not those of flashy sci-fi movies, they are quite well
done and a pleasure to watch.
HOOK doesn't quite hold enough to be deemed a classic, but it does rise high
above mediocrity with it's dynamic acting, captivating cinematography, and an
enchanting musical score by John Williams. All of that tops off a richly
intriguing plot with a definitive hook (pun heavily intended). If you're
looking for some good family fare, this might just do you in!

Title
Review for Shawshank Redemption, The (1994)
THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is by far one of the very very best, if not THEE
best film of the 1990's. It is one of the most rich examples of cinema of
recent time and truly lets it be known that "movies" can be forms of art in
every sense. This film was the film that was nominated for everything and yet
won nothing, a very sad and undeserved disappointment. It was beat out by
BRAVEHEART for the Best Picture Oscar in 1995, and to be honest, I would hate
to have to decide between the two.
THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is based on a short story by Stephen King, but,
before you jump to any conclusions, it does not involve the occult,
supernatural, or any ghosts, ghouls, and goblins. It is the story of Andy
Dufresne (Tim Robbins best role to date), the successful vice president
banker, is on trial for the murder of his wife and her lover. As we quickly
learn, she was having a steamy affair with some unknown golf pro, and both
were shot to death in bed just minutes after Andy, drunk and carrying a
loaded pistol, waited outside the lover's house. With no other suspects and a
gun that was never found, Andy is sadly sentenced to two life-sentences for
double homicide.
The story is narrated by our other central character of the plot: a black,
slightly older prisoner simply known as "Red" (played magnificently by Morgan
Freeman). Red seems to be the most sympathetic, mature, and sensible prisoner
at Shawshank, the New England prison where we do time along with the inmates.
He is also known for being able to smuggle in anything you need (within
reason that is). He is a self-proclaimed "Sears & Roebuck", and from the
moment Andy arrives, something draws Red to him. Andy seems so peaceful,
humble, and even unaware of his dreary surroundings and his dreary reality.
Even when he is raped and beaten, he manages to go about every day as though
he had no cares in the world.
SHAWSHANK doesn't take long to get you so engrossed in it's characters, that
you find it impossible not to care about them and what they're going to do
next. You feel their pain, you smile with their happiness, and you feel
desperate with their desperation. Such character driven movies are always my
favorite. They're the kind of movies where most of the plot and intrigue is
simply getting to know the characters, making them real and tangible, and as
much a part of your life as they can be. SHAWSHANK succeeds where so many
others don't.
THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is such a beautifully done picture that it makes it
hard to write about. Words like "great", "fantastic", and "wonderful" are so
overused and unjustifying for such a masterpiece. But, for the lack of better
words, the cinematography IS great, the depth of the story IS fantastic, and
the acting, direction, and everything else IS absolutely wonderful. It is a
touching film that could (and should) bring a tear to your eye despite it's
depressing overtones.
To repeat myself, as I can find no other way to praise this film, THE
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is truly a masterpiece and one of the best of the best
movies of the decade. If you miss this one, you ARE missing out on something
spectacular! Morgan Freeman, Tim Robbins, director Frank Darabont, and
cinematographer Roger Deakins all deserve the highest acclaims. This IS an
instant classic!

Title
Review for Baby-Sitters Club, The (1995)
THE BABY-SITTERS CLUB is actually quite a rare gem in today's world of
movies, particulary those movies aimed at pre-teens. It's nothing
spectacular, but it is a pleasant film that deserves the PG less than many
Disney films. It's a movie about friendship and honesty, and it's presented
with a lot more class than we're used to seeing, however cornballish it may
come off at first.
THE BABY-SITTERS CLUB is about a group of seven baby-sitters (imagine that!)
and the summer day camp they start with the hopes of bringing in a little
extra cash. This particular aspect of the plot is merely the glue to hold the
film together as we explore a more crucial element: Kristy (Schuyler Fisk),
the founder of the BSC, has seemed a little distant and nobody in the club,
save it be Kristy's best friend Mary Anne (Rachael Leigh Cook), knows why.
The audience knows that it's because her biological father has come back into
her life after a six-year dry spell, but to everybody else, she's just become
irresponsible and distant. You see, Kristy's father has asked her not to let
anyone know he's in town.
There are a few subplots, the most apparent involving 13-year old Stacey (Bre
Blair), whose involved with 17-year old Luca (Christian Oliver) . . . and
Luca has no idea she's not at least "almost sixteen". Then there's Claudia
(Tricia Joe) who will be forced to quit the club should she fail science
class. A lot of characters are kind of lost in the shuffle. The only
character we REALLY get to know is Kristy. As can be somewhat expected from a
film carried by young actors, it can be a little hokey, but it's sweetly so
and not to be discounted.
THE BABY-SITTERS club is no masterpiece, and the character development needed
just a little more to it, but I think the word that sums it up nicely would
be "delightful". It's the kind of movie that doesn't hit high marks, but when
it's thru, you just might find a nice little smile on your face. I did :-)

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
How many of us would become strippers? For those of us who wouldn't, is it a
moral reason, or purely a lack of confidence? That's probably not a fair
question, and for a lot of us, it could very well be for neither of those
reasons. As you watch THE FULL MONTY, however, you may begin asking yourself
these kinds of questions. Would you be willing to grin and bare it to bring in
some much needed dough?
In case you haven't guessed, THE FULL MONTY is about stripping, but STRIPTEASE
it ain't. It's actually quite a charming comedy that uses its ideas with a
great deal of tact and sophistication. It is the story of six out-of-work,
out-of-shape blue collar Brits whose recent job losses have left the boys
penniless, but not without need. What to do? It hits our main character Gaz
(Robert Carlyle) as he notices the large crowds of women who pour into a local
male strip club on a regular basis. It seems that simple: take it off and
bring in the cash.
Eventually, Gaz is able to convince his friends to join him in starting their
own exotic dance routine despite their initial reluctance. These include the
overweight, confidence-lacking Dave (Mark Addy), the uptight, overly-officious
Gerald (Tom Wilkinson), the once suicidal Lomper (Steve Huison), and two
additional fellows who gain their place among the group by audition: Horse
(Paul Barber), an older gentlemen chock full of graceless energy, and Guy
(Hugo Speer), a young well-endowed looker who compares himself to Cary Grant.
When the sextet is complete, we're given a hefty dose of physical comedy. We
watch the bumbling middle-aged men choreograph pseudo-sexy dance numbers, all
the while proving why none of them were strippers in the first place. As if
there anti-appeal wasn't enough, they decide to boost interest in the group by
promising "the full monty" on opening night, which for us Americans, means
baring it all . . . and I mean *all*.
The movie actually ends on opening night; a hilarious applause worthy ending I
might add. It's sure to leave nothing short of a big smile on your face as you
leave the theater. With the subject matter, you might not expect THE FULLY
MONTY to be such a feel-good, almost inspiring film, but it surprisingly turns
out that way. The amount of light, touching drama also comes as a nice
surprise, never feeling off-balance from the otherwise highly upbeat moments
of the film. There's a lot more to this movie than you might think in other
words, and the ensemble cast couldn't be better. Each character is completely
individual, interesting, funny, and most importantly, real.
THE FULL MONTY is never offensive, a very impressive attribute since its
subject matter alone could've easily fallen prey to tastelessness. It's one of
those movies that is best described as a solid piece of entertainment, perfect
for a great night on the town, or as a Saturday night movie rental. Either way
you see it, it shouldn't let you down in the slightest. And, pun heavily
intended, when it's all said and done, you'll be smiling from cheek to cheek.

Title
Review for Life Less Ordinary, A (1997)
Sometimes a movie comes along that falls somewhat askew of the rest. Some
people call it "original" or "artsy" or "abstract". Some people simply call
it "trash". A LIFE LESS ORDINARY is sure to bring about mixed feelings.
Definitely a Generation-X aimed movie, A LIFE LESS ORDINARY has everything
from claymation to profane angels to a Karaoke-based musical dream sequence.
WHEW! Anyone in their 30's or above is probably not going to grasp what can
be enjoyed about this film. It's somewhat silly, it's somewhat outrageous,
and it's definitely not your typical romance story, but for the right
audience, it works.
A lot of hype has been surrounding this film due to the fact that it comes to
us from the same team that brought us TRAINSPOTTING. Well sorry folks, but I
haven't seen TRAINSPOTTING so I can't really compare. Whether that works in
this film's favor or not is beyond me. But I do know this: Ewan McGregor,
whom I had never had the pleasure of watching, definitely charmed me. He was
great! Cameron Diaz's character was uneven and a bit hard to grasp. The
audience may find it difficult to care about her, thus discouraging the hopes
of seeing her unite with McGregor after we are immediately sucked into caring
about and identifying with him. Misguided? You bet. Loveable? You bet.
A LIFE LESS ORDINARY was a delight and even had a bonus for me when I
realized it was filmed in my hometown of Salt Lake City, Utah. This was just
one more thing I didn't know about this movie when I sat down with a five
dollar order of nachos and a three dollar Coke. Maybe not knowing the premise
behind this film made for a pleasant surprise, but I think even if I had
known, I would have been just as happy. A LIFE LESS ORDINARY is quirky,
eccentric, and downright charming! Not for everyone, but a definite change of
pace for your typical night at the movies.

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
I admit that I was very excited to see "Gattaca", and perhaps my expectations
influenced my feelings about the film, either good or bad. I think this is
probably common thing that happens to movie critics. The premise for this
movie really intrigued me, and I've been anxious to see it ever since I saw
my first preview for it a few months ago.
The point is, I quite liked this film. I battled with myself over whether it
deserved more than 3 stars, but to be completely honest, it probably doesn't
deserve more. DESERVE being the main factor.
The plot for "Gattaca" is very intriguing though. The issues it brings up,
even by themselves, made this film so noteworthy. Sure, some people will
argue that similar things have indeed been done, but I still found this film
to be very magnetizing. The main problem here is the lack of character
development. I didn't find the stoic-ness of the actors to be quite as
negative as many critics seemed to. I think their lack of emotional depth was
all part of the story; part of what it was trying to say about the future.
Still, the characters did need more attention, and perhaps their "true
feelings" should have been buried deep down, stiffled, but making themselves
known here and there. Instead, the people just seemd to be void of emotions.
That may work for what the movie is trying to say, but when it comes to some
of the central characters, we needed more to draw us in.
The opening visuals were great. Nothing profound, but still, near microscopic
images of falling fingernails, hairs, and skin cells were very well done.
Nice imagery to start out the film.
There were also a few problems with the plot besides character development.
Some unanswered questions remained at the films end. Subtle continuities were
passed over, but probably nothing to worry about. Other things, however, just
seemed too simple or too implausable within the futuristic setting. "If they
can do this in the future, how come they can't do this?" Those are the kinds
of things that went thru my mind.
This review sounds harsh and negative, but I do want to stress that I quite
enjoyed the film and I would definitely recommend it. I think that all my
"ranting and raving" was more to help myself feel at peace for not giving it
a higher grade. That's how much I liked it. This is one of those films where
I have to remind myself that QUALITY and ENJOYABILITY are not quite the same.
Still, this is definitely a worthy effort!

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
A lot of times a three-star film will be my favorite. They're usually the
kind of movie I can watch most often too. They're usually not too deep,
allowing for semi-brainless relaxation, and at the same time, not too dumb.
MEN IN BLACK is a four-star three-star film. (Hope you could follow that one)
MEN IN BLACK doesn't wait to get to the fun. Just minutes into the film we
are introduced to Agent Kay (Tommy Lee Jones), introduced to an alien, and
introduced to the the awesome memory-diminishing tool that all MiB agents
use. After all, you can't have alien witnesses running around with that kind
of knowledge can you?
MEN IN BLACK is, of course, the organization which "moniters all
extra-terrestrial activity on Earth". NYPD officer James Edwards (Will
Smith), is on a routine foot chase when suddenly the no-good punk he's
chasing starts leaping up buildings and blinking more than one pair of eyes.
The alien delivers the simple message that the world is going to end, and
with that, dives off of a roof. Naturally nobody believes his story . . .
nobody that is, except for the top secret organization that not even the
government is aware of. 
Edwards then meets Agent Kay, the man who never seems to crack a smile, and
is introduced to the MiB. Edwards winds up joining the team and is stripped
of anything that can point back to him (birth certificate, drivers license,
and even the literal removal of his fingerprints). James Edwards no longer
exists. Meet Agent Jay.
Agent Kay takes the rookie Jay under his wing as they go about "regular"
duties. Eventually a far more treacherous event comes into play. A "bug" has
landed on Earth and is going to wipe out mankind if these two don't (or
can't) stop it. The plot isn't exactly clear, but we know it has to do with a
galaxy as big as a jewel or marble being sought after on Earth, and that is
crucial that the MiB find it before the "bug" does.
Barry Sonnenfeld, who also did the ADDAMS FAMILY films, directs this nicely.
It's fun, it's funny, it's action-packed. A nice summer blockbuster as it
rightfully turned out to be. This is one of those movies that is just "fun"
and can't really be summed up any nicer or clearer. Will Smith and Tommy Lee
Jones both do great jobs and both are a blast to watch. Definitely one of the
best films of the the summer of '97, MEN IN BLACK comes highly recommeded
from me!

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Yeah, yeah, the advertisements didn't even try to conceal the fact that this
movie had only one hook - sex. Neve Campbell and STARSHIP TROOPER's Denise
Richards getting it on? Ok! Yeah, it's a decent two minutes of film erotica,
but even if that's your main interest in this film, there's plenty of
cheeziness to sit thru in exchange for those two minutes.
WILD THINGS does have a lot more to think about than you might expect however.
Nearly every single scene is a huge plot twist guaranteed to leave you
guessing, or at least curious to see the next turn, throughout the entire
movie. But this fast-paced, razor-sharp turning of events doesn't leave much
time to enjoy the surprises. We start off in a high-class California high
school where every student resembles a supermodel in the making. Guidance
counselor Sam Lombardo (Matt Dillon) seems to catch the eye of every student,
particularly Kelly Van Ryan (Richards), daughter of the locally prestigious
family whose social status is about as high as their bank accounts. Right off
the bat, Kelly is using every asset she has in an effort to seduce "Mr.
Lombardo". The fund-raiser car wash seems the opportune time, particularly
when you wash your guidance counselor's jeep in all white clothes and take
plenty of precautions to insure you'll be soaked from head to toe when you're
done.
On the weekend of the car wash, Kelly's attempts at seduction fall flat, and
when they do, she concocts the tale that Sam in fact raped her that day.
Naturally Sam is thrown into a state of panicked shock at these accusations.
But the otherwise unsubstantial fabrications soon lead to a criminal trial
when a low-class, marijuana smoking student by the name of Suzie Toller
(Campbell) comes forth with a near identical story, also involving her trusted
guidance counselor. Pitting himself against the communities most respected
names and authoritarians, Sam must prove his innocence thru the aid of his
makeshift defense attorney, Ken Bowden, played by Bill Murray. Yes, that Bill
Murray!
Sound like a good, complete movie? Yes, that alone could have been, but this
is just the beginning. In fact, the trial is over about fifteen or twenty
minutes into the film. It is merely used to launch the most twisted story of
recent time. By the time the movie finishes, you will have gone thru every
plot twist imaginable. Unfortunately, with so much going on, you're not given
enough time in one predicament to be as effectively shocked when a new twist
comes about. This is just one way director John McNaughton fails to make this
movie as fun as it could've been. The 113 minutes fly by, and although it
never feels underdeveloped, this pretzel of storytelling could've been much
more richly realized had a slower pace been taken.
The acting is incredibly reminiscent of Fox prime-time soap operas, which no,
is not a good thing. And it's not just Campbell, who happens to hail from the
prime-time Fox soap "Party of Five", but everyone suffers from heavily
melodramatic overtones. Dillon, who was so charming in his understated role in
last year's IN & OUT, gives the best performance, and Murray's surprising
appearance adds some comedic flare to the film. In fact, if the whole movie
had been promoted as a subtle comedy, even if it was the exact same film, I
would actually give it a better grade. That's how cheezy it comes off. But
aside from these two, the rest offer nothing more than some good eye-full's.
In the right hands, WILD THINGS could've been a wickedly delightful,
scrumptiously twisted thriller, but instead we get juvenile overuses of
profanity and some very laughable displays of acting. And what's up with these
people passing as high school students? I realize Hollywood often casts older
actors to play teenage roles, but when I realized it wasn't supposed to be a
college they were at, I had to snicker. 
I won't lie - this is definitely a guilty pleasure. As corny as it is, it's
got some interesting aspects and could deserve at least a "B" for effort. But
if you just want to admire Denise Richards, go for last year's STARSHIP
TROOPERS, which was every bit as campy, but a million times better. Of course,
if seeing her breasts is your most important goal, you'll be right at home
with WILD THINGS. Perhaps the wildest thing of all is that somebody actually
looked at this and thought it deserved to be in theaters.

Title
Review for Fierce Creatures (1997)
If there's one thing I hate, it's movies where adults acting juvenile is meant
to be humorous. You know, those films where we see adults making vulgar
remarks, farting, belching, and pulling silly faces. I was so sure that's what
I was in for about two minutes into FIERCE CREATURES that I jumped to the
conclusion it would be one of the worst films of the year. Luckily there's a
thing called improvement.
The cast of 1988's A FISH CALLED WANDA reunites nearly a decade later for yet
another wild comedy caper, this time surrounding the possible shutdown of a
zoo in Great Britain that was recently acquired by multi-billion dollar
industry, Octopus Inc. Kevin Kline, who won an Oscar for his performance in
the aforementioned film, plays a duel role as Octopus Inc. president Rod
McCain and his chauvinistic son, Vince. When the Marwood Zoo is taken under
the wings of the company, Vince finds himself traveling to England along with
Willa Weston (Jamie Lee Curtis), the seductive independent-woman type whose
business knowledge is hoped to improve the dwindling profit brought in by the
zoo. Right off the bat we're introduced to unfunny jokes such as "Are your
breasts real?". Why this is considered funny, I'll never know, and why Curtis'
character seems to react to every sexual-harassing comment with silent
flattery is another mystery.
When they actually arrive in England, things start to pick up pace, and if you
haven't given up on the film by then, you're actually in for quite a few
treats. Here we are introduced to Rollo Lee (John Cleese), a seemingly snooty
and self-absorbed zoo director whose plan for improving zoo profits involves
discarding all the furry, loveable animals and keeping only "fierce creatures"
on display. Once they got involved with the events taking place in the zoo,
signs of redemption begin making themselves known, and after the twenty or so
minutes of absolute awfulness, something wonderful happened. I found myself
laughing. Amazingly, it was something I found myself doing often from then on
out.
The idea to turn the zoo into a vicious-animal museum is soon forgotten as
Vince barges in and takes over. Putting Rollo in his place, he turns the zoo
into an advertising haven, where banners and posters for various companies
hang from every available structure, the zoo keeps uniforms start resembling
those worn by NASCAR racers, and illegitimate celebrity endorsements for
varying creatures are boasted. A lot of ideas sparkle with potential but
aren't fully realized as our attention turns more toward a possible Rollo-
Willa romance and a conniving Vince out to embezzle millions. Still, there is
a surprising amount of well-done physical comedy to keep us laughing without
insulting us with immature slapstick. It's just that those moments of
immaturity keep creeping up.
What brings FIERCE CREATURES down so much is several self-induced humor
wounds. Just as you begin forgetting how terrible things started out, they
throw in an off-balance joke that is so moronic, you worry everything good
will be lost. It becomes a comedic roller coaster, reaching fairly high,
gliding, and then plummeting very sharply to the trenches once again. Cleese
is who makes this worthwhile, and even with the always-strong Kline on board,
it's obvious that without Cleese, this film would have nothing. Cleese's
mixture of flubbering nervousness, yet self-righteous arrogance provides the
biggest laughs, which is in dire need alongside the consistently annoying
Curtis. (Personal note: why Curtis was ever considered sexy is one of the
great mysteries I've come to encounter in the world of cinema, ranking right
up there with John Leguizamo being considered a comic "talent")
FIERCE CREATURES is actually a highly enjoyable film bogged down with a high
tally of misfires. What could have been one of the funnest comedies of the
year has too many reminders of why it isn't. All this film needed to do to win
me over was grow up a little, but that was something it refused to do. Why
watching a group of adults acting more vulgar and base than a group of junior
high students is considred entertainment to some is beyond me. Sadly, FIERCE
CREATURES tests this theory a bit too much.
FIERCE CREATURES is one worth checking out on video, and if you utilize the
stale moments to jump up for another can of soda, this just might be the
perfect movie after all.

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
If TOMORROW NEVER DIES, then how long will it take before James Bond is
eliminated? Obviously a bloody long time. Even though the first James Bond
film, DR. NO, was released 35 years ago, he's still going strong. Hell, James
Bond should be retiring by now. He *should* be well over 60, but luckily, due
to casting changes over the years, Bond is still young and fit as a fiddle,
and I don't see him taking his prune juice shaken and not stirred anytime
soon.
In this installment of the long-running super spy films, James Bond (Pierce
Brosnan) is up against a Ted Turner wannabe named Elliot Carver (Jonathan
Pryce). Carver owns a communications company that oversees a growing newspaper
called "Tomorrow", and is now branching out into television with aspirations
of even more. Carver's elaborate schemes will enable him to one day rule over
the media, including exclusive control in China. Not only that, but just to
piss people off, he's going to colorize all the classic movies. Ok, I lied
about that, but this guy is still devious.
This whole scandal is first suspected when a military fowl up results in the
deaths of several Navy officers off the coast of China. It seems the Chinese
told the H.M.S. Devonshire to turn back when it entered Chinese waters, but
the technology inside the British vessel was saying otherwise. Convinced they
were in international waters, the British stood there ground, and eventually,
a group of terrorists killed both the British soldiers and a couple of Chinese
fighter pilots as well. The Chinese think the British attacked. The British
think the Chinese attacked. Only we know that Carver was behind it all,
setting up the entire escapade for the sake of getting "good news".
So why does anybody suspect fowl play? Good question. The answer lies in
Carver's satellites, which were broadcasting on the same frequency as the
ship. Could Carver have intentionally messed with the signal? And, as Carver
himself admits, the more important question is "why?".
Naturally Bond sets out to figure it out and put a stop to it all, sleeping
with beautiful women, driving fast cars, and using whatzit gizmos created by Q
(Desmond Llewelyn) until in the end, he saves the day while never messing up
his hair. That's right - it's typical Bond. Wildly outrageous, totally
implausible, and two hours of brainless action. That's all we expect, and
that's all we want. Bond is merely a testosterone ridden Richie Rich for
adults, and TOMORROW NEVER DIES fits in just fine. But it's also nothing new
whatsoever, and there's only so much of the same stuff we can see.
What makes this one a little more fun and unique is that Bond actually teams
up with someone, and the two are nearly equal in their performances and "hero"
factor. Michelle Yeoh makes her English speaking debut here as Wai Lin, a
Chinese special agent who finds herself on the same trail as Bond. When they
continuously run into each other, convenience has them forming a team to
combat against Carver and his thugs. Yeoh is impressive and a delight to
watch, adding a spark to the film. In fact, if this had been more of a Bond
solo film again, we might actually realize enough is enough. Not with Yeoh.
She keeps things fresh, alive, and (thank heavens) new.
Teri Hatcher also has a small role as Carver's wife, Paris. Hatcher, who
became known for her sexy TV interpretation of Lois Lane, doesn't stand out in
anyway, but doesn't do too bad of a job with her role either. Her lack of
screen pizzaz could be attributed to the little screen time she receives.
She's in this a lot less than you might expect, especially after being used as
a hook in television commercials and movie trailers. In other words, if you're
out to see this film just to drool over her, you'll be spending five bucks for
about fifteen minutes of screen time. That's expensive oogling.
Also known as "Bond 18" for being the 18th "official" entry in the series,
TOMORROW NEVER DIES is the second Bond film to star Brosnan, who rose to fame
as TV's Remington Steele. How good of a job he does at portraying 007 is
something that was likely discussed heavily in reviews of GOLDENEYE, which
was, of course, his first outing as the British secret agent. Seeing as how I
didn't write a review of that film, I'm going to use this opportunity to give
my two cents - Connery will always be the best and truest Bond there was, but
Brosnan comes in a definite second. The thing that Brosnan lacks is *true*
charm. Yes, he's debonair, subtle, sophisticated, seductive, and even
articulate, but unlike Connery, he doesn't have that twinkle in his eye. You
can envision Connery bursting into a hearty laugh. Brosnan, on the other hand,
seems a bit *too* polished and serious.
Bond enthusiasts will, of course, find it crucial to see this film, and
they're not going to be disappointed. If you're not overly fond of 007, or if
you actually haven't seen him before, this is not the one to convert you to
Bondism. It goes way overboard, as any good Bond film does, yet still manages
to leave you passive to the events unfolding on screen. I guess the main
problem is that it's just getting a bit old. I actually found myself bored as
the film was wrapping up. My mind was wandering, and I was trying to see my
watch in the dark to see how much longer it could possibly go. It's not awful
- it's just beginning to feel like we *have* been watching Bond for 35 years
after all.

Title
Review for Anastasia (1997)
It's obvious that any motion picture studio would have a field day kicking
Disney butt with a full-length animated masterpiece, but it's also very
understandable. In my own little way, seeing Disney fall flat would be a bit
of a treat for me. But it's becoming more and more so everyday that people
complain Disney has gone too commercial, and this has been very apparent with
each summer "classic" they release. Still, even as Disney's grosses (and
quality) begin to dwindle, they have remained ruler of the animated celluloid
realm. Then ANASTASIA comes along. Absolutely beautifully animated,
wonderfully scored (by David Newman), and brilliantly brought to life,
ANASTASIA is better than any of the last four Disney animations combined.
Michael Eisner, eat your heart out.
Based very loosely on the actual Romanov family legend, ANASTASIA begins in
1916 Russia where young heiress Anastasia (voiced by Kirsten Dunst) lives
happily with her royal family. An evil spirited monk named Rasputin
(Christopher Lloyd) plans to put an end to all that, however, and even sells
his soul for the ability to do so. Narrowly escaping a feast of mayhem,
grandmother Dowager Empress Marie (Angela Lansbury) flees with young Anastasia
at the aid of an unknown kitchen servant and initiates a departing train as
the means of escape. It is during an attempt to board the already moving train
that Anastasia and her grandmother are split up, the young child falling back
into the crowded streets, leaving the Empress on a lone refuge to Paris,
France.
Ten years later, the same unknown kitchen boy, Dimitri (John Cusack), is now
an adult setting his goals on making a small fortune for himself. How? It
seems the Dowager Empress is offering a reward to anyone who can find her long
lost granddaughter. With insider knowledge gained thru his years as a dutiful
servant boy, Dimitri plans to cast a young woman to play Anastasia, train her
in all the royal ways, and pass her off as the authentic heiress. At about the
same time, not too far away, a strong-minded, independent young woman is being
ousted from her orphanage for acting a bit too queenly. It isn't long before
Dimitri and Anya (Meg Ryan) soon find each other and, both wanting to get to
Paris, team up to pull off the ultimate hoax the world has ever known. After
all, as Dimitri defends the morality issue behind the plan, it's possible Anya
is the real Anastasia. With no memories of her childhood intact to prove
otherwise, the two set off for Paris along with Dimitri's assistant Vladimir
(Kelsey Grammer), none of them realizing Anya is in fact Russia's forgotten
princess.
During the long trek from Russia to Paris, Dimitri trains Anya to behave like
a true heiress, but is she learning, or merely remembering? The interaction
between the two is superb. Never have animated characters seemed to talk,
move, react, and respond so realistically, particular notice going to Cusack,
who gives Dimitri a heavy sense of believability. Ryan, who comes off more Meg
Ryan-ish than ever before, has never been so likeable, turning her typical
flightiness into a strong, sophisticated young woman. This is perhaps the best
animated ensemble Hollywood has ever offered, full of likeable, unique, and
refreshing characters who genuinely come to life on the screen. Even Rasputin,
who plays a surprisingly small role in the film, is a return to a more classic
kind of cartoon villain. The problem is he was also the most uneven aspect of
the film, disappearing after some initial scenes, then returning for the out-
of-nowhere, way-too-supernatural climax. It would have been much better had
Rasputin never even been used, or at least been portrayed as a mortal
character.
But small quips aside, ANASTASIA returns us to classic fairytale territory,
brimming with hope, dreams, a sincere love story, and a surprising level of
action. The train derailment scene was more intense than many live-action
action flicks! Even the songs far eclipse Disney's past several projects. It
seems as though Fox may have had double meanings behind one of the film's
final quotes. When the Dowager Empress Marie's lady in waiting calls it "the
perfect ending", Empress Marie replies, "No, it's the perfect beginning". In
terms of ANASTASIA kicking off Fox's attack on animation heavyweight Disney,
no other words could be more accurate.

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
Losing a job is not an all too uncommon thing. Reacting to such a personal
setback by taking a group of small children hostage is a bit more rare. While
we all might feel the desire to blow someone's head off with a shotgun when
they don't seem to grasp our point of view, actually threatening them with one
is usually something we avoid. This isn't the case with Sam Baily - John
Travolta's slightly askew average-joe persona in MAD CITY.
"I don't think people listen to guys like me," Sam laments during an exclusive
interview from behind the walls of a museum. Just a few days ago, Sam was a
guard at this same museum, but when cutbacks led to the elimination of his
security position, Sam's apprehension resulted in a brash decision. In an
effort to get his ex-boss, museum director Mrs. Banks (Blythe Danner), to
"just listen", he barges into the museum one day equipped with a fully loaded
shotgun, taking the uncooperative Banks and a group of school children
hostage.
Sam's overall concern is valid enough - if he loses his job, his paycheck, his
benefits, etc., his wife and two children won't be provided for. He's not a
lunatic or a hot-tempered madman, he's somewhat like a child - panicky,
compulsive, and running on emotion - and his naive intentions aren't helped
any by the fact that Banks wasn't overly compassionate with the let go.
Overall, he's just like you and me - except that he has the capacity to view
the line we'd deem "far enough" as the starting mark of some crazy race.
Meanwhile, television reporter Max Brackett (Dustin Hoffman) is also on the
scene. Covering a "fluff" story for the evening news concerning the museum
cutbacks, Max suddenly finds himself in the middle of the biggest-breaking
news story he ever could've hoped for. Having been demoted from network
newsman to smalltime affiliate reporting, Max is anxious to turn this into
his, and only his, story.
Max immediately bonds with Sam. Max even coaches Sam thru hostage negotiations
and writes scripts for him to use with the police over the phone. At first,
Max's intentions don't stretch beyond high ratings and a good boost to the ole
pride factor, but as he gets to know Sam more personally, he begins to
sympathize and even become somewhat of an advocate for him. The media,
however, is creating a frenzy that leaves the fickle public shifting gears as
often as a diesel truck moving downhill. The accidental shooting of ex-co-
worker Cliff (Bill Nunn), a black security guard, becomes one of the main
factors in the controversy over Sam's honest ambitions.
Also involved in this film are Robert Prosky as Lou Potts, head of the news
department of the station Max falls directly under, and Alan Alda as the
nationally famed reporter Kevin Hollander, who uses his network power to try
and outshine Max. Alda and Prosky both turn in fine performances that fit like
gloves on their acting abilities. Then there is Mia Kirshner, who plays the
young TV station intern Laurie. She falls under Max's wings only to become a
student taught too well in the way of sensationalistic reporting. Kirshner's
credits are relatively small for now, including roles in films like EXOTICA
and the forgettable sequel to THE CROW. Still, Kirshner's character
transformation shows that she has shining ability to play both good girl and
kinda-bitchy-in-a-reserved-way roles. I wouldn't mind seeing her in some more
prevalent parts, where perhaps her talent will be able to blossom more fully
onscreen.
While the viewpoint of the media as a greedy, self-righteous monster has
indeed been tackled before, MAD CITY provides a solid two hours of
enjoyability. Hoffman and Travolta are both excellent actors, and seeing them
together is a real treat. They both do a great job at smoothly and naturally
becoming their characters, and they provide enough chemistry for us to
genuinely care for both. There is quite a bit of humor in this film, and
without it, it could've fallen into a drab, cliched social statement more
likely to garner sleep from the audience than applause. This isn't a flick
that will grip at both your funny bone and your heart, but it will lightly
touch both, making for a recommendable movie. If for nothing more than the
opportunity to watch both Hoffman and Travolta at the same time, I urge you to
check this one out.

Title
Review for Red Corner (1997)
Richard Gere's outspoken disapproval for Red China is the main motivation
behind RED CORNER, but making a bad movie to portray "bad" government is a bad
idea all around. Regardless of personal political convictions, it can be
assured that this film has potential to be marked "cruel and unusual
punishment" by many. If you're lucky, you'll have a choice between this film
and a good caning. I'm still split on that one.
Gere plays American businessman Jack Moore, the man responsible for handling
the overseas syndication of American television. In Beijing on a business
trip, Jack finds it hard to sell the Chinese media officials on western
entertainment, especially when the officials view such programming as
"pornographic, violent, and superstitious". Unable to convince them otherwise,
Jack spends the evening letting loose at a fashion show where he hooks up with
an artistic model and takes her back to his hotel room. Things take a
(melo)dramatic turn when Jack's awakened the next morning by Chinese police,
blood all over his clothes, and his one-night stand lying dead on the floor.
What develops (or under-develops) is a "one-man stands alone" routine as Jack
finds himself without help from the American Embassy or the assigned defense
attorney, who also happens to be convinced of her client's guilt. The attorney
is Shen Yuelin, played by the only commendable actor/actress in the film, Bai
Ling. Shen refuses to allow a guilty plea, explaining to Jack, who refuses to
comply with the plea, that there is "severity for those resist, leniency for
those who confess". This has become a tag line for the film, but trust me,
when it comes to seeing this film, resist, resist, resist!
In time, Jack begins to plant doubts in Shen's mind, and eventually, she
repeals the guilty plea and begins helping Jack search for evidence to prove
his innocence. All they know is the victim is the daughter of an influential
general, and whether this has anything to do with the case is hidden in
ambiguity (hmmmm, I wonder!), but the more they seem to discover, the more
thugs emerge from the shadows to "quiet" them. It's not a suspenseful film as
much as it strives to be. In fact, it's quite on the boring side. Gere has
always struck me as a very plain actor, and this film is just a showcase of
all that is mundane in film-making. He's just too unaffected by all the events
taking place around him, whether they be in his favor or not. We never even
get to know Jack before he's thrown into a jail cell and put on trial, so our
interest in his welfare is never achieved. As stated, Ling is the only thing
about this film that doesn't deserve a full-blown thumbs down. 
It's hard to say much about RED CORNER when it's such a bland production.
Courtroom dramas usually have a bit of depth to them as discoveries are made
and the clock ticks down. In RED CORNER, some crucial bits of information are
discovered, but the ending is sickeningly convenient and disappointing.
Regardless of events occurring in the first 115 minutes, the end result,
founded on sheer luck, would've been the same. That means all the developments
we sit through are there for nothing more than filling time. "You will be shot
in a week, and the cost of the bullet will be billed to your family," Yuelin
tells Jack at one point. Hey, I'll do ya one better: "You will be forced to
watch RED CORNER, and the cost of the ticket will be billed to your family".

Title
Review for Barney's Great Adventure (1998)
Barney, that big purple dinosaur everybody loves to hate, is finally
stampeding off your local PBS station and into movie theaters everywhere. Some
are laughing, some are vomiting, and some are just plain baffled that such an
occurrence has indeed taken place. But let's get one thing straight - Barney
is not and never was intended for adults, so, keeping that in mind, grab your
imagination caps and head into the wonderful world of BARNEY'S GREAT
ADVENTURE: THE MOVIE.
Over the river and thru the woods, Cody (Trevor Morgan), his little sister
Abby (Diana Rice), and her best friend Marcella (Kyla Pratt), are heading to
Grandma and Grandpa's house for a summer vacation. Cody, who's getting to that
mature age of 12 or so, is having doubts about the trip . . . there won't be
any cable TV to entertain him, just a farm complete with smelly, noisy pigs.
On the other hand, Abby and Marcella couldn't be happier it seems, running
around, playing hide-and-go-seek and tag, and basically using the most archaic
toy of all - their imaginations. It doesn't take long for Cody to find
something to do - he steals Abby's precious Barney doll and taunts her
relentless efforts to retrieve it. That is until, lo and behold, the 14" plush
replica of the big purple dinosaur magically transforms into the life-size,
walking and talking, singing and dancing, genuine article.
Always a skeptic, the first little bit of the film follows Cody as he tries to
shrug Barney off as an oversized, grape colored hallucination. But the more
Barney dances and prances around the barn, singing rounds with Abby and
Marcella, the harder this is for Cody to do. Eventually, the four of them
unite when a mysterious, color-changing egg is found and, thru the help of
neighbor Mildred Goldfinch (Renee Madeline Le Guerrier) and her extensive
library, they discover it is a magical wishmaker, able to grant everyone's
wish once all the colors have changed. The trouble is, the egg is constantly
being misplaced, and if it isn't returned to the exact spot it was found by
the time all the changes have taken place, it will never work. This leaves the
group on an city-wide, hour-long expedition to recover the magical egg,
allowing for plenty of sing alongs and guest appearances by Barney's humble
friends, Baby Bop and BJ.
Surprisingly, and luckily, there are very few moments that will actually make
even the most sophisticated of adults want to cringe. The only time I was
highly agitated was when Baby Bop came onscreen with her whiny, piercing
squeal of a voice. Like the television series, Barney happens to be the least
annoying character there is, and thankfully, none of those nauseatingly over-
zealous kids from the show appear in this movie. Morgan, Pratt, and newcomer
Rice all handle their roles as well as can be expected, although Pratt is
given very little to do besides tag along. Their performances are a bit corny,
but for a kids' film, not much more can realistically be anticipated, and any
hokeyness can be attributed as much to director Steve Gomer as the actors. But
once again, these are details that nobody extremely interested in seeing this
film is going to care about. The target audience of preschoolers isn't likely
to scoff at the low-budget special effects or mock the amateurish acting
abilities, and since this film is for them, and not us, why should we be so
quick to trespass on their innocent wonderment with our magicless, adult
cynicism?
All I can say is, thank heavens there's not a "Bananas in Pajamas" movie . . .
at least not yet. I know most people out there are ready to lynch Barney, but
it's those oversized Aussie fruits that scare the heck out of me. They're
creepy! So, however much you may despise Barney, there are plenty of TV shows
we should be rejoicing haven't been adapted into big screen versions,
especially when nearly every TV show seems to wind up there eventually. Did we
ever have to suffer a "Hee Haw" movie? Alas, from many of the right
perspectives, BARNEY'S GREAT ADVENTURE: THE MOVIE is quite tolerable, and if
you're under five years old, it's probably wonderful.

Title
Review for Mystery Science Theater 3000: The Movie (1996)
The premise is simple, if not bizarre. A mad scientist (Trace Beaulieu as Dr.
Clayton Forrester) launches an average-joe (Michael J. Nelson as Mike Nelson)
into space where he forces his subject to watch the most horrendous movies
ever made. Why? It's torturous, it's maniacal, and it's just plain fun. Based
on the cult-favorite cable television series, MYSTERY SCIENCE THEATER 3000:
THE MOVIE isn't torturous, but as for being maniacal and just plain fun, it
foots the bill quite nicely.
Mike Nelson, on a dog-bone shaped spacecraft, spends his days as any young man
would dream - indulging in sarcasm and horseplay, and seeing quite a few
movies. The catch is, these movies aren't the movies he chooses, but retched
examples of film-making chosen specifically by Dr. Forrester in an attempt to
break Mike's will to live. Dr. Forrester is convinced that one too many b-
movies is all it will take to ruin a man, but with a couple of wise-cracking
puppet buddies (Tom Servo, voiced by Kevin Murphy, and Crow T. Robot, voiced
by Beaulieu), the torture becomes somewhat of a honorary party for all that is
wrong in the world of cheezy cinema.
The purpose behind MST3K is to exploit some of the worst films known (even if
by very few of us) to man. We watch as the silhouettes of Mike, Tom, and Crow
sit in a darkened theater poking fun at the movie going on before them. In
this case, it's the 1954 sci-fi film THIS ISLAND EARTH. We basically watch as
our three leads watch, only we get the pleasure of eavesdropping on their
hilarious commentary. The plots behind the movies ripped apart are really
quite irrelevant, but for the sake of those who might want to know, I'll
explain this one. THIS ISLAND EARTH is the tale of two scientists, a man and a
woman, who wind up aboard a spaceship whose crew intends to destroy the Earth.
Together the two fight to survive as well as save their home planet.
To make MST3K work, the film-within-the-film naturally has to be as horrible
as possible, and although the TV-series introduced us to several worse films
than THIS ISLAND EARTH, it's a bad enough flick to bring about some hysterical
cruelty. MST3K, which doesn't actually contain the complete THIS ISLAND EARTH,
is a short 73 minutes, but this is a step very wisely taken. As funny as some
of their observations are, it can only go so long. Occasional breaks from THIS
ISLAND EARTH also help the film tremendously. Although it takes a second to
get back into the right mode after this premise has been left for a moment,
it's better than overkilling the whole concept post haste.
MST3K lovers will likely hail the film greatly, but if you don't know what
you're in for, it could be a jarring disappointment. Although I thought the
sharp wit of this film was worth three stars, it is a movie to be seen on home
video, late at night when your brain is not functioning to full capacity
anyway, and with a large, saracastic crowd - New Year's at midnight for
example, which is when I saw it.
Warning: Although MST3K has more to its end credits than most (the three leads
use the credits to poke some more fun), they are actually more annoying than
most. The name slandering and asinine one-liners were extremely unfunny, and
after laughing for about 70 minutes straight, it put a heavy damper on the
overall experience. Most people will likely stay to see what the smart-alec's
have to say, but for me, it almost ruined an otherwise good film.

Title
Review for Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band (1978)
Whether you like the Beatles or not, nobody wants to see the Bee Gee's take on
some of the Fab Four's best known songs. Well, maybe that's not true . . .
maybe you're curious, the way you have to look in your hanky after you blow
your nose. You just have to know how bad bad can be. If that's the case,
rejoice, because it was twenty years ago today (or so) that SGT. PEPPER'S
LONELY HEARTS CLUB BAND was released (unleashed?) to the world, and thanks to
our modern technological advances, you can find this retched piece of
filmmaking on VHS.
Derived from the lyrics of various Beatles' songs, SGT. PEPPER'S tells the
story of the fictitious band made popular from the song (and album) of the
same name, released in 1967. Of course, the movie was made eleven years later,
the Gibbs three have become the Lonely Hearts, Peter Frampton is the one and
only Billy Shears, and aside from being about a rock band, the story doesn't
correlate to the song at all. And oh, what joy - we're the lovely audience
they'd like to take home with them. I don't think so. But at least these
characters are actually *people* in a Beatles' song, whereas other characters
such as Strawberry Fields (Sandy Farina) gets her name from a song about a
*place* called Strawberry Fields. The debate over this is really quite futile
when it comes down to it, because all the film really has to offer is a feast
of horrid cover tunes, embarrassing cameo appearances (George Burns?! Steve
Martin?!? ALICE COOPER?!?!), and UUUUUUGGGGGGGLLLLLLLYYYYY 70's fashion and
faces. Check please!
The plot is a bit unclear. People with bad 70's hair run around in leisure
suits engaging in music video sequences that look like a sick and twisted
world of make-believe from an overly demented Mr. Rogers. Mean Mr. Mustard
(Frankie Howerd) somehow gets hold of all Billy & Co.'s instruments, calling
Dr. Maxwell Edison (Steve Martin with a silver hammer and an out-of-key
singing voice), the Sun King, Marvin Sunk (Alice Cooper!), and a couple of
creepy robots to his aid. Supposedly this is a horrible thing? I guess in
Heartland, the talent is pretty non-existent. Meanwhile, the Lonely Hearts are
off doing the classic "sex, drugs, and rock n' roll" thing, leaving poor
Strawberry Fields without her true love, Billy. She sets out to find him,
leaving her poor dad and mom (Mrs. Fields! Hey, wanna cookie?) all alone to
sing a horrible rendition of "She's Leaving Home", accompanied by those same
creepy robots. But is Billy getting it on with Lucy (Dianne Steinberg)? Ya
know, the diamond possessing girl who hangs out in the sky? Well, there's some
crazy chick singing soprano on the roof of a building next to a bus stop, and
I assume that's who it was.
It's movies like this that make ya sit back and ask the unanswerable question,
"What the hell were they thinking???" Nobody will ever know, but as a novelty,
SGT. PEPPER'S is one to examine. Carol Channing, Robert Palmer, Keith
Carradine - they're all here. But why???? Who knows. It's irrelevant. There's
as much meaning to be found here as there is to be found in your belly-button
lint, although the latter may be more interesting. With the recent onslaught
of 70's nostalgia in the movie world (THE ICE STORM, BOOGIE NIGHTS, reissues
of the STAR WARS trilogy, etc.), let's pray this doesn't get a special 20th
anniversary, second-chance in theaters. In the words of Paul McCartney, live
and let die. In fact, bury this one while you still can.

Title
Review for Always (1989)
The words "not bad" have never summed up a movie so well. Then again, the
words "not that great" also apply here. ALWAYS, Steven Spielberg's film to top
off the 1980's, is quite the example. The cinematography, acting, and even the
overall idea isn't too bad, but this movie is still nothing to get excited
over. Mostly, it's just a semi-decent rental when you've already seen
everything else.
ALWAYS is a remake of the 1943 film A GUY NAMED JOE, a supposed favorite of
Mr. Spielberg himself. Richard Dreyfuss stars as Pete, a pilot with a passion
for fighting forest fires - a passion so intense, it leads to frivolous stunts
and in-the-air horseplay, much to the dismay of Pete's pilot girlfriend,
Dorinda (Holly Hunter). Dorinda has had enough high anxiety and, professing
her love, convinces Pete to finally settle down and take a teaching position
in a small Colorado town. But before he quits the job he loves so much, Pete
finds himself fighting one last forest fire, but this time he doesn't come
back.
The excessive foreshadowing doesn't allow for any real surprise at Pete's
"sudden" death. In fact, it takes too long trying to create a heavy fairy-tale
atmosphere and romance before it gets to this point. When Pete does get to the
other side however, he is welcomed by an angel named Hap (Audrey Hepburn - now
we know how she's spending her afterlife). Hap tells Pete he must go back and
help a young hopeful named Ted Baker (Brad Johnson) succeed as a fire-fighter
pilot. As obvious as it is to the audience, Pete doesn't realize he is
actually helping Ted find Dorinda, and therefore find true love. For this to
take place however, both Pete and Dorinda need to get on with their life (or
afterlife), something they don't seem to want to do.
John Goodman has a role as Pete's pre-death best friend Al. In fact, it was
Al's life Pete was saving when he was killed, a less-than-affective attempt at
turning the protagonist's death into a touchy piece of heroism. Al's role in
the film is a bit undefined, and it's very hard to tell the importance, if
there is any, of his character. When the film ends, there is still no answer.
It's obvious this film is aching to be a magical "make you laugh, make you
cry" experience, but instead, it comes off rather corny. It's a sad failure in
excellence, especially when it's so obvious Spielberg (and even Dreyfuss)
really want it to work. You can sense their dedication to the project, but
dedication or no, the gas tank was empty, and ALWAYS just couldn't get going.
It was also quite forgettable, and I'm already finding it difficult to
remember what happened outside the basic plotline. Flat, unimpressive
characters haven't left anything to chew on either.
ALWAYS gets a simple * * for being a bearable two hours of boredom. Watching
airplanes take off at the airport is cheaper and perhaps a bit more exciting,
but if you're just looking for a cure to insomnia that won't upset your
stomach, this could be the answer.

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
How do you judge a film that is so bad, but intentionally so? In SPICEWORLD,
the highly popular singing group the Spice Girls accomplish their major goal:
mocking themselves with a purposely cheezy film and having a lot of fun doing
it. If that was their goal, they did a fantastic job. So is it fair to give it
such a low grade when it wasn't really meant to be much better than this?
Honestly, I'd rather see this film before many others I gave higher grades, so
does that mean I graded it inaccurately? Truth be known, I don't really think
I can answer this question.
To understand SPICEWORLD, you have to understand the Spice Girls. Unless
you're very *very* young, or fairly older, you probably have at least heard of
them. They're a group of five busty British babes who've had #1 hit singles
and whose debut album sold millions. They're primarily adored by pre-teen
girls who hope someday the contents of their training bras might match those
of Ginger Spice's (real name: Geri Haliwell) Wonderbra. All five of the girls
have these "spicy" names for which they are better known than their real
names. There is the aforementioned Ginger Spice, as well as Sporty Spice
(Melanie Chisholm, or Mel C.), Scary Spice (Melanie Brown, or Mel B.), Baby
Spice (Emma Bunton), and Posh Spice (Victoria Addams), and all of them, to
some degree or another, resemble their stage names.
The Spice Girls took the world by storm, and SPICEWORLD is actually a good-
humored spoof of all that transpired during their quick rise to fame. It's
quite nice to see what good sports the girls are (and not just the one dubbed
Sporty) about poking fun at themselves. They don't take themselves too
seriously, and that's probably the best thing about them. It's also surprising
how natural they seem in front of the camera *acting*, and not just singing
and dancing. They're not flawless by any means, but for the most part, they
deliver their lines without feeling staged, and, like them or not, we get the
sense the five are very at home within their characters (which seems
reasonable since they portray themselves).
What makes the film bad is that extreme fans of the Spice Girls won't get
enough of their music, while the rest of us don't get enough of a movie. The
real point of this is to look at the Spice Girls for over ninety straight
minutes. Most of the film is very blasé, but several parts are downright
boring, and then they have those sporadic moments that actually make us laugh
out loud! If you're a big fan of the group, you probably won't get enough of
what you want, and if you're not a big fan, you get too much time devoted to
nothing more than "look at us" moments. For the right crowd, the "music video"
sequences will be the highlights of the film, but for others, they will serve
as three-minute lulls in a hectic-but-overall-uneventful storyline.
Other key actors include Richard E. Grant as Clifford, the Spice Girls'
manager, Alan Cumming as the film-maker Piers Cutherton-Smyth who attempts to
make a documentary of the group, George Wendt as Martin Barnfield, a producer
who constantly works on pitching a Spice Girls movie, and Roger Moore in a
small, self-parodizing role. All provide relatively good performances, keeping
in mind once again that this film wasn't meant to be acted seriously. Even
Meat Loaf shows up as Dennis the bus driver and seems to have fun with it.
While this film is continuously compared to the Beatles' A HARD DAY'S NIGHT, I
think that is an unjust comparison. It is supposedly the movie studio that
first mad the comparison by way of press kits, but I don't think drector Bob
Spiers, nor the Spice Girls, intended it to be so. I think the studios were
just trying to boost hype and interest in the film, and have instead, come off
rather pretentious. I don't think this film is trying to be anything more than
a fun, satirical look at a group that got so big, a movie seemed the next
likely step. And what could've been better than a self-indulged yet self-
mocking approach? Probably nothing, and so it is.
SPICEWORLD is a movie I thought would be embarrassing to enjoy, but now
instead, I find myself wanting to defend a movie I didn't even give a good
review. It's bad, but it succeeds in every way it intended. It gives the Spice
Girls a chance to play while allowing all those obsessive fans out there to
indulge in every brainless moment. Perhaps the group is nothing more than a
gimmick. If that's the case, the movie's gimmick is that it *is* such a
gimmick! You might be saying, "a Spice Girls movie? Come on!", but when it
comes down to it, I think that's the point.

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
When I first heard about THE POSTMAN, the whole idea seemed very laughable to
me. It's the future, the world has become a wasteland, and somehow, somewhere,
a postman appears and becomes the icon of hope. A postman? A *postman*?!?! I
thought to myself, "this must've been written by some underappreciated mailman
in Nebraska or something". As it surprisingly turned out, THE POSTMAN had more
to offer than I ever thought it would.
The plot *is* similar to what I said, but I'll rephrase for the sake of
decency. It *is* the future (the year 2013 to be exact), and due to three-year
winters, bizarre weather, war, riots, etc., the world population has seriously
dwindled, the American government no longer exists, and the earth resembes the
middle ages with machine guns. A nameless wanderer (Kevin Costner) traveling
in search of food and water, finds a small village in the middle of nowehere,
and decides it is the opportunity to charm his way to nourishment. Performing
his own unique brand of one-man (and a horse) Shakespeare, he obtains the pity
and food he needs.
Peachy keen? Not quite. General Bethlehem (Will Patton) is the leader of a
KKK-influenced army that pillages and plunders small towns like the pirates of
old. Yes, he even sports a nice beard. When his army arrives in the same small
town, he wants more than supplies and food. He demands that all "eligible"
males between the ages of 15 and 30 come forward. The plan is to turn each and
every "eligible" man into a fighting machine for Bethlehem's brigade. To be
considered "eligible", you can't just be fit, you can't have any black in you.
While our wanderer attempts to sneak away, he is spotted and forced to join
the clan. Along with a few townsmen, he is taken to Bethlehem's training camp
of sorts, where Bethlehem picks on him right away. After a battle of wits,
Bethlehem derogatorily nicknames the wanderer "Shakespeare", and "Shakespeare"
quickly becomes the "runt" of the group - he's the least avid to comply, the
least to condone violence, and the one Bethlehem wants to see run into the
ground. Naturally the movie wouldn't get too exciting if "Shakespeare" didn't
escape, and so he finally does.
"Shakespeare" travels alone thru the bitter cold and finally takes up shelter
in an old mail truck. Inside, he finds the skeletal remains of a postman, and
quickly strips off the clothes to keep himself warm. He finds a lighter and
starts his own makeshift fire out of old, undelivered letters. Curiousity gets
to "Shakespeare", and soon he finds himself reading some of these old letters.
An idea!
The next we see of "Shakespeare", he is entering another town, fully dressed
as a postman and carrying a bag of letters over his shoulder. Once again, in
an effort to obtain food and nothing more, he approaches the small city. With
an outrageous tale of a "restored congress", "Shakespeare" claims to be a
postman, just like before the world went to hell. Everybody rejoices at the
news that back east the government is being renewed. The fable works, and
quickly "the postman" finds himself being fed and bathed by the rejuvinated
town. But questions start to arise, and "the postman" finds himself deeper in
his own fabrication than he ever thought he'd be. "Is there a president?" one
townsperson asks. Hesitantly, the postman replies, "Um, yes . . . Richard
Starkey".
In this town, we meet a couple of central characters. One is the young black
man determined to make something of himself. Going by the name Ford Lincoln
Mercury (Larenz Tate), he is so determined to become a postman himself that
Costner's character eventually swears him with pseudo-authority. We also meet
Abby (Olivia Williams), a young wife whose husband can't conceive. She
approaches "the postman" in the hopes that he will impregnate her so she and
her husband can have a child. Will he do it?
It doesn't take long before Bethlehem hears of this allegiant revival. He
quickly considers "the postman"  a threat to his dictatorship. What beings is
a hunt down for "the postman", and a war between Bethlehem's army and those
who wish to believe in a restored United States. I was reminded of a mixture
between BRAVEHEART and WATERWORLD. In fact, one of Bethlehem's comments refers
to an issue that was a major factor in BRAVEHEART.
What THE POSTMAN is really about, is patriotism. We watch as young hope-filled
eyes suddenly take on an aspiring radiance. It's corny as hell if you really
look at it, but THE POSTMAN carries enough charm to likely win over a large
sentimental audience. It's also surprisingly funny, and Costner's character
was my favorite of all his characters I've seen. Patton was very cliched, and
a lot of the film was very melodramatic, especially when you realize that
you're supposed to be breaking down into tears over a postman. It's sappy and
far-fetched, but it's also enamoring.
Kevin Costner seems stuck on making long, wannabe-epic films. THE POSTMAN is
no exception. Nearly stretching to three hours, this film has a massive dose
of overkill. Trim it by as little as thirty minutes, and you could've had a
cute, albeit saccharine film. But the dopey premise is forgivable thanks to
the load of sweetness. Let's just be grateful we didn't wind up with THE
U.P.S. GUY instead.

Title
Review for Blues Brothers 2000 (1998)
A movie laced with a good blend of action, comedy, and a heavy dose of musical
celebrity guest appearances sounds pretty gourmet, but even the best
ingredients can be thrown together in the wrong way, creating a dismal and
unsatisfactory product. Eighteen years after THE BLUES BROTHERS hit theaters,
BLUES BROTHERS 2000 is being unleashed, minus half of its original duo (the
late John Belushi) and nearly all of its original charm.
Dan Aykroyd reprises his role (as well as his co-writing credit) as Elwood
Blues, the sharp dressed con man who wreaked havoc on a self-proclaimed
"mission from God" along with his brother Jake and their Blues Brothers Band
nearly eighteen years ago. As we begin, Elwood is being released from a state
penitentiary along with the news of his brother's death in prison years ago.
Completely on his own, Elwood decides to trace his roots back to the orphanage
where he spent his childhood, only to discover that everyone he has ever known
has passed away. But Elwood isn't completely without family. It seems he has a
half-brother of sorts - not a real brother mind you, just the illegitimate
child of his bluesman pseudo-father Curtis (Cab Calloway from the first film),
who has also passed on. Despite inklings from Mother Superior Mary Stigmata
(Kathleen Freeman) to do otherwise, Elwood seeks out his only remaining family
in an effort to start up an all new Blues Brothers Band.
Working as a police commander, Cabel Chamberlain (Joe Morton), has an
immediate disliking for Elwood, who nonchalantly fills Cab in on his mother's
affair years ago and then goes on to steal his wallet. Following Elwood around
is the lonely orphan Buster (J. Evan Bonifant), who quickly learns to become a
mini-Elwood. When bartender Mighty Mack McTeer (John Goodman) joins the group,
the Blues Brothers Band is complete, and once again, the group travels the
country, crashing cars, blowing things up, and obstructing peace with more
than just solid blues rock. Meanwhile, Cab's personal vendetta against Elwood
leads him on an impassioned manhunt for his next-to-next-of-kin.
>From this point, the movie turns into a series of music videos with a few bits
of acting in between. Those hoping for an interesting and/or funny yarn are
given too many musical interludes while those heavily interested in the music
are given too much of a story. Only the extremely avid blues fans should
attempt getting thru these two hours. For those people, it may be worth it,
for luckily there is much more music than shoddy attempts at acting, but when
the story does intrude upon the festivities, the film is heavily bogged down
with unfunny jokes, musicians turned stiff actors, and the pointless 10-year-
old Buster attempting to add some sort of HOME ALONE cuteness to the whole
thing. Appearances by musical legends such as Aretha Franklin, James Brown,
Eric Clapton, and a whole slew of others are the high points of the film, but
they also confirm why these people are musicians and not actors.
BLUES BROTHERS 2000 is deserving of one whole star simply because if you
really, really love this kind of music, you might kind of, sort of like this
movie. Many, many scenes are nauseatingly unfunny, and if you don't have a
passion for very deep blues/rock, you'll be bored out of your skull. Much of
this film seems nothing more than Aykroyd's self-serving vanity project, but
no matter how much fun Aykroyd may be having with this, none of the excitement
is passed on to the audience. And seeing three guys in three-piece suits
goofily dancing around with poker faces can only be funny for so long.
Unfortunately, those two seconds are over about fifteen minutes into the film.

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
Did anybody notice that Roger Ebert gave "Anaconda" three and a half stars?
This fact made me feel better about giving "Conspiracy Theory" four stars.
You see, I have yet to find anyone out there, critic or no, who thought that
"Conspiracy Theory" was a great film. I figured there must be something wrong
with me. I saw it twice, TWICE and both times I was blown away and came out
of the theater knowing it would be near the top of my "Top Ten of 1997" list.
When I noticed that nobody I could find seemed to like the film as much as
me, I started to worry. Was something wrong with me? What did I miss that
made everybody else so reluctant to praise this fine film?
But did anybody notice that Roger Ebert gave "Anaconda" three and a half
stars?
"Conspiracy Theory" was one of the only movies that I actually thought "Best
Actor Nomination?" while I was watching it. Mel Gibson blew me away, as
always. Do I have a sub-concious Gibson fetish? It happened last year with
"Ransom". I loved it and put it at number one for my "Top Ten of 1996" list.
Nobody seemed to agree! What am I seeing in these movies that everybody else
is missing?
But then again, did anybody notice that Roger Ebert gave "Anaconda" three and
a half stars?
Julia Roberts is getting high acclaims for her work in "My Best Friend's
Wedding", one of the most overrated films of the year. It was stale, it was
way underdevloped, and it lacked any appeal. But people are applauding it and
leaving "Conspiracy Theory" to dwindle in box office death? Shame shame!
Oh well. I am standing my ground with giving "Conspiracy Theory" four stars.
I thought it was fantastic. I can understand someone giving it less . . .
maybe even three stars from some of those harsh critics. But less than
three???? Come on!! "Conspiracy Theory" comes highly recommended from me.
Just be warned that nobody else seems to agree.
But by the way, did anybody notice that Roger Ebert gave "Anaconda" three and
a half stars?

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
Woo, this is a wild ride of an action movie! Despite it's elaborately
overdone plot line and non-stop (meaning just when you think it's gonna wrap
up, it doesn't) action, FACE/OFF managed to knock my socks, shoes, and Levi's
off and become my personal pick for best action movie of the year!
The problem with this one is that it does manage to be just a bit too much.
Well, maybe a bit more than a bit too much. But most audiences out for a good
action flick aren't going to mind, especially in the midst of such
high-energy, richly complex action. This movie had the potential to be one of
the most satisfying movies of the year, but it went just a step beyond and
leaves us stuffed silly, perhaps looking for the mental equivalent of Pepto
Bismol. "I can't believe I ate the whole thing!" to quote the famous
commercials.
But even the acting is fascinating when you realize that what you're watching
is Nicolas Cage portraying John Travolta portraying Nicolas Cage. And vice
versa. Subtle mannerisms are awesome to pick out, and when made even more
apparent, the audience I was in (including myself) burst into an avid and
accepting chorus of laughs.
Someone who doesn't know the plot for FACE/OFF is definitely not going to
find it here! I've never been one to give summaries, but I'm not even going
to attempt one with this film! It's very complex. I could lay it out in
simplicity, but then it would truly lack it's integrity as a great action
flick.
So while I can't go into much greater detail, the fact remains that FACE/OFF
is by far the best action film yet this year. And, in case you didn't notice,
the year is drawing near to a conclusion. Far fetched, wildy overdone, and a
bit long, FACE/OFF still manages to hold you tight and make you wonder if
you're ever going to be let go!

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)
THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION stars "Friends"' Jennifer Aniston as Nina Borowski,
a social worker who falls in love with gay school teacher, George Hanson
(CLUELESS' Paul Rudd). After a disheartening breakup with his boyfriend, Dr.
Robert Joley (Timothy Daly), George finds himself moving in with Nina, a woman
he barely knows but quickly bonds with, becoming best of friends. Things run
relatively smooth until Nina discovers she is pregnant and realizes she wants
much more of George than simple friendship. Convinced George could make a much
better parent than arrogant biological father, Vince (John Pankow, best known
as Ira on "Mad About You"), Nina struggles with the realization that George
will probably never love her the way she has come to love him.
If the plot vaguely reminds you of last year's CHASING AMY, that's because it
*is* vaguely like CHASING AMY, but the two are approached differently enough
(and not just thru opposite gender roles) that THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION
never feels like a phony impersonation. The two films are distinct, most
notably the fact that OBJECT is a million times more "commercial",
disregarding the highly risque sexual observations and potentially offensive
dialogue that AMY thrived on. In fact, OBJECT deals with the homosexuality
issue much more discreetly than most "gay" movies. For the most part, the
character of George avoids the stereotypical clichés that could've turned his
character into a running gag as opposed to a genuine, caring persona. Rudd's
subtly sweet performance also gives George the right level of boyish charm
without becoming emotionally manipulative.
Aniston effortlessly proves here that she is the most talented of the
"Friends" sextet with yet another praiseworthy performance, outshining her
PICTURE PERFECT run. Sincerely conveying her character's struggle, Aniston
makes a good lead - both sweet and beautiful to gaze upon. With the rest of
the cast performing at top notch (particularly Alan Alda and Nigel Hawthorne
in smaller roles), it is obvious the flaws held by THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION
lie within the story, not it's transference to the screen. It's a shame that a
film with so many delectable one-liners tucked snugly into its script allows
for so many misfires in way of development. To speak vaguely so as not to
"spoil" the film, why are some things revealed that are nearly contradicted by
the whole premise? Why do they even show up when they will just as soon be
abandoned, leaving the audience highly justified with their notice of such an
obvious frailty?
It is OBJECT's good intentions and easy approachability that make it a likely
winner with most audiences. The film would not have suffered any if George was
a heterosexual who simply didn't return Nina's affection, but the
homosexuality "gimmick" (to put it a bit vulgarly) puts an even greater spin
on things. The ending worked well, allowing for happy resolutions all around -
something the audience is likely to ponder the likelihood of from the get go.
The audience I was in attendance with even broke into a round of applause with
one of the redeeming surprises. And so, while a tune-up could be appreciated,
THE OBJECT OF MY AFFECTION is a conventionally unconventional film that will
gain the affection of most movie goers.

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
It's a good thing WAG THE DOG didn't use some of the special effects Robert
Zemeckis favors (and heavily showed off in CONTACT), because if President
Clinton had been "morphed" into the film, Barry Levinson may have become the
Nostradamus of modern political scandal. Perhaps a sequel is in order, and
this time we *can* put Clinton in it, and this time we'll also show the
President's mistress (Monica Lewinsky superimposed into the scene), and this
time when Bubba bares all, we'll simply call it FLUBBER 2. Or, with Clinton
and Lewinsky both blended into the picture, maybe the suitable title will be
SPLICE WORLD. Oh what fun we can have watching Bill do a bad Blues Brother
impression, blaring on his saxophone while Lewinsky sings a catchy dance-pop
tune. ("If you wanna be my lover, you gotta get with the Pres"?)
One must admit, the latest White House scandal riding the coattails of WAG THE
DOG's national release is more than interesting. Who would've thought this
movie would serve as the opening act to a scandal that has gone on to dominate
headlines and news magazines for the past few months? I can only assume it has
helped WAG THE DOG bring in more business as residents of the good ole U.S.A.
flock into theaters to see how closely the outside world parallels that on the
big screen. But WAG THE DOG's focus remains more on covering the scandal than
on the scandal itself. When the President is accused of sexual misconduct
around election time, he enlists the aid of the White House's top spin doctor,
Conrad Brean (Robert De Niro), to deviate the public's attention from such
crushing allegations. In turn, Conrad enlists the aid of acclaimed Hollywood
producer Stanley Motts (Hoffman) to fabricate some overseas conflicts . . .
not quite a war, but a "pageant".
Picking Albania as the hot spot to ensure Americans' knowledge will remain
minimal, Motts hires some of his best to create "genuine" news footage,
legendary heros, and even an overly patriotic theme song. The acting is sharp,
the script clever, but there is also plenty to improve on. WAG THE DOG is too
much idea and not enough story. The pacing is hectic, creating the right
atmosphere for what's going on onscreen, but as beautifully presented as it
is, it would work much better as a thirty minute short. While one can easily
walk away from this film appreciating its biting satire and powerful cast, it
doesn't stretch far beyond a really, really good idea. Speaking for myself, I
want just a bit more.
De Niro has received quite a bit of praise for his role here, and although he
was delightfully on key, it is Hoffman who gives the only truly stellar
performance. It's obvious this project was a bit of a trip to the candy store
for both Levinson and Hoffman. The acting adrenaline is high, and Hoffman
reflects it well. On the other hand, we also have Anne Heche as White House
aide Winifred Ames. If you believe this movie, it appears that White House
aides do nothing more than sit around looking bored out of their minds. Heche
seems to add nothing more than a tranquil backdrop to an otherwise eccentric
cast of chatter-box characters.
Not only the direction of the film is hectic - the camera work by Robert
Richardson is also a bit hyper, with sudden unnecessary zooms and pans that
made me dizzy. It's a bit distracting when you feel like you're watching a
political documentary shot by Mtv. Still, the intelligent comedy is a rare
thing nowadays, and this one is incredibly smart. For that aspect alone, WAG
THE DOG is one to see. With all the hoopla over Clinton going on however, it's
not much of an escape from the real world.

Title
Review for Spawn (1997)
"Spawn" may be somewhat of an older film. In fact it will probably be on
video before anyone who hasn't seen it will finally get to see it (that is,
IF they see it). But i managed to catch it before it made it's way out of
theaters and into the world of rentals and, God forbid, video cassette
purchasing.
It wasn't the worst film of year by any means. It isn't even on the top 5 of
the worst films of the year. But it did manage to top the bottom five of the
bottom ten, which, in simpler terms, means it comes in at number 6 on my
"Worst of 1997" list. The only reason it doesn't come in lower is thanks to
the special effects, which might actually have been some of the best of the
year.
Performances, however, were either wooden or, for the most part,
unforgivingly campy. In fact, this film shows no signs of attempting to avoid
campiness! Even the editing seemed to boast a campy quality. I don't know how
to explain that one; it wasn't exactly choppy, but something about it seemed
. . . well, annoyingly unprofessional. John Leguizamo almost makes it as
Clown, but not quite. He is the only character who provides the audience with
any laughs that can honestly be called intentional.
But the main problem i found with "Spawn", as with most films that wind up on
my "worst of" lists, is that it was just plain boring. I wouldn't even say
there was a climax to the film. Sure, it had the big battle scene at the end,
but the only excitement felt was that the movie might be nearing a
conclusion. Never too soon, the movie did conclude in a very simple,
disappointing way. Even though it's one of the shorter movies i've seen this
year, it's one that I would definitely not want to subject myself to sitting
thru again.
Like I said, the special effects are the only reason that this film should
have any sense of pride, no matter how small. I was impressed with the
opening sequence, so long as I didn't allow the melodramatic voice-over and
lobotomizing editing to get to me. And Batman has nothing on the spectacular
visuals Spawn's outfit created. But even the effects got tiresome during the
final scenes, which looked quite a bit like a modern video game. Who knows if
"Spawn: The Video Game" wasn't part of the plan from the beginning?
Keeping in mind that the film was based on a comic book makes it somewhat
more approachable, and in a very small amount, makes up for the cheeziness of
it all. But none of this movie's saving graces can it make it something I'd
recommend seeing, no matter what the price of admission. This movie is
definitely not for young children, which shouldn't really be a problem seeing
as how only teenagers, if anyone, would likely find it appealing. If you
really want to catch a movie, there are many better ones out there, no matter
what your tastes might be! Trust me! "Spawn" has very little to offer even
the most avid moviegoers!

Title
Review for Excess Baggage (1997)
Alicia Silverstone - you either love her or hate her. That could make all the
difference in your interpretation of EXCESS BAGGAGE. If you love her, you'll
have no problem sitting thru 100+ minutes of fluff just to look at her, but if
you hate her, those same 100+ minutes are going to be excruciating.
EXCESS BAGGAGE stars Alicia Silverstone as Emily T. Hope, a whiny, bratty, but
ignored daughter of multi-millionaire Alexander Hope (Jack Thompson). In an
effort to obtain any form of attention from her father, Emily engages in a
wide array of stunts and pranks that usually get her in trouble. Emily knows
no discipline. In fact, she seems rather proud of her wild antics, even going
to the extent of framing newspaper articles about the disasters she personally
choreographs. As the film begins, Emily is up to yet another prank. This time,
she has faked her own kidnapping and is leading her father on a wild goose
chase. After he drops off the one-million dollar ransom, she informs him over
the phone, with an altered voice, that she can be found in the trunk of her
car in a parking terrace.
Emily proceeds to bond herself with tape and handcuffs and stuff herself in
the trunk of her BMW, which means that if you're into bondage as well as
Silverstone, you're in for a real treat. One problem occurs: a car-thief named
Vincent (Benicio Del Toro) comes along and does what he does best, stealing
the car and unknowingly abducting Emily. Vincent takes his "catch" back to a
warehouse full of other costly sports cars, but his curiosity is soon peaked
when noise is heard coming from the trunk. Slowly he approaches the car and
pops open the trunk, quickly slamming it back shut when he sees the blonde
bound bimbo.
Vincent panics and calls his conniving accomplice, Greg (Harry Connick, Jr.)
from a nearby coffee shop.  Vincent returns to the warehouse to wait for Greg,
only to find that Emily has escaped the trunk. He continuously promises not to
hurt her as she beats the crap out of him, but he finally gets her under
control and locks her in the bathroom. When Greg arrives, they come to the
conclusion that the best answer is to simply take Emily off somewhere and
leave her. This proves to be a more difficult task than Vincent thought as he
attempts to get the ever-so-non-compliant Emily in the car. Finally he does,
and the two set out on a long, tension filled ride.
When Vincent drops Emily off on the side of the road in the middle of nowhere,
he breathes a sigh of relief. Up the road, however, he stops at a gas station
and sees the report on the news, learning that Emily is the daughter of a
multi-millionaire and that the cops are on his trail. Unsure of what to do, he
finds Emily and picks her up again, taking her along as he tries to come to a
conclusion for this unbelievable mishap. Emily, whose life hasn't seemed to
mean much to anyone, doesn't object to accompanying Vincent, but she also
doesn't make it easy on him, consantly bickering and complaining about his
every more.
Vincent and Emily are the odd couple who will inevitably fall for each other
and become a team as opposed to the original kidnapper/kidnappee relationship.
The two travel around, trying to avoid the police, Emily's uncle Ray
(Christopher Walkin) who has been the closest thing to a father-figure in
Emily's life, and a pair of angry thugs (including Nicolas Turturro) who are
out to collect on the Emily's well-to-do background.
The idea behind EXCESS BAGGAGE is quite charming, but the actors and script
don't allow it to bloom into the delightful film it could've been. Alicia
Silverstone is so bland and whiny that you won't be able to like her, and
Benicio Del Toro seems to have taken a heavy dose of sleeping pills before
every take. Most of the time, Del Toro mumbles unintelligible phrases as
though he's awaking from a ten year coma. The rest of the cast, with the
possible exception of Harry Connick, Jr., are used like parsley - they're
simply there to add to the appearance, not to the overall item. Connick can be
commended for trying, but that's about all he has the chance to do.
EXCESS BAGGAGE can probably easily find a market among teenagers, particulary
younger hormone raging teenagers. It's not the worst, but it does turn out
overly conventional. It's not worth wasting your time - unless you're
seriously into Alicia Silverstone in handcuffs.

Title
Review for G.I. Jane (1997)
In English class they teach you that there are three conflicts used in
writing: Man vs. Man, Man vs. Nature, and Man vs. Himself. Well to really say
what G.I. JANE is, we have to add a new category . . . Woman vs. Man.
Jordan O'Neil (Demi Moore) has always wanted more experience in the military.
Unfortunately this was something hard for her to gain in a male-dominated,
very often female-degrading, organization. It seems the Navy Lieutenant still
caries a grudge after being denied a combat position during the Gulf War. But
when Senator Lillian DeHaven (Anne Bancroft) is preparing for her next
election and needs something that will give her a sure-fire win, the two meet
and our premise is setup. Pushing for woman's rights, DeHaven will get O'Neil
to be the first female "guinea pig" to go thru the Navy SEALS training
program, something that even 60% of men can't seem to accomplish. The
ultimate goal? If O'Neil can make it, full integration may be the next step
in the military.
Naturally, O'Neil goes for it. It's a chance to prove herself. It seems a
win-win situation. O'Neil will get experience and DeHaven will get some
positive publicity. Sounds perfect right? Well, aside from O'Neil herself,
nobody expects much of a result . . . including the Senator.
The building block of G.I. JANE is really just a backdrop to the real
conflicts: Will the men come to accept her? Will her boyfriend support her?
Quite simply, can O'Neil make it? This movie is very well done even if you do
know what you're in for: vulgar sexual references by chauvinistic males that
make the lone-female even more determined to stick it out. It's not a
complaint that this film is pretty cut and dry . . . it's your typical
"against the odds" hero, er, heroine story . . . but if you're looking for
something absolutely spectacular, you might be slightly disappointed.
Demi Moore, one of the highest paid female stars and also one of the most
criticized, does a decent job here. Her body is still her main asset and
she's still showing it off, although now in a more muscular fashion. Anne
Bancroft and Viggo Mortensen (as Master Chief John Urgayle) both do good jobs
at making you hate them. In fact, the only likeable character is O'Neil
herself. She's an outsider and we're stuck rooting for her whether we like it
or not. One thing that stops this film from being a stand up and cheer movie
is that's it's so brutal! By the time G.I. JANE wraps up, you're not in high
spirits, you're downright exhausted!
It's not an action flick, but G.I. JANE has plenty of fighting, screaming,
blood, and gunfire to satisfy those with an insatiable appetite for such
things. It can be hard to follow, and there are a few things that  come up
that are just as quickly forgotten about, but if you move past that, it's not
a bad film. At times confusing, at times implausible, at times hokey (some
dialogue wants to be deemed classic, but comes off quite silly), it isn't the
kind of film that will be remembered long, but it is recommendable. Here's a
movie that gives new meaning to the term "chick flick".

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
There are movies that are carried completely on the weight of character
development and interaction (WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE?), and there are
movies completely carried by brilliant special effects (INDEPENDENCE DAY).
When the two actually collide (CONTACT), it is a rare masterpiece. DARK CITY
is a visual movie with a very intriguing idea - unfortunately this city is so
dark, the idea can't see where it's going.
Imagine waking up one day, your memory altogether erased and a dead prostitute
in your room. Like a Dr. Jekyll & Mr. Hyde story, DARK CITY begins with such a
premise as John Murdoch (Rufus Sewell) awakens in a dingy bathtub with no
recollection of how he got there. Although John can not remember his own
identity, there are several people who do seem to know he is. For one, there
is the police, in particular, Inspector Frank Bumstead (William Hurt) who
oversees the case of mysterious murders for which John is the main suspect.
Secondly, there is John's wife, Emma (Jennifer Connelly), a lounge singer
who's affair supposedly drove John away. Thirdly, there is the mad scientist
like Dr. Daniel Poe Schreber (Kiefer Sutherland), a man whose intentions are
as ambiguous as the time of day (which in "Dark City" is *very* uncertain).
Last but not least, we have a group of bald stark-white guys in black attire
known by names such as Mr. Hand, Mr. Sleep, Mr. Quick, Mr. Wall, etc. Note:
even though they're all bald, there isn't a Mr. Clean.
As things very tediously slowly unravel, we discover that these "men", simply
known as "strangers", have been putting the entire world to sleep every time
the clock strikes midnight. They then proceed to use supernatural powers they
refer to as "tuning" to reshape the city. By joint concentration, the group of
non-human beings are able to construct elaborate apartment buildings in a
matter of seconds, but when everyone awakes from their frozen state, nobody
seems to notice the world around them has transformed into a new, seemingly
unrecognizable environment. John becomes the exception to the rule, never
falling under the sleeping spell and fully aware that the city is anything but
natural. He also has the ability to tune, something he isn't fully aware of
but something the "strangers" find very threatening to their ascendancy. With
everyone seemingly against him, John finds himself on the run from a darkly
transcendental and claustrophobic realm.
Discovering this fact alone takes way too much time. For a very long while,
the audience is left completely in the dark (pun intended) about any sort of
plot. We follow John around the city, watching bizarre occurrences take place
around him as though they were common everyday circumstances. However, this is
true in Dark City, where everybody's heard of Shell Beach but nobody knows how
to get there, and the sun is in everybody's memories but hauntingly never
present in present time. It sounds highly intriguing, and had the audience
been introduced to the "why" questions without dallying so long on the "what"
questions, DARK CITY could've made for a richly absorbent piece of gothic-
psychological thriller-sci-fi. Had director / co-writer Alex Proyas bothered
to delve as deep into John's psychosis as he did the futuristically macabre
imagery, the result would've been an intense and innovative mind trip. Sadly,
without character development or the slightest attempt to lure the audience in
(instead of just confusing us endlessly), such a grand project was never
realized.
Hurt's not looking up this year with such dreary performances in this and LOST
IN SPACE, but at least here his heavily subdued toning blends right in. Sewell
and Connelly are also inordinately ordinary, and Sutherland's Igor impression
is highly laughable, though never intentionally so. In the drab settings, a
lesser ebullience can be expected, but when performances become lethargic, it
is very hard to remain interested. Proyas, whose THE CROW has developed
somewhat of a cult following, is trying to be too artistically trippy, and
there seems to be a lost, deep meaning about humanity that wants to come thru
but never does surface. Any attempts at "real" substance fail embarrassingly.
With so much potential packed into such a misguided film, one must give DARK
CITY two stars for effort, but a big thumbs down on the recommendation level.

Title
Review for Kissing a Fool (1998)
Oh, how I wanted to love this movie, and I almost did, but something about its
overpowering lackluster prevented me from doing so. So much potential, so many
winning elements, and so many mistakes, KISSING A FOOL has its wings, it just
doesn't know how to take flight.
"Friend" to all, David Schwimmer stars in this romantic comedy as a Chicago
sportscaster / local Don Juan, Max Abbitt, a handsome egomaniac who scores
more often than the Cubs. We begin at a wedding where the groom's identity is
kept concealed, allowing for a small amount of mystery for anyone in the
audience who can't figure out the end from the very beginning. As everyone's
off dancing and celebrating, we focus in on a semi-cynical, chain smoking
wedding guest, Linda Streicher (Bonnie Hunt), who seems more anxious to sit on
tacks than be in attendance at the gala. It is from her that the story behind
Max, his best friend Jay (Jason Lee), and Sam the bride (Mili Avital), is
recounted to a pair of total strangers who listen intently as Linda catches
them, and the audience, up on all the wedding preliminaries.
Flashback: Jay is a novelist catering to the tenderness of the heart, adapting
his novels from the feelings of love and heartbreak experienced in
relationships past. After being dumped by an aspiring model (Vanessa Angel),
Jay has spent the past several months in a state of depression, working and
writing as a compensation for lost love. In the meanwhile, his best friend for
life, Max, is Chicago's most eligible (and promiscuous) bachelor. In an
attempt to tame the libidinous beast, Jay sets Max up for a night out with his
new book editor, Sam, hoping that Max will be stricken by something new,
beauty *and* brains, and finally settle down into a happily monogamous
relationship. As things turn out, it is only a matter of weeks before Sam and
Max are engaged to be married, surprising everyone at the sudden change in
Max's flirtatious lifestyle.
As the wedding bells draw near, it becomes apparent that Max is more than
skeptical of jumping into such a committable institution, but surprise
surprise, it's isn't Max's fear of monogamy, it's his fear of Sam's
trustworthiness. What if Max isn't enough for her? So, drawing it straight
down the line, Max approaches Jay with a proposition - try to get Sam to cheat
on him. If she's willing to sleep with Jay, the wedding's off, but if not, Max
will know she's the one. The premise is as shallow as Max himself, but it
gives Scwimmer quite a turn from his puppy-dog character on "Friends".
Likewise, Lee becomes the emotional romantic as opposed to the self-righteous
misanthrope characters he played in MALLRATS and CHASING AMY. While Schwimmer
turns in a competent performance, it is Lee who clearly shines, perhaps
brooding with too much talent for such an otherwise mediocre film. Showing
that he can charmingly play either side of the spectrum, hopefully Lee's
appearance here will catapult him to some bigger and better roles, even if his
talent is hidden in the depths of a blasé film.
Leave it to Avital to make the underdeveloped Sam as likeable as she is,
surely not an easy task with such thin makings. Avital shows budding ability
that, after nurturing a few roles, has real potential to blossom. The stifled
chemistry between her and Lee (oops, did I say something?) is surprisingly
candid. It is those kind of attributes that make KISSING A FOOL such a
disappointment. It's as if they're saying "look how good we *could* have been"
before retaliating with an occasional ill-directed, terribly wooden scene.
Charm abounds, quite a few bits of humor are downright hilarious, but quality,
overall, sags. To be fair, the charm outweighs the flaws, so brace yourself
for all the imperfections and give this one a chance on video.

Title
Review for Oh, God! Book II (1980)
In 1977, a light hearted comedy about God was released with a not too
ambiguous title: OH, GOD! It starred John Denver and George Burns, both of
whom are now dead (meaning Burns is just a tad closer to his role than he was
over twenty years ago). It spawned two sequels, the first of which followed
the original's premise to a great extent - God comes down to Earth to initiate
a spokesperson of sorts, all the while causing an uproar over this person's
highly unbelievable testimony. Perhaps as a motive to attract a swarm of
movie-goers to the film, OH, GOD! BOOK II made the spokesperson into an
11-year-old girl, capable of warming hearts with her innocent smile. Nice
touch - if the story couldn't captivate audiences a second time around, maybe
an adorable little girl could.
The girl in question is Tracy (played by uniname actress, Louanne), the child
of divorced parents still holding grudges toward one another. At a Chinese
restaurant on her weekly night out with dad, Tracy makes an innocent passing
comment about having faith in God, and before she knows it, her fortune
cookies are a bit too personalized. It seems God (played again by George
Burns) liked young Tracy's insight, and via the fortune cookies, He instructs
her to meet Him in the lounge. It takes a bit of convincing (i.e. doors
opening and closing by themselves) to assure Tracy this isn't just a hoax, but
when God finally has her full attention, He tells her the reason behind this
personal revelation: He wants Tracy to come up with a slogan to remind people
that He's still out there. After all, the world definitely could give the Big
Guy some overly due recognition. Thus, in a blaze of confused astonishment,
Tracy agrees to try and come up with something over the next week (and agrees
not to cheat by passing the task on to her advertising agent of a father).
Enlisting the aid of a pre-teen is a smart move, especially when adults seem
way too busy and out of touch to really hone in on such an important task. Of
course, who's going to turn down a guy who has the ability to shove a
lightning bolt up your wazoo? As stated above in simpler terms, the
spokesperson (Tracy) will deliver God's message (the slogan "Think God") and
cause a big hoopla as people begin deeming him/her crazy (parents, teachers,
shrinks, etc.). When Tracy gets all the kids in her school to participate in a
"promote God" campaign (more or less), parents and faculty complain. Yes, even
in the conservative world of 1980, public school is not to be used as a
religious pulpit. Psychologists blame the "hallucinations" on the parent's
divorce, the parents question each other, and although it's not shown, I'm
sure someone blames it on a bad plate of sushi.
OH, GOD! BOOK II hasn't aged as gracefully as George Burns (not that I've seen
him in the last couple of years), but it's still not a bad film by any means.
Still suffering from the anguishable 1970's, 1980 isn't all that pleasant to
look at, but nonetheless offers an overly sweet tale of a little girl's
struggle to do what's right. That's putting it even more impressively than it
really is, but at least it's an innocent film that families can enjoy together
without a barrage of mindless vulgar comments. Yes, the color brown dominates
every frame and the only contrast seems to be dark rouge plastered in thick
smudges across Suzanne Pleshette's cheeks, but the story outlasts the
horrendous fashions. The legitimate complaint should be about the film's
pacing, which is a bit tedious from today's standards. There are way too many
stops and starts that seem due more to it's time than to unprofessional film-
making. These lulls could easily lead to distraction, but with a bit more
effort than today's movies require, you can keep yourself focused.
Next time you head to the video store, you'll likely find tons of choices that
far exceed this film. Fair or not, older films, save it be classics (which
this clearly is not), just don't have the appeal of an even more lame but
fairly recent movie. As awful as it is, you'll probably pick up THE PEST from
the new release wall before you decide to mosey over into the "old" movies and
pick this one up. True, this isn't so recommendable that I urge you to seek it
out, but it is an O.K. alternate when all those new releases are checked out.

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
I can already feel the hate letters pouring in on this one, folks. I loved THE
WEDDING SINGER. But it gets worse. If I so much as mention TITANIC in the same
sentence . . . hell, same paragraph as THE WEDDING SINGER, I'm bound to be
lynched. Well lynch me then, because I thought Adam Sandler and Drew Barrymore
had the most convincing chemistry in recent memory, with TITANIC as the only
exception.
Right away, you're ready to discount my review, aren't you? You're thinking
that I can't possibly know what I'm talking about. After all, this is Adam
Sandler right??? Well, there's more . . . I actually got choked up, and more
than once. Yes, the man who brought us BILLY MADISON and HAPPY GILMORE was
able to bring sincere tears to my eyes. But before you shrug me off as an
imbecile, I urge you to see the movie and see for yourself.
THE WEDDING SINGER is the story of Robby Hart (Sandler), a 1985 rock star
wannabe whose soul achievement in life has been performing cover tunes at
wedding receptions for the past five years or so. But when his own wedding
results in a no-show for the bride (Angela Featherstone as Linda), Robby
begins to re-examine his life, and wonder why true love doesn't exist for
people like him.
In the process of performing at these receptions, Robby meets a waitress named
Julia, played with wholesome sweetness by Drew Barrymore, whose reputation is
anything but this character. Julia too is engaged, and when Robby finds
himself without a wife, his free time allows him to help her plan her own
wedding, seeing as how her fiance, the "Miami Vice" loving Glenn (Matthew
Glave), doesn't seem all that interested. As the time goes by, we learn the
reason Glenn is do dispassionate about the wedding - he's merely marrying
Julia to prevent a breakup, something he wants to avoid even if he does sleep
around with tons of other women.
It's obvious that Robby is going to fall for Julia and feel a strong need to
rescue her, but what is a lighthearted romantic comedy for? This isn't
SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, but I'd actually compare it to that before I'd compare
it to HAPPY GILMORE. While THE WEDDING SINGER maintains some of that post-SNL
cornball humor, its sincerity and charm carry it a very, very long way.
Sandler is great in his role, and yes, if you allow it, you can take him
seriously. Barrymore seems perfect along side him, and although the two more
likely represent Gen-X moronism and party-girl ditzism (respectively), the two
go together like bread and butter as a mid-eighties couple. One scene in
particular, where Julia ponders the future in a mirror, is so well done, I was
on the verge of tears.
Unfortunately, Sandler is going to make a lot of people shrug this one off as
a no-brainer, but it's got so much surprise substance packed inside that I'm
encouraging everyone to go see it. In fact, the entire theater applauded when
the film ended, and laughs were so consistent, some jokes were probably missed
due to the uproar. The 1985 setting was milked for everything it was worth,
and for those of us that are old enough to remember it, it was a bodacious
trip back (and done very well).
Sandler shows a new side to himself while maintaining all his original charm
(or is it anti-charm?). While THE WEDDING SINGER only deserves three stars due
to artistic merit, grading it on pure enjoyability would give this one four
stars. It's hilarious, and it's touching. It's got that great cheezy humor,
but it also takes Sandler to a higher level than anyone expected. This is one
to see again and again. Is it possible THE WEDDING SINGER could be one of the
sweetest romantic comedies of 1998? My "Magic 8-ball" predicts it is certain.

Title
Review for Medicine Man (1992)
Cancer. Rainforests. Woman's Lib. Wow! What a socially-aware movie all those
elements would make, eh? Socially-aware? *Maybe* . . . but also boring.
MEDICINE MAN stars Sean Connery as Dr. Robert Campbell, a scientist who has
spent quite a few years in the Amazon rainforest trying to re-discover a cure
for cancer. That's right, he *did* discover a cure, but due to one lacking
ingredient that he just can't place, he has been unable to duplicate his
initial result. Enter Lorraine Braco as Dr. Rae Crane. Uh oh. A woman.
Campbell sure wasn't expecting this, and naturally the two do anything but hit
it off.
With a trivial amount of effort, the two make the best of things and set out
to determine what's missing from Campbell's concoction. No, it's not
Campbell's Cream of Cancer soup, but rather a remedy derived from a particular
flower native to the region; a region which, by the obvious way, is being torn
down minute by minute.
MEDICINE MAN is actually quite predictable and routine, leaving one bored and
unimpressed. At best, you'll likely find this movie tolerable. There is no
real tension, no real romance, and no real freshness to the film. The only
thing it has going for it are some nice shots of the Amazon, but nothing at
all besides that. Even Sean Connery is predominantly mundane!
It's Lorraine Braco's performance that stands out . . . in an all but positive
way! Braco is downright awful as the whiny, always complaining, "independent"
woman of the 90's. In fact, everyone in this film seems apt to arguing. Every
conversation turns into a shouting match without warning. It's very hokey and
very annoying. What is the purpose here? Oh, that's right . . . every good
"love" story starts off with a seemingly hateful couple that will inevitably
fall in love.
A social-issue cliche, MEDICINE MAN is much too much what we've already seen.
When blasé performances are the *best* thing you can expect from a movie, you
know it's a bad sign. Not completely unwatchable, it's still comparable to a
glass of warm milk. Don't waste your time.

Title
Review for Playing God (1997)
I've often wondered how silly actors feel when they narrate a movie. You know,
that voice over that explains everything going on right before your eyes -
either cluing you in on the things you can't see, catching up on all the
preliminary events, or just plain making sure you understand the scene in case
the director can't cut it. I just can't imagine standing at a microphone and
trying to *sound* like the character just talking, and not like I'm reading or
acting. At least with animated movies you can get into the character, but with
a simple narration, you're stuck.
Getting back to the actual movie at hand, PLAYING GOD starts off with David
Duchovny's voice catching us up on his character Eugene Sands' life. In an
extremely laid back Duchovny tone, we come to realize that Eugene is an ex-
doctor whose license was taken away when a patient died at his hands during
surgery. Doesn't this happen once in a while? Yes, but it just so happens that
Eugene was under the influence of narcotics at the time. Ahhh, now you see.
Duchovny rambles on as we watch his character entering an underground club in
search of synthetic heroin. It seems that the tragic event hasn't changed
Eugene's life for the better. Eugene still isn't satisfied with such natural
highs as perfecting a hook shot or bench pressing five more pounds than he did
the week before, and his idea of a snack, as an adult, is no longer cookies
and milk, but rather heroin and milk. Skip the Hershey's chocolate syrup - get
Kurt Cobain on the phone!
As Eugene drinks it up at a bar, we watch two thugs working their way thru the
raving, dimly-lit bodies on the dance floor, their hands lingering on the
insides of their sportscoats. Do you think they could have guns in there? Oh
geez! Well, before you have time to answer that, they pull out their semi-
automatics and pump a few rounds into some poor bastard standing right next to
Eugene. Unfortunately, because of all the underground dealings going on around
this club, nobody will dial 911. In a quick balancing act of morals versus
possible judicial consequences, Eugene falls to the ground and plays MacGyver
after ten years in medical school. He saves the guy's life using a plastic
water bottle to somehow prevent a collapsed lung from being fatal. Three
cheers for Dr. MacGyver, and three hallelujahs for Evian!
Time passes, and little happens in the life of Eugene. We listen to his voice
over recounting the renewed sensation of saving someone's life. He sounds like
a private investigator in some cheesy movie, using flippant metaphors and
analogies such as comparing playing doctor again to a prisoner spending one
day in the sun, making the prison seem so much more bleak. Kicking back with a
dose of heroin, Eugene falls into a deep sleep/trance providing an excellent
opportunity for a flashback to the events that *threw* Eugene from grace. We
watch as a drugged up Dr. Sands kills an already dying woman, but we soon
escape his mind trip to watch as two punks (not the thugs from before), kidnap
the unconscious doctor-no.
Eugene is taken to a beach-side property and introduced to Raymond Blossom, a
fraud catering criminal played by Timothy Hutton. Raymond ends up befriending
Eugene in a very unusual way and Eugene becomes an unofficial mob doc, getting
paid ten grand for every body he works on. Yes - every (space) body. But the
question of legalities still haunt Eugene, not to mention the quirkiness of
the criminals he's almost unwillingly getting so involved with. It seems the
one he wants to get involved with most, Raymond's girlfriend Claire (Angelina
Jolie), is the only one that seems to hate him.
PLAYING GOD is really more of a light-psychological thriller/action pic that
delves into the explication that every little thing you do, whether it seem
important or not, could affect your life in major ways. To be perfectly
honest, this mumbo-jumbo wasn't at all what I found to be worthwhile about
this film. Neither was the great acting . . . of course there wasn't much of
that to begin with. What did make this film worthwhile was it's quirky,
lighthearted yet philosophical approach to an otherwise run-of-the-mill
psychological action flick. Can you say that ten times fast?
There was nothing of high merit in this film, but I was able to sit back and
kill brain cells in a dark theater without getting bored, and that's pretty
good. It starts off a little slow and with a slight insinuation of a
potentially campy film, but it just gets better the longer you watch. Duchovny
is kind of fun even if he is drier than Death Valley. Hutton doesn't do too
bad, but is more noticeable for looking incredibly like Kevin Kline than for
his acting. Jolie is ok for being so underdeveloped, but I didn't complain
that I had to look at her.
In the end, PLAYING GOD doesn't deserve a lot, but it's fun. It's main flaw
would actually be how many plot holes and unresolved (or even never fully
developed) events and characters it has. This one ties up with many loose
ends. In other words, I'd rather hold Glad Ziplock Freezer bags above my head
than this movie, but I still think it's worth checking out when it hits home
video.
